dr. goldberg offers everything i look for in a general practitioner.  he's nice and easy to talk to without being patronizing; he's always on time in seeing his patients; he's affiliated with a top-notch hospital (nyu) which my parents have explained to me is very important in case something happens and you need surgery; and you can get referrals to see specialists without having to see him first.  really, what more do you need?  i'm sitting here trying to think of any complaints i have about him, but i'm really drawing a blank.
Top notch doctor in a top notch practice. Can't say I am surprised when I was referred to him by another doctor who I think is wonderful and because he went to one of the best medical schools in the country. \nIt is really easy to get an appointment. There is minimal wait to be seen and his bedside manner is great.
Dr. Eric Goldberg is a fantastic doctor who has correctly diagnosed every issue that my wife and I have had. Unlike many of my past doctors, Dr. Goldberg is very accessible and we have been able to schedule appointments with him and his staff very quickly. We are happy to have him in the neighborhood and look forward to being his patients for many years to come.
This place was DELICIOUS!!  My parents saw a recommendation to visit this place from Rick Sebak's \"25 Things I Like About Pittsburgh\" and he's usually pretty accurate.  His recommendations were to try the Reuben, Fish Sandwich and Open-Faced Steak Sandwich.  We went early afternoon for a late lunch today (a Saturday) and were seated right away.  The staff is extremely friendly.  My Mom & I each had the fish sandwich, while my Dad & Brother had a Reuben sandwich.  The fish was very good, but the Reuben was to die for!  Both dishes were massive, and could very easily be shared between two people.  On top of being extremely large portions, it was incredibly affordable.  The giant fish sandwich was $8 and the giant Reuben was $7.50.  Our drinks were always filled and we were checked on several times during the meal.  We will definitely be back!!!  Oh and a bit of advice ahead of time - they take CASH ONLY.  So come prepared, but I'm pretty sure I saw an ATM there as well.  And I do believe they are closed on Sundays & Mondays.
Can't miss stop for the best Fish Sandwich in Pittsburgh.
This place should have a lot more reviews - but I'm glad it doesn't, they don't need to get any busier.\n\nIts been there ages, and looks it. If you're all about ambiance, don't bother. If you pretend you're in a movie set in Pittsburgh 30 years ago it works pretty well. The service is sometimes hit or miss. Most of girls are good, one is very slow, one is amazing. They are all friendly and usually a few different people will check in to make sure that you're happy. Everything is made fresh so be prepared that nothing comes flying out of that kitchen - busy times it can take a good while to get food. \n\nThe food is AWESOME! Worth any little complaints I might think up before it gets there. Once its on the table, I forget them all.\n\n-Fish Sandwiich\n-Salmon (huge and delicious)\n-Flounder\n-Shrimp a few ways (\"Norfolk\" style is oily for my taste, and I never had it growing up in Norfolk.)\n-Hawkins St Special\n-Prime Rib (sized for two, watch it)\n\nThe prices are low, the portions are large, and just about everything on the menu  is delicious. I'm not one to pick a place because they give you a lot of food, but if you like a good value and don't want to compromise on taste, this place is a gem.
Old school.....traditional \"mom 'n pop\" quality and perfection. The best fish and chips you'll ever enjoy and equally superb fried shrimp. A great out of the way, non-corporate, vestige of Americana. You will love it.
Good fish sandwich.
After a morning of Thrift Store hunting, a friend and I were thinking of lunch, and he suggested Emil's after he'd seen Chris Sebak do a bit on it and had tried it a time or two before, and I had not. He said they had a decent Reuben, but to be prepared to step back in time.\n\nWell, seeing as how I'm kind of addicted to late 40's and early 50's, and the whole Rat Pack scene, stepping back in time is a welcomed change in da burgh...as long as it doesn't involve 1979, which I can see all around me every day.\n\nAnd yet another shot at finding a decent Reuben in da burgh...well, that's like hunting the Holy Grail. So looking under one more bush certainly wouldn't hurt.\n\nSo off we go right at lunchtime in the middle of...where exactly were we? At first I thought we were lost, driving around a handful of very rather dismal looking blocks in what looked like a neighborhood that had been blighted by the building of a highway. And then...AHA! Here it is! And yep, there it was. This little unassuming building with an add-on entrance with what looked like a very old hand painted sign stating quite simply 'Emil's. \n\nWe walked in the front door, and entered another world. Another time, and another place. Oh, and any Big Burrito/Sousa foodies might as well stop reading now. I wouldn't want to see you walk in, roll your eyes and say 'Reaaaaaalllly?'\n\nThis is about as old world bar/lounge/restaurant as it gets. Plain, with a dark wood bar on one side, plain white walls with no yinzer pics, good sturdy chairs and actual white linens on the tables. This is the kind of neighborhood dive that I could see Frank and Dino pulling a few tables together for some poker, a fish sammich, and some cheap scotch. And THAT is exactly what I love.\n\nOh...but good food counts too. \n\nWe each had a Reuben, and my friend had a side of fries. The Reubens were decent, but not NY awesome. A little too thick on the bread, but overall, tasty and definitely filling. Not too skimpy on the meat. I seriously CRAVE a true, good NY Reuben, but since I can't afford to travel right now, what I find in da burgh will have to do. But as we sat and ate, burgers came out to an adjoining table. Those were some big thick burgers. A steak went past for the table behind us. That was HUGE! And when we asked about it, the waitress said 'Yeah, it's huge and really good, and he only charges $12.99 for it, ain't that nuts?' Another table of five came in, and wham. Fish sandwiches PILED with breaded fish that looked amazing. Yeah, I want that, that, that and THAT!\n\nMy friend also mentioned that they have a Chicken Parm special one day of the week that is only served UNTIL 4 pm, and that it is fantastic. If only I could GET there on that week day before 4...\n\nThe waitress did a good job, especially since there was quite a growing crowd at lunchtime on a Saturday, and only one of her. She kept up and was very friendly. \n\nThey only have Pepsi products, so I had a brewed iced tea, which was very fresh, and she did pop by to ask about refills as often as she could. As the lunch hour went on, they were getting busy.\n\nEmil's is no frills, good portions, very reasonable prices, VERY comfortable neighborhood hole in the wall...kind of like Cheers, but in a blue collar neighborhood in the 1950's. Fan-freakin-tastic! I could feel at home here.\n\nYou definitely want to hit Mapquest or plug in your GPS though. I am not sure that I could find it again on my own...it really is a hidden gem. I will be making my friend take me back until I can memorize where the heck it is.\n\nAddendum: 2nd visit for the fish sandwich. Excellent. Truly. A pound of fish on a fish-shaped bun (as opposed to da burgh's seemingly popular hamburger bun). The fish was flavorful, the batter excellent, and for just $8. This may have been the best fish sandwich I've yet to have in da burgh.
Let there be no question: Alexions owns the best cheeseburger in the region and they have now for decades. Try a burger on Italian bread. The service is flawlessly friendly, the food is amazing, and the wings? Oh the wings... but it's still about the cheeseburger. The atmosphere is inviting, but you can't eat atmosphere... so go right now. Grab the car keys... you know you're hungry for an amazing cheeseburger, maybe some wings, and a cold beer! Easily, hands down, the best bar and grill in Pittsburgh.
Cheap, unpretentious, and, for this, one of my favorite breakfast joints in the country.  Simply put I LOVE it here.  The mixed grill, the sausage and egg on a biscuit, the home fries.  This it the very definition of diner.  Thank you Gab 'n' Eat!
Love this place.  Never had a bad meal.  Good portions and great people.  Be ready to stand in line.
BEST DINER IN THE COUNRTY!!! We've been to many famous diners across the country and we still give  Gab and Eat the best rating !! I was a little intimidated when I first walked in and there was like 2 pounds of butter just sitting on top of the homefires on the grill.  If you are looking for a healthy breakfast they probably can accomodate you, but Everything I ate was clearly the opposite of healthy.  After trying like every meal they have I would recommend the mix grill(half unless you are sharing) adding cajun seasoning with the texas toast.  Burgers are great too.\n\nIt's hard to find a place that makes a better breakfast than you could make by yourself at home, but this place does it.  The atmosphere is classy, old school Americana.
I always love a good diner.  Gab and Eat was just what we were looking for on a Saturday morning.  Good food.  Great people. Pittsburgh ambiance. \n\nThis place is obviously a beloved neighborhood gem.  I had french toast and bacon.  The french toast was made with the best Italian bread.  My fiance had what they called a 'mixed grill.\"  It consisted of eggs, peppers, onions and home made sausage.  Not something you would eat everyday, but he loved it!   They also had great coffee.  They actually ground up the beans in front of us.  Now that's fresh.\n\nWe want to return sometime for \"turkey day.\"  Apparently they made fresh turkey every Tuesday.  Now that sounds good!\n\nCan't wait to return.
I have been coming to Gab n Eat for almost 20 years and They have never let me down. I get a typical breakfast if eggs, ham, toast, and home fries. Delicious as usual. The ambience however is usually lacking. The walls are dark, with writing and signatures of semi famous people all over the place. Pictures of local people hang on the walls(i secretly want mine up there) along with posters galore. While its fun to look at the first 10 times, it gets a little boring after awhile. So today when I arrived I expected the same old experience. Wow was I wrong! As soon as I looked at the door I knew something was different. The place seemed lighter and brighter. To my pleasant surprise, they painted and got new counter tops!! They're not quite done yet but the place has a new Happy vibe to it. The awesome breakfast, the new decor and the 5 guys sitting at the counter making me laugh are why I will be back( maybe for lunch).
What a find! I stopped in here for breakfast while in town for business. The service is so friendly I thought I was down south. The service was quick, frankly and felt like I was with family. \nFantastic poached eggs, Cajun homefries and crispy bacon. Gab and Eat is definitely a place I world recommend to locals. I was stuffed and the bill was only $8.00.
Great little place. Treats you like a local.Eaten here 3 times a week for a month.  Same overtime. Barb is always here.
Tonya is super sweet and the front desk people are very helpful
I needed alterations done to my suit very quickly. Like three days quickly. Not only did Filberto at Alteration World have it ready, the price was beyond reasonable and the work was EXCELLENT! I plan on bringing all my clothes to him from now on.\n\nOh and he let me know that they also dry-clean. Wonderful shop!
This location never disappoints!! Food is always consistently great, and if you come at the right time, (witching hours) you may see the cook singing and dancing along with the music in the back. And it is awesome! ! Love this place!!
I brought my husband and my parents all to Papa J's last time my husband and I were in Pittsburgh. My parents are really picky about their italian food, usually they drive places in east bumf*@ (tarentum, ligonier...) to get their capital I-talian.\n\nMy pop is kinda grumbly, and getting him to try something new is like pulling teeth. The only reason I got him here was becuase they were on their way to drop us at the airport.\n\nWell, my dad goes back now regularly and that says a lot, considering he lives in Murrysville. \n\nThe first good sign Dad was happy was that he seemed impressed when it was open- it was noon a few days after Christmas. Second good sign was that Dad ordered wine, at it was only 1 pm. Dad, while not a teetotaler, rarely has a drink before 5 pm so I know he was anticipating a good meal. The kicker was that he was so happy he left our waitress a $20 tip on a $50 meal. \n\nCan I say, I live in Texas now and I still relive this afternoon back in December? I had chicken picatta...it was perfect. My dad had eggplant rollatini, my mom had a pizza, and my hubby had basic pasta and marinara. It all was amazing, delicous, and inexpensive. In Austin, you can't get a decent italian meal, much less a decent italian meal for under $50 for four people.\n\nI know there are so many good Italian places in Pittsburgh but I just think back so fondly on this day...when me Dad liked someplace I took him :)
What a wonderful surprise found in Carnegie PA, just south of Pittsburgh.  I was in town on business with a couple co-workers and after having a not so great meal the night before, we asked one of the locals for a recomendation.  They told us to try this little Italian place called Papa J's and boy did they send us to a great place.\n\nFirst off, when you walk up to the place, the front and side windows give you a fantastic open view into the kitchen from the outside.  You can stand outside and watch the chef making all the wonderful food and you can smell the fresh bread before you even walk in the door.\n\nI am not sure how long this place has been around but the kitchen looked well used, while the dining area as well as the bar looked very clean and modern, almost as if it had been freshly updated.  \n\nThe server was quick to welcome us and suggested several different items off the menu as his favorites when asked.  The three of us were very hungry and wanting to try a few different things, so we began with a Margherita pizza which was absolutely perfect.  They obviously make their own breads and dough for the pizza and I don't think this pizza could have tasted any better.  Then came bowls of Italian wedding soup which was pretty good.  Of everything there, this was the one item I probably could have done without.  Not that it was bad, but there was nothing particularly special about it.  \n\nWe also ordered the Garlic Rolls (not that the bread they already give you and the pizza was not enough carbs for 1 meal) and they were to die for.  Crunchy on the outside and warm and chewy inside, these things were a meal by themselves.  One of the guys with me said the pizza sauce would be good on them so he ordered a cup of the pizza sauce (which is fresh made there, not out of some can) and he was right.  As if these little killer bread balls with garlic were not good enough, dipped in the pizza sauce they were even that much better.  \n\nBy the time our meals came, we were all pretty full, but we pushed on and continued to eat.  I had the Veal Parmigiano which was tender and very good.  It came with a side of pasta which I tasted just to try and it was excelent as well.  Had I not been eating a weeks worth of carbs in one sitting with all the pre-meal stuff, I certainly would have finished it.  As it was, I ate most but not all of the generous portion of veal.  \n\nOne of my co-workers had the Chicken Picatta which he said was one of the best he had ever had and the other guy tried a pasta dish which he said was very good as well.  \n\nThey had a great wine selection as well at reasonable prices by the glass or bottle.\n\nOverall a fantastic experience with great food and atmosphere.  I don't really know how expensive the area is for food, but coming from the Chicagoland area, I fouknd this place to be pretty reasonable.  The three of us ate very very well for an average of aproximately $30 each not including alcahol.  Fantastic fresh food at a reasonable price, who could ask for more.\n\nMy only complaint is that I had to return to Chicago and I am now craving to return to Papa J's.  I hope work sends me out here again sometime soon!!!
I love this place! The food is always so fresh and delicious. The staff is always friendly, as well.
It was just what we were looking for. The service was great. My husband had the veal sausage on green pepper appetizer in the larger size. It was great (spicy) and enough for a meal. I had the stuffed eggplant. That was very good but the sauce could have been a bit heartier. I would definitely go back. Really nice atmosphere and free parking in the back.
Some of the best chow around--love this place. The bread and salads and soups are great.
Finally, great Tuscan-style Italian food in Pittsburgh, not that tasteless stuff that locals think is Italian.\n\nThe bread was warm and fresh. The bolognese sauce was creamy and rich, and unlike most restaurants was made with veal. I love the fresh smell of baking bread throughout the restaurant.\n\nI'm looking forward to working my way through the menu of chicken options, and next time, I'm saving room for dessert! The display of cakes and pastries at the door was amazing.
Great location!  Close to shops and theatre.  Nice staff.
This Starbucks is 5-Star Friendly. The shift supervisor Lucious keeps the energy in there moving and light. He recently helped me with a merchandise return and embodied everything a good manager and all around mensch person should - patience, kindness, generosity and fairness. I left that afternoon loving Starbucks even more than when I went in. It's great that a company and their employees can be as loyal to their customers as their customers are to them.
Love this store!  Don't always have much luck with the sales, but I always find something I like here.  This isn't your average Marshall's or TJ Max.  I think the green dress I'm wearing is from Filene's!
Had a great time at Sing Sing a while ago with friends.  Friendly staff.  Will return.
Sing Sing is awesome!! Give a buck or more and they will play anything, and if they don't know it, they will search for who requested the song so they can do something else the person will enjoy! :) Great humor too!! :)
What a great time!  This place was awesome!  I wish I lived right down the road, because I could see myself being a regular here.\n\nHonestly, these guys have got some talent, like real talent.  They can play the piano, sing, play guitar, and the drums.  Did I mention that they are all pretty hilarious, too.  I'd easily pay the $7 cover to get in here any day because it really is worth it.  \n\nI am sure I will be back in no time at all.  Next time, I am bringing a big group of friends.
Went here for the first time this past weekend. Needless to say I'll be returning! It was a blast!!!\n\nIt was cheap to get in and since we got there a bit earlier we got a semi-good table. Though it was very annoying that people had reserved tables right up front and never showed up. WHAT IS WRONG WITH THESE PEOPLE?! Everything if you ask me! Seriously though if you're going to reserve a table, you better freaking go! \n\nI had no complaints about the place itself! The guys were hilarious and watching my brother get made fun of multiple times was just the cherry on top! Anddd this has to be the only place I've ever enjoyed being around people who were sloppy drunk, because the comedians take no prisoners! \n\nI did enjoy when Matt and Joey were the ones up there because they are just amazing and make it so much better! They are great at what they do. Can't wait to go back!
The food here can actually be a little hit and miss, but I love the grilled cheese club with fries. I get it way too much. People make fun of me.\n\nThey have a ten dollar minimum for credit cards, fyi.
Dave and busters is the best place to eat and play games. There is many fun games and prizes to win. I highly suggest if you want to plays games, go Wednesday when all the games are half off. Food is pretty good and a nice bar. The downside is that the booze is pretty pricey.
First off, let me say that I find the people who usually work at Dave and busters usually don't care or seem to be angry and hate their job. A friend and I went here and found that a couple of the machines ran out tickets and someone was always there and happy to help. The staff went out of their way to make sure we had a good time. The manager Tony was very sweet and made sure everything was ok. Every staff member we talked to was extremely nice. This is by far the best Dave and busters I've had been to!
I rarely give a business a superior rating, but I have to say my wife and I had one of the best dining experiences at the Rock Bottom Brewery.   The food was delicious,  the beer, every recipe sampled,  was amazing and the service was wonderful.  The staff made us feel like we were the most important guests in the restaurant. \n\nPlease support this business.  I guarantee you will not be disappointed.
Planned a surprise birthday party here for my wife and they did an amazing job helping to pull it off! Service was extremely helpful, professional, and on point all night. Lauren (one of the managers) was reliable and pleasant throughout the entire planning process. If anyone is looking to plan an event I would highly recommend Rock Bottom. Couldn't be happier!
This is the best Giant Eagle in the area and is the most like grocery stores in Bay Area. Here's why:\n\n1. They sell beer!\n2. Huuuuuge produce selection\n3. Natural/organic foods section: cereal, pasta, soups, etc and fancy chocolate bars\n4. Long isle of ethnic foods includes mexican, indian, italian, asian and , of course, jewish\n5. Functioning bakery with fresh, appetizing breads and desserts (I am still loyal to Allegro Hearth though)\n\nThe store is huge and I haven't been to all of it yet but they also have nicer flowers, balloons, home/seasonal section, DVD rentals and a photo center as well as a drive-through pharmacy. \n\nIt seems as this GE just might be the answer to my grocery stores woes.
Probably the most comprehensive supermarket in the county, if not all of southwestern PA. Its selection is considerably larger than what you can find in most Giant Eagles, and it has more upscale items. I live an easy walk from the Swissvale Giant Eagle, but I often drive to this location for the superior selection.
This is easily one of the best Giant Eagles I've ever been to. Huge. Very nice selection. Easily comparable to Whole Foods. Went to their cheese market, and was pleasantly surprised with the selection. I got Beemster Vlaskas, an amazing Gouda. Very large parking lot.
Such nice staff.  \n\nI really lament the decline of the modern bookstore.  I really enjoy browsing and picking up a new book.  \n\nThe store has a great selection and the staff are always helpful and kind.  \n\nI really hope this store stays here for some.  The prices are also fair and often have great discounts.
$1 burger night on Tuesday. Add ons more.
For some reason, I had a tremendous amount of anxiety about buying a new mattress. Maybe I was just self-conscious about rolling around on a bunch of beds in a public place. \n\nABD Mattress quickly alleviated any idiotic fears I may have had. The store was empty when I arrived on a Monday afternoon and I was attended to immediately and never felt pressured. ABD has a great selection of mattresses, and the prices cannot be beat. I picked up a full plush pillow-top mattress for a cool $375 (without a box spring or a frame, since I already had one). Better yet? Delivery is free AND prompt. You pick a three-hour timeframe, and the store will call you on the day of delivery to narrow it to a one-hour slot so you're not sitting around all afternoon.
I'm a mattress buying novice. I also hate buying things that require you to try-before-you-buy. I also seem to give explanatory information about myself before reviews. Anyway. \n\nI had a lot of anxiousness about buying a mattress. If it's terrible, you'll be spending a large proportion of your life in misery until you fix the problem. Who wants that? Especially for something that can be as expensive as a mattress? \n\nThese people were great. They patiently answered all of my mattress questions and treated me like a valued customer - both times I called, the man on the phone remembered my name (and number!) and took care of me. When I failed to buy a box spring (why oh why did I think I could go without a box spring??) they were able to take care of me over the phone and get me a box spring in the SAME day. Within hours, even. They even helped me set up the mattress that I DIDN'T purchase from them, which blew me away. \n\nTheir professionalism and friendliness are excellent. I will recommend them to everyone who's in the market for a mattress, especially students, because their student deals are fantastic.
Great customer service.  I was in Pittsburgh for business and needed a car to get back to the airport.  I found these guys on Yelp, and the reviews were not wrong.  It was easy to order the car and pick-up was prompt.
Our family loves this restaurant.  My children and I suffer from food allergies.   I have Celiac's Disease and their gluten free selection for a Chinese restaurant is great.  My children are a completely different ball game.  They have a rare disease called Eosinophilic Esophagitus where food attacks their body.  They are very limited on their food selctions due to not being able to consume any food with gluten, soy, eggs, dairy, nuts, tree nuts, fish, shellfish, amd corn.  This restaurant takes special care of my kids by making sure they get chicken that has not gone through the egg wash.  The servers and managers are all trained in how to be careful.  Our favorite manager is Joe and favorite server is Kevin.  Call ahead if you have any questions and they will answer your questions.
This place hit the spot. \n\nStopped here before a movie and ate at the bar. We got just what we wanted: quick service and some good eats. \n\nI recommend the fried green beans with aioli  -- soooo good! Who knew I liked green beans?! And this trip I tried some sushi and got the spicy tuna roll. Although it was clearly not pieced together by an expert sushi chef, it was extremely fresh and delish (so who cares if it's not beautiful?!)
Extremely helpful staff that knows exactly what shoes are comfortable yet stylish. The shoes I bought were high quality and durable. I was extremely impressed by the staff.
I only allow my dogs to go to Dr. Bezak. I've had a couple Chow Chow's who a lot of vets are afraid of. Doc had a Chow himself so knew what to look out for in the breed. He has taken good care of them over the years.
I went in to get my suit that I bought last year tailored because I had lost some weight and I couldn't have had a better experience. When I walked in I was immediately created by Bill who was warm and friendly. Anna came out to perform the measurements and mark up the suit. She checked everything, even changes I hadn't thought to have made to make sure the suit fits me perfectly when they are done. Best of all, when I asked if they could ship the suits to me at my house since I no longer live in Pittsburgh, they asked when I was leaving town and promised they would get it done for me before I left  the next day. Better yet, they had the suit ready for me early, avoiding the rush for me to pick it up before I left. Everyone was extremely helpful and diligent and I will continue to only get changes done at this store.
Great on line service!!!  2nd time placing an order on line and they made it easy as far as getting the correct sizes in a timely manner.
We just completed our wedding registry at the Homestead location. The customer service was outstanding! One of the employees, Chris, walked around with us to help us pick out exactly what we needed. The wedding registry coordinator, Christina, was also very helpful and accommodating. They treated us as if we were royalty. I would recommend this wedding registry without a doubt!
Great location!  I love that you can substitute burger with a veggi patti and that they have gluten free bread.  Love love love the smiley cookies :)
A very nice meal in a very nice restaurant\n\nPROS:\nVery good food\ninteresting choices--not your typical red lobster crap\nGreat service\nVery clean (restrooms, included)\n\nCONS:\nn/a
Beautiful decor. Very genuine staff. Very clean washrooms. Delicious food. I tried the market trio. The blackened tilapia was nice with a little bit of spice. This is a great place for a seafood lover.
My husband and I went to Mitchell's last summer for our wedding anniversary. We both took a half day at work and we arrived in the early afternoon (after lunch but before the dinner crowd). I can't say enough about this place...we have gone here on a few occasions and I've always been please with everything. \n\nPros: Nice friendly waitress, who took some time to take our picture (since it was our anniversary), food was excellent and not extremely overpriced, restaurant and bathrooms were clean!\n\nCons: None on this visit or any previous visits
Went for dinner Friday evening with friends and sat at the outdoor patio. It is so nice and relaxing there with the river and bike trail. The sourdough bread they serve is always hot and fresh. The Chilean sea bass just melts in your mouth, it was awesome. The Cod stuffed with shrimp and lobster was also very good. I had the carrot cake for dessert, it is big enough for 3 people. It was so delicious. My friend had the creme  br\u00fbl\u00e9e, which she said was very good. I was here 3 times this summer and every meal was excellent.
This is the best experience I've had at a bike store in the Pittsburgh area.  I have been shopping around for a couple months for a new road bike (which was going to be my first road bike ever, meaning that I'm fairly clueless about how to pick one out).  Also, since I'm a student, I don't have particularly deep pockets.\n\nAt Big Bang, I was greeted basically the moment I walked in the door.  I'm kind of shy when I know that I don't really know what I'm doing, but I wasn't pressured or harassed in any way by the staff.  Even though my price range was pretty low, they still tried their hardest to find a bike that suited my needs, and they found a bike that fitted me perfectly (and gave me an *excellent* deal on the price).  They take a lot of care to make sure you're properly fitted to the bike.\n\nAlso, this is one of the few bike stores I've been to where test riding is gleefully encouraged, rather than grudgingly allowed.  Definitely it's the only bike store where they'll tell you \"You haven't tried it out enough, go climb up the hill on  it!\" -- they definitely put the emphasis on matching rider with bike, rather than making a quick sale.\n\nI would definitely recommend this place to anyone who's looking for a road bike, whether they're a seasoned racer or a neophyte rider like me.
Big Bang Bicycles is phenomenal! Amazing selection and service! I live in the San Francisco, Bay Area with plenty of premium bicycle shops available, but I do most of my cycling shopping at Big Bang Bicycles when I visit family in Pittsburgh. This shop carries top gear and has in stock tons of options so you can see, feel and evaluate them first hand to know what's going to give you the best feel and performance. Glenn, the owner, is very knowledgeable, friendly and you can feel his passion for cycling and making sure you get the right product and fit for you.  Even if you're not in the Pittsburgh area but you know what you want -- send your order to Big Bang Bicycles and I'm certain you'll have a great experience. Awesome shop! Thank you Glenn and team!
I have been looking for 3 years for good crab rangoon - I finally found it!!!  We had boneless ribs that were absolutely wonderful.  Definitely going back!!!
Ok this is my first yelp review, I never left any reviews for other restaurants, but I am writing it because I want others to know about this place more.\n\nRestaurant run by family. very friendly, clean cooking environment, and Great food. I would come to this place again and again whenever I visit Pittsburgh.\n\nIts less than 10min drive from Kennywood, if you are visiting Kennywood you should definitely try this place.
Came here from PGH for the first time.  This bakery is legit.  I bought some Rye bread and Italian 5 grain.  Delicious.  A strange snickerdoodle thing with pink frosting.  Delicious. Chocolate chip cookie dipped in chocolate, extra chewy and humongous.  Delicious.\n\nAnd a sweet old lady serving em up.\n\nThe best.\n\nDelicious.
Love butter? Then get thee to Pierogies Plus.\n\nI live in St. Louis, and it seems like the only pierogi I can find are in my grocer's freezer. Oh, but when I go home to Pittsburgh, I can have as much of the chewy, flavorful, buttery goodness as I desire from Pierogies Plus.\n\nThe place still looks like an old service station with a tiny building and a roof over an old gas pump island. Inside, though, magical elves... uh... I mean fabulous Polish women... create deliciousness with love -- and butter. Have I mentioned that butter is a part of the deal? Because it totally is. You really should fast for two days before picking up pierogi from here.\n\nOh, but you'll be happy you did. I'm vegetarian, so I only order meat-free pierogi. I'm in love with the saurkraut and the cheese varieties. When you pick up a hot order, you'll get your pierogi covered in with rich butter and sauteed onions. No, I'm serious -- the pierogi are SWIMMING in butter. It's the best thing ever. Everything is packed inside a styrofoam container and a plastic bag, because butter WILL spill out.\n\nYou also can order cold or frozen pierogi if you plan to, say, lug them to the middle of the country to enjoy in a far-off city.\n\nBesides many varieties of pierogi, you also can get things from the deli cases. Last time, I had some apricot blintzes, a latke and some type of apple turnover thingy. I really hope Pierogies Plus has the blintzes when I visit next.\n\nAwesome thing: Pierogies Plus usually has coupons in the Entertainment Book. My best friend and I steal all of the coupons from our families so that I can get a steady stream of discounted Polish goodness each time I visit.\n\nThe only downside is that Pierogies Plus often closes for several days around holidays. I totally understand it -- family time is important! -- but that often coincides with my visits (I head east around the holidays mainly because I get an extra day with the fam without having to take another vacation day). I've learned to plan my trips around the Pierogies Plus schedule, though, because I MUST have yummy goodness. A pierogi-less Allison is a cranky Allison.
Best pierogies in tahn!  \n\nI usually just go with the standard potato and cheese but I've also tried a few of the other pierogies and some of the plus.  These pierogies can't be beat.  Made by hand with love in the traditional old world style, I have yet to find better.\n\nIt's amazing to get there at 10:55am, 5 minutes before they open and see the mad rush of people getting pierogies.  By 11am, the line is already out the door.  Always a good sign.  They serve their pierogies hot, cold or frozen.  I always go with the hot because nothing beats pierogies bathing in butter and onions.  And here at Pierogies Plus, they are definitely worth the wait.
Just finished a dinner of pierogies that our Pgh family brought to WV - always look forward to Pierogies Plus - try the apricot for a sweet treet!
On a random Sunday morning I went in search of a good breakfast spot.  I decided to explore the McKees Rocks neighborhood and came upon Marge's Place.  I hadn't heard much about this place, but after reading the few reviews I could find, I decided to give it a try.  \n\nInside, it's bigger than I expected but still has that down home diner feel.  My guess is that most of the people there were regulars.  The wait staff was friendly to those they knew but also welcoming to me, someone they had never seen before.  I picked a table in the corner so I could observe what I imagine was a typical Sunday morning.  I ordered the breakfast special: 2 scrambled eggs with bacon, potatoes and toast.  Any place that has Mancini's Italian toast already gets thumbs up in my book.  Being in McKees Rocks, though, they really don't have a choice.  The potatoes were thin sliced with onions and very flavorful.  The only way I can think of to describe the bacon is...porkier.  Is that even a word?  I just don't know how else to descibe it.  The combination of foods was served in generous portions at a great price (under $5).  \n\nOne random note: I liked the tables and chairs.  They were comfortable not just for sitting and enjoying a cup of coffee with my morning paper but also very comfortable for sitting and eating.  Good distance between the table and chairs.  That may sound silly, and I thought so, too, at first.  But when I go to a place and the booth is too wide or too narrow, it can hinder my enjoyment.  \n\nNot only will I return, but I will also recommend Marge's Place to anyone in the area.  It was a surprisingly good find.  I like places like neighborhood businesses like this where they make everyone feel like they belong.
Great service, friendly staff, great food, great prices. What more can you ask for in a small town breakfast place? Will definitely be back
Luigi's pizza is amazing! The sicilian pizza takes me back to how my grandma used to make homemade pizza. I can't wait to go back - definitely worth the 45-minute trip there :)
This is my favorite 'event' restaurant (by which I mean, spendy, but definitely worth it for special occasions).  It is great for intimate birthdays, celebrations, etc.  Whatever karmic intervention gave the 'Bustling Borough of Bellevue' this restaurant makes me think we, as a community, has done something right. \n\nBut more importantly the food...  Oh, the food!  The owner/chef takes so much care, it makes the whole experience very enjoyable.  I have never had a bad meal.  \n\nI
Yes!!!!!!\n\n\n\n\nGreat service!\nGreat Food!\nLove the BYOB!!! ($5).
Let me just tell you, I have really, really difficult hair.  type 3b Naturally curly, 100% grey, I dye it dark and mess with the color myself. ( never good)  If you want to know where to get a good haircut you ask someone with my hair. Since I have been going to Mane Attractions I have really LOVED my hair. I have been going there for about 4 years. Kristi was even able to cut my curly hair into a short reverse bob without making me look like i was wearing a helmet. ( you curly girls know what I am talking about). I have had nothing but complements on my hair and even my mom( who is always honest) is impressed. The only complaint I ever have is that yes, sometimes I have gone there on the spur of the moment and it has been closed during the week. I just know to call and schedule things. it is a small business and I get it.  P.S. kids haircuts are only 10$ and My daughter loves it.
Quite possibly the best bakery in Pittsburgh.  It's got everything from the low-end (cookies, cupcakes, donuts) to the high (wedding cakes, tortes, tarts).  Make any special or large orders weeks in advance.  The tastiest wedding cake I ever sampled was from here: smooth buttercream icing with alternating raspberry and lemon filling in white batter.
Woo Hoo!  Dead Lady.\n\nThis thrift store rocks.  I have been doing this for more years that I haven't been, and it is the best in the city.\n\nI would make a weekly trek to RWB, and would never be disappointed.  These were the days when you could find a vintage 50s something or other on the racks, before there was a \"Vintage\" section.  Still, recently, there is always a treasure to be had, especially in the housewares department.  The proximity of this thrift store to the affluent neighborhood of Sewickley accounts for its top-notch merch.  Whenever we'd have a particularly good day, my frends and I would joke...\"dead lady.\"
I came here all the time while I was freelancing and in charge of my own schedule.  It has a lot of points going for it that other thrift shops consistently mess up.\n\n1. It's well lit.  You can SEE the clothing, see whatever might be wrong with it, and make an honest assessment.  You're never surprised when you leave at the state of the items you've just bought.\n\n2. It is surprisingly clean.  Nothing seems to smell, so I can only imagine they've laundered everything thoroughly. \n\n3. There are good quality brands--Ann Taylor, Kenneth Cole, etc.  It's mainly items along these lines.  You're more likely to find twinsets than clubbing tops here, which if you're over the age of 21 is a good thing.\n\n4. Markdowns and fresh merchandise.  These people *know* how to turn over their stock.  Because the place is never empty, and there are specials every day, the stock flips rapidly.  The merchandise is never the same week to week, so as I mentioned before, it's addictive.  You never know what you'll find.\n\nA summary of a few things I've bought here: a 6 dollar designer knit dress, a few silk twinsets ($2-$5), countless heels, two pairs of Birkenstocks and two pairs of Doc Martens ($4-$8), a dressmaker's bust ($5), a pressure cooker ($7)....\n\nYou get the picture.  The prices aren't rock bottom, but close enough, and the quality of the clothing will help anyone but the stingiest person get over the 50 cents extra.\n\nCan't recommend it enough!
Simply the best thrift store I've ever been to. Well worth the 3 1/2 hour drive from my hometown.\n\nFirst, and foremost, EVERYTHING IS 1/2 off all of the time!\n\nSecondly, bring cash. They DO NOT accept credit cards.\n\nThe store is full of wonderful pieces of clothing, all arranged by color and type (not by size, which is unfortunate). I found a wide selection of everything from casual pieces to high-end business attire to super-trendy teen clothing... what surprised me most about this store was the QUALITY of the clothing. Almost all of the pieces were flawless, a few were worn or faded in some way and the price reflected that. Brand names were bountiful; Banana Republic, Ralph Lauren, Chico's, Jones New York, Ann Taylor, American Eagle, H&M. There were also some wonderful vintage pieces from the 80s, bright colors and crazy shoulder pads that would have made a more adventurous fashionista very happy indeed!\n\nThe clothing smells wonderful, not musty or dirty as in some thrift stores, and there was even a large selection of plus-sized clothing carefully culled out in a special section.\n\nI went to Red White & Blue to find some business attire for my new job, and came home with two gorgeous, flawless statement blazers from Ann Taylor Loft and Banana Republic... for a total of $7!\n\nCome to this thrift store; it'll make all other shopping obsolete!
Ever shopped at a Thrift Shop that sells high end labels, some brand new and gently used items like backpacks for $5? This is a great place to discover unique things. They also have daily deals such as 1/2 off of certain color tags. Have to dig through other things though to find something interesting which is part of the adventure!
I love a deal, and this has been my favorite thrift store since I was a kid.  \n\nFirst, there is some sort of half-off deal every day.\n\nSecond, the used book selection is pretty decent.  Yeah, there are a ton of self-help and Patterson mass markets that you have wade through, but T.C. Boyle for two bucks?  Yes, please.\n\nThird, the home goods.  I've gotten huge solid wood picture frames for only a couple dollars.  The art prints inside were hideous...but I threw those away, re-stained the frames to my liking, cut new mats, and inserting art quoted as $360 each to frame at a big chain fabric store for under $30.  Boom.\n\nFinally, there is a decent selection of lamp to re-wire, always lot of furniture, some diamond in the rough clothes on occasion, and lots of other wacky stuff that's just fun to sift through.\n\nCASH ONLY and the cashiers are pretty rude/lazy, but that never bothers me.\n\nBONUS:  They pick up your donations for free from your porch.  http://www.pickupplease.org/  Super easy.
I love love LOVE this store. I thought the one on Saw Mill Run was great but this was i think is way awesomer. If only awesomer were a word. I love to go here and find lots of home decor items to decorate my house. candle holders, DIning sets, paints, sculptures and sooo much more. I found this small desk lamp that has a victorian look to it with the shade included for $4. The lamp shade was made of some kind of smooth material almost like leather. It's such a great find. There are plenty of items for sale at this place and most of them are in great shape. \n\nSo the clothes which occupy most of the store are the best find. The Store has certain days that offer you %50 certain color tags. I went on a Monday and it was half off yellow and white tags. Other days its half off blue, or green or red. I love to go on Saturdays!! This past week it was half off every tag except white. I found so many items for such a cheap price. $7 shirts for $3.50 and tunics for $4. Have you ever find items for $1?? I have!!! I love when I find a great shirt or sweater for $3 or less. Or when you find a brand new item with the tags on them for under $7. I bought a brand new pair of Arizona Jeans (in my size) for $5. I couldn't believe it. I was too excited.\n\nThe clothes are organized by color but not by size which is a good and bad thing. I like to shop by color since I don't wear too many yellows or purples. I can avoid those sections all together but when I do find a nice shirt in the color I want the size becomes an issue. There were a lot of nice shirt that were just too small or too big. Even when i have to pass on a nice shirt I tend to find one that's just as good at the same price. \n\nShopping here is a gold find!! My sister was the one who introduced me to this store and i used to make fun of her for shopping thrift. If I had known that It was nothing like the Good Will I would have been here a lot sooner. Now my sister makes fun f me for going so often. What an amazing place this is!! I'll probably never shop retail again!!\n\nREMINDER: CASH ONLY!!\n-But they have an ATM!! $2.50 fee
Place has amazing omelettes that are almost as big as the size of the plate. You get a really big side of home fries too. This is probably my favorite place for breakfast in Pittsburgh. I generally go in and get a seat right away without waiting. Service is usually fast and friendly. Two downsides to the place. 1) they are cash only which can be an inconvenience. I never remember to have cash until I get my bill so I have to run to the ATM. 2) the seating is limited and the tables are very close to each other so people there can most likely hear your conversations. Place overall is excellent and is worth a try at least for breakfast. The lunches and dinner selections aren't bad either!!
Thank You Kim and Kurt! It was very nice of you guys to take the time to post your reviews on our service. We really appreciate it. We hope your clocks will continue to do well for years to come. Please dont hesitate to give us a call if there's anything else we can do for you.\n\nLisa\nPaul's Clock Repair
I can not express my thanks & gratitude enough to everyone at Paul's Clock Repair.  I needed an Atmos clock repaired, which was given to me by my mother who had recently passed away.  I needed it done on a short time line since I live out-of-town and was leaving soon.  It is next to impossible to find anyone who can actually fix that type of clock especially anywhere close to where I live.  They were so accommodating and really really helped me out during a hard time.  Much thanks to Lisa for spending the time to teach my about the clock & how to take care of it and her dad for fixing it up!  My Atmos clock is now working great and looks wonderful on my mantle!
\"God this is the best eggplant that I have ever tasted!\"  was what our friend said after he took his first bite of the Sicilian eggplant served at Pino's.  My husband couldn't wait to have the seafood fra diavlo, which he had last time...again, a 10 out of 10!  I had the roasted veggie platter for my entree, which is really an appetizer--and I had to share--way too much for one person to eat.  Another comment from our friend (who was a first timer at Pino's) was that it was the best Italian dressing that he ever had.  As I write, I want to go back for dinner tonight!!\n\nForgot to mention, they also have local beers on tap (East End Brewery), the men enjoyed the Homewood brew (dark lager type beer), it's great to see the owners supporting local businesses!
Another really good meal here!  My friend and I went for soup and appetizers--and licked the plates clean!  Gazpacho, pasta fagiole, homemade bread, eggplant with mozzarella and my favorite...the roasted veggie platter.  So much food we didn't think we would eat it, but it was so good we did!  They also had their doors open and we were able to sit outside in the cool summer air--great way to kick of summer!
There was absolutely nothing not to like.  Reasonably priced wines, home style Italian cooking. Great upbeat ambience.
I been going to this place since the 90s and this place is the MIDDLE CLASS GE. I stopped going to this place since I got a job at whole foods. My mom went here a two weeks ago for the first tine in a long time she say that the people are still there and the place looks better and the people are a lot friendly now. \nSo if you don't what too shop at a Middle Class food store in East Liberty then go to The Market in Shadyside.
According to Urbanspoon (blasphemy I know) their are like 1,100 pizza places in pittsburgh. So what is the best pizza in Pittsburgh. Everyone has an opinion and so here is mine: The best pizza in Pittsburgh is the pie comes from the place in you neighborhood that has quality ingredients, fair prices, and friendly service. Eddie's Pizza Place  is all of these things and since I live in this neighborhood this is my favorite.
My wife and I have been going here for as long as we have lived in Pittsburgh, which is about 10 years.  This is our go-to Chinese restaurant, even after we moved out of the neighborhood.  I have never had a bad meal here, and I will forever love their beef chow fun!  My wife and I are moving to North Carolina in two days, and Tasty Chinese was the thing about Pittsburgh that we said we would miss the very most.  These are great folks, and I wish them the best of success in the future.  Remember, everyone, just because you read a negative review it does not mean that the food is bad!  Some people just have lousy taste buds, and many people have no idea what they are ordering to begin with.  Try things for yourself, and you will find some great food at Tasty!
Home of the Italian Army.\n\nVento's is located in the East Liberty section of Pittsburgh right next to Home Depot. They have been in business forever! They are a pizza and hoagie shop. They are famous for their Italian Army hoagie. I have friends that as soon as they land in Pittsburgh they come straight to Vento's for the pizza! It is Sicilian style pizza and It is delicious! Everything is made fresh so sometimes you have to wait a little while for your food. It's best to call ahead if you're really hungry.\n\nThey have tables and booths for seating. You can even play the PA lottery there. \n\nNo debit or credit cards. CASH ONLY!\n\n(F.Y.I. There is a generic ATM that charges $1.75 to make a withdraw.)
The people that work here make an unfortunate incident a breeze to work through.  I woke up one morning to find a note attached to my windshield to inform me that I was the victim of a hit and run.  The damage was minimal, but after calling it into my insurance company, they directed me to come here.\n\nWithin minutes of me hanging up my phone with the insurance company my phone was ringing to indicate that Mikes was calling to set up an appointment to get my car in for an estimate.  I set up an appointment that was convenient for me and went about my day.\n\nWhen I arrived here to have my car viewed it was quite the easy task.  My wait was minimal, the staff were polite and I wasn't being jerked around.  Within five minutes of them looking at my car, I was out the door and heading back to my place.  \n\nUnfortunately, they did not do any work to my vehicle at this point because the police are still looking into the person that hit my car.  But if we get to that step, I am confident that they could not do anything wrong in my eyes.  If their body work for a vehicle is anything like their customer service, they are definitely one of the best places to go in the city.\n\nYes people, this isn't the best neighborhood in the city, but get over it.
Mikes took my car after horrible repairs/service from Kenny Ross South.  The service was great and I even got to meet the owner who came out to personally speak with me on a busy Friday afternoon.  Great guys there.
I had a great experience taking my vehicle to Mike's for repair after a fender bender. I used the Geico express service - I booked the estimate and repair online for the next day. When I dropped off my car, they were expecting me, it took less than 30 minutes and every single person I encountered at the shop was helpful and friendly and showed concern for me. The damage was minor, and the repairs took less than 48 hours to complete. My policy provides a rental car, and Enterprise was there when I checked in with my vehicle and the rental process was streamlined and easy. When I picked up my repaired car, it was just as efficient and friendly. Getting into an accident is frustrating and inconvenient and costly but Mike's Auto Body made the process of fixing things and getting me back on the road into a good experience. I wish more businesses treated their customers like Mike's treated me.
I'm a crazy cat lady and proud of it! \n\nBeing a volunteer here has been so fulfilling on many different levels.  It has made me feel so good to be able to help out with something that I feel passionately about.  You can tell that the staff puts a lot of effort into taking care of these animals they accept in.  A lot of times people will say, oh I can't do it, it's too sad.  But the thing is, it's not.  It's actually so great because these animals come here and find loving homes instead of being on the street or in an environment that's toxic.  I rarely see animals there for a long time.  I think that's a testament to the way they are treated while they're in the facility. \n\nNow I'll admit, I'm not the biggest dog fan, so I help out in the cat shelter.  I can talk about that with a lot more knowledge than the dog side.  They just built a new cat facility on their property so they have their own shelter.  The cats are all set up in a huge room.  They have two rooms for people to play with the cats when they are looking to adopt them.  These rooms are also used for \"cat cuddling.\"  That's what I do when I volunteer.  I get to take the cats out so that they can play, be cuddled or just run around.  Then the cats are able to get out of the cages and get used to human contact. \n\nThe other great thing about the ARL is that they have foster parents who take in cats and dogs while they're waiting to be adopted.  This way, they get a great home environment and it relieves the facility of having too many animals at one time. At different points in the year the adoption rates are different depending on the amount of animals they have.  Cat rates are usually cheaper in the Spring/Summer because there's more coming in and dog rates are cheap in the late summer months.  The added bonus of adopting a pet from the ARL is that they are spade or neutered when you adopt them.  It's actually cheaper then taking them to a normal vet on your own. \n\nI would STRONGLY recommend coming here to check out the animals and hopefully find your next furry friend!  OR you can volunteer!  They have volunteer informational sessions the first Saturday of every month.  After that you only have one training session to complete and you're ready to volunteer!  \n\nJust check it out if you're curious.  You won't regret it!  Your new furry friends will appreciate it as well!
I have an almost three-year-old cat named Jack that I spoil as if he were my son. I honestly never experienced the love for and from an animal until I adopted Jack from an Animal Rescue League. It was one of the best decisions I've ever made.\n\nThe shelter is great and I'll probably get another cat in the near future. Check this location out!
I adopted a dog from the ARL this past spring.  During the adoption process the employees were polite and seemed genuinely happy for me.  Shortly after the adoption, I received emails from a volunteer to check in and to inquire about how the dog and I were adjusting.  A few months after the adoption, it became clear that the dog had some pretty serious anxiety and behavioral issues (please note that there is no way the shelter staff could have known about the issues while the dog was in the shelter).  I contacted the shelter and they practically  bent over backwards to help me with the dog's issues.  The dog and I participated in two sessions of behavioral classes (Lacey is wonderful and never gave up on my dog!), consulted with veterinary staff, and received constant emails from staff offering suggestions and checking in to see how I was doing.  In the end, I learned how to manage the dog's behaviors and I love the dog dearly.  Nine months later, I still receive emails from the shelter asking about the dog and offering more suggestions.\n\nI would highy suggest adopting from this shelter.  I understand that my dog is sort of a worse-case-senerio of adopting a pre-owned dog; however, this shelter will make sure you are happy with your adoption and literally will do everything in their power to ensure both you and the adopted animal are ok.  The shetler staff care deeply about the animal AND the human's well-being!
This place is PHENOMENAL.\nI got my bunny here a few months ago and the ladies were so nice and helpful and they take SUCH good care of the animals.  They gave me a bit of hay and food for her that lasted me close to three months.  Then when we were leaving we saw a cage of six dwarf hamsters and they gave us a deal of 2/$10.\nI love my animals so much and I will always check here first for pets before anywhere else.
This is one of my two favorite coffeehouses in town. It took me far too long to come around and love Tazza D'oro. A horrible ex of mine loved this place and I admit that this soured me. I regret the time I wasted not going here. The dark wood inside comforts me. The small tables outside are a great place to spend the summer. \n\nTazza D'Oro brews Batdorf and Bronson beans (amazing), provides Enrico pastries (amazing) free wireless (amazing) and one of the most talented and friendly staffs I've ever met (amazing). Everyone who works there is *so* nice and *so* good at what they do. \n\nThey have a small menu of local/fresh food that looks amazing, but I have never actually eaten it. The espresso served here is actually better than the average shot served at Batdorf and Bronson locations in Olympia, WA. I talked about this with one of the barristas at TD'o and they were offended - \"we calibrate our machines the same, we use the same beans, the exact same blends and milks and everything, it can't be different.\" Sorry, Tazza D'oro, you are better. \n\nThe lines get long on weekend mornings, but they move quickly. There's a sense of community nestled here, just off the \"main drag\" of Highland Park, between Bryant st. and the reservoir. This is where you can pick up your CSA shipment for the week, where multiple weekly bike rides originate, where there are lively discussion groups meeting nearly every day. The percentage of students is low. Like the rest of Pittsburgh, there's a good chance you'll run into someone you know, but generally I see people I like and miss, which is different than the norm in Pittsburgh for me.
Tazza D'Oro has a generally European decor, with dark, rich colors and textures, and a cozy layout that makes the most of the space. The espresso is, bar none, the best I've had - including my admittedly limited travels in Italy. It's stellar espresso - rich, thick, potent without being sour or bitter, with unique nuances that vary slightly depending on the shot and the weather, but are always fantastic.\n\nThe coffee is also terrific, and Tazza D'Oro uses Batdorf & Bronson beans - the best I've ever had for home grinding. They have a good selection of pastries and cookies, as well as a broad selection of tasty sandwiches that come with a satisfying side salad.\n\nIn addition, they have a wonderful selection of teas; I'm no expert, and don't know their supplier, but the half-dozen different blends I've tried were all memorably flavorful.\n\nAll that, and it's a lovely center of community, where you can bring your laptop or a book or a friend and spend the day. No one is rushed out the door, and there almost always seems to be a little room for your studies or conversation.
The coffee here was excellent! Had a double espresso. Apparently their roaster is in Santa Cruz Ca. Large selection of French Press Coffees. Baked goods did not look too great but that is not why I came here. Atmosphere is very mellow and comfortable. Also has Wifi which works! Nice to find a place like this when traveling. Is in the middle of a residential area and there doesnt seem to be anything else around here.
I love tazza.. Their coffees are excellent and its a great place to enjoy a relaxing evening..I also like their Baklawa, sandwiches and Brownies..
Best coffee in Pittsburgh, without a doubt. Believe the hype. I've been going here for years, and every visit is a pleasure.
local, friendly businesses serving a great product DO still exist.
The coffee here is amazing (I love when the baristas take the effort to make patterns in the foam). The baristas were extremely friendly and the pastries looked delicious. While there are a number of tables, Enrico's was busy even on a Friday night...I would imagine that it would be hard to find a table during peak hours.
BEST COFFEE IN PITTSBURGH!\n\nYou might think there is better coffee elsewhere.  You're wrong!\n\nI love this coffee shop, and there is a second location the Gates Building at CMU that I like to go to--their panini are to die for.\n\nI love this place, and you will too!
Really hard to find a good cup of coffee in the states... I'd say this is the best  cappuccino I've had since Italy.
I adore this place! The light green walls are serene, the chairs and tables are comfortable, and I love their little brownies with three kinds of chocolate chips in them! The coffee is perfectly smooth and rich, which is the most important thing to get right. (I'm not into masking the taste of burnt espresso with a mocha!) If a place can provide me with a cup of coffee that doesn't taste like it will give me an ulcer, I'll be a fan for life. The only other Pittsburgh place where I've found coffee this delicious was at Commonplace Coffee in Squirrel Hill. I went to college near Chicago and come from California. I count Intelligentsia and Blue Bottle Coffee as some of my favorite places, so I mean it when I say the coffee here is wonderful. Try it out, you won't be let down.
Smiley's is wonderful... filled with things to keep our trio of cats well-fed, well-treated, and well-entertained. Certainly this is not a big box store, but, honestly, I wouldn't give my pets 99% of the food, treats, or toys that can be found in those stores, so, really, Smiley's offers me a better selection of what I actually want than any big box does. (They have a very good selection of toys for cats!)  And Smiley's takes bulk orders and has the food within a few days... saving us the trouble of schlepping out to the 'burbs.
The most important quality a mechanic can have is honesty. Meet Tim Walter. When I take my car to Walter's I know the service will be good, fast and won't take a chunk out of my last paycheck. Calling ahead is usually a good idea so they can fit you in...
I just want to echo what everyone else has already said about this mechanic.  My brakes gave out and I came upon the glowing reviews for Walter's, so I gave them a call.  Not only did Tim fix my car quickly and inexpensively, he actually came to pick it up himself so that I wouldn't have to spend money on a tow truck!  He's also an extremely friendly, funny guy who puts you at ease immediately.  I'll be going back there without hesitation the next time I need anything done on my car.
Scenario: Get into my car at 3:30 and head to campus for a meeting. All of a sudden, the tire warning signal lights up even though I don't remember running over anything. I get out of the car to carefully inspect my tires and they feel/look completely OK. But after owning a BMW for 3 years and having constant wheel alignment/tire issues (ie. when a tire warning signal lights up, it usually means my tire's about to blow out!!), I freaked out and frantically drove my Infiniti to the first 3 auto shops on Baum Blvd. I waited at the first stop for 5-10 minutes and the guy did not get off the phone. I got back into the car and drove it over to Pep Boy's where a mechanic was outside smoking. He says I need to go through their service desk (inside their huge store) and deal with them first. I'm thinking, \"ugh. no time. I have class in 40 minutes and I'm already late to my meeting.\" I drive past the 3rd shop and I don't even see anyone sitting at the reception desk and figure it's going to take forever to get what I'm asking for.\n\nThen, I remembered the really positive experience I had with Walter's. I decided to drive to the end of Baum Blvd. to find his place and boy, am I glad I did. As soon as I got there, the service coordinator told me to pull my car around front so that their mechanic could take a look at my tires. He stopped what he was doing to do this and told me I could just stay in my car. Then, he reassured me that my tires were OK and he proceeded to inflate them, explaining to me why the signals might have come on.\n\nFree of charge, in and out within 5 minutes, and helpful/reassuring. I love this about Walter's Automative. They're not out just to make money. They genuinely just want to help. Highly reccommend!!
Great place. I take my car there for everything. Inexpensive, friendly, and knowledgeable. They've fixed my tire, taped a broken hose temporarily, and done other things for no charge several times. I'd definitely recommend them.
I thought I need an alignment and turns out all I needed was a tire balance. I stopped by he had me go with him and we drove around the block. I didn't cost me a thing because the tire balance was under warranty. Really  nice guy.
I had to get a new mechanic since I recently moved here. That worried me, a lot, as I own a VW. Thankfully I found all these reviews on Yelp about Walters and decided to give it a shot. \n\nRules about Walters: Plan at least two weeks ahead for an appointment. It is worth it. \n\nFrom there you don't have to worry about anything. On my particular car I always have to fix the suspension, and I ended up needing the same repair from last year. Last year I spent $1,300 from my very reasonable and trustworthy mechanic I had been using for years at home. This year Walters quoted me just under $700. I was pretty blown away by that considering the other place I go to is just as down to earth as Walter's.\n\nWalters took the time to put my tennis racquets in my trunk and remove my aftermarket stereo so they wouldn't be seen. He explained everything to me thoroughly and was really friendly when I came to pick up my car. \n\nI know a lot about cars and mechanics since I've worked at a dealership and the honesty of Walters still amazes me. I will take my car here every time I need to get something done, even if I get a newer car with a warranty from a dealership.
Hands down a great experience! I called yesterday as the driver headlight on my car was out and asked if I needed to make an appointment. The woman on the phone said to just stop right by during their hours. I went by this morning and their (small) lot was full so I just sat in my car while I believe who was Tim was finished chatting with another guy. I continued to sat in my car for a couple of minutes while Tim quickly inspected my headlight. Unfortunately he did not have any replacement bulbs but ordered them right on the spot while I was there and told me to come back any time in the afternoon. Fast forward a few hours later. I  just popped by and after popping my hood and going into their office to pay, my headlight was replaced! Friendly, honest, fair and quick service. No BS. Highly recommend Walter's Automotive.
I have an older car and so sometimes things go wonky. One night I had to drop it off because it was barely running and I had no idea why. This was the first time I went to Walter's, turns out that it was only an oil changing problem. Car places usually screw me over because I know nothing about cars, but Walters did not. They are really great and fix the car for your needs. Yesterday I returned for inspection and once again he treated me fairly and only mentioned things that I already knew needed work. I would recommend this place to anyone with an older car and wants an honest car repair man. Walter's will definitely be getting my business in the future!
Honest. Reliable. Trust Worthy.\n\nTim goes above and beyond with his service. He came to my house 3x one day to check everything he could before I ended up towing it to the garage. I will definitely go back!
Extremely honest, great work and amazing prices. I had them repair a wheel issue on my car. For no charge the mechanic also hid some wires I never got around to moving for the DYI back-up camera I installed.
Named for Pittsburgh greats, Gene Kelly and Billy Strayhorn, this historic theater is a real gem.  Originally the Regent, built in 1914, the building was renovated in 2000 as a performing arts center for theater, dance, music and film.  I have been to several fundraisers hosted by the Kelly Strayhorn, and they have always been first rate.  Also, I recently attended the Kelly Strayhorn's own fundraiser, Full Bloom, which was lots of fun.  As a venue, this place is definitely worth your attention, and the staff seems to bend over backward to make sure events go off without a hitch.
Plays well with a Tazza latte around the corner! The quiche was divine and the the biscuits were what I imagine my mom would have made had she actually made biscuits. Two words: YUM-OH! Cannot wait to return to the Steel City so I can partake in some of the desserts.
This place has probably some of the best pastries I've ever encountered.  The treats are consistently great to amazing to even mouth watering.  The bakery is this quaint little place that is really cute with nice baking decorations and everything.  The staff is really friendly and always helpful with making the hard selection.  The cupcakes are these cream-stuffed pieces of heaven, and their signature sandwiches are out of this world.  Everything else leaves nothing to be desired, and keeps me coming back as frequently as I can find someone to accompany me.
My sister, husband, and I went in after early dinner. It was completely unplanned but we were attracted to the quaint storefront. We purchased a crispy elephant ear-like dessert sprinkled with cinnamon and sugar. It was glorious. I bought a piece of apple-walnut-cinnamon sugar cake with cream cheese frosting. It was delicious an moist. We also purchased freshly baked chocolate chip cookies. They were absolutely rich and scrumptious. The woman who was there an greeted us seemed like she might be the owner. She was sweet and very helpful. Great disposition. This is probably my favorite small bakery in Pittsburgh. Delightful.
Food glorious foooood, hot sausage and MUStard...\n\nActually they don't sell hot sausage and mustard but, you know. \n\nThey do have amazing ham and cheese sandwiches, that are kinda pricy, but oh so good. And if you want them, you better get there early on the weekend! They're small, so get 2 for yourself at least :)\n\nWe've also tried the Nutella tart, which i've had twice now because it's SO DELICIOUS. The fruit tart is not bad, cinnamon buns are great, jewish pizza is ok (not what I was expecting - it's kinda like a fruitcake - like the dreaded holiday kind - but denser and drier), strata (eggy bread dish) which was pretty good, key lime cake - so so good, and quiche (good). \n\nSeating is hit or miss, since there's only a few tables (3 of them seat 4 people, 1 seats 2 people). On a quieter morning you should be able to find a seat. They serve coffee as well (nothing to write home about), $2 a cup, but if you like coffee with your dessert like me, it's nice to have.
Came across this place after checking out a Thai restaurant across the street. The name intrigued my family and I, and it looked like adorable from the outside. \n\nI fell in love instantly. And came back several times after first discovering this hidden gem. You walk in and the wonderful smells just overwhelm you in just an amazing way. The ambiance is that of an old style kitchen- personally, it reminds me of one of my aunts kitchens, which gives it that homey feel that is so comforting. They have seating- which I never saw in any bakeries prior to this one. They also serve coffee and encourage you to take a seat and enjoy your sweet treat. \n\nThey offer such a unique array of sweets. Definitely not your typical bakery. Pies, tortes, mooses and cookies.. And when they do have cinnamon rolls, grab them! They are a hot commodity! My personal favorite is their key lime pie. Oh my goodness. It's amazing. They have had it every time that I came, thank goodness. Their key lime cake is phenomenal as well. Their fruit tarts are incredible, the chocolate moose is amazing- they have a lot of items with fresh fruit which I love! \n\nMy only critiques- the hours: they are closed on Mondays and Sundays :/, not ideal for someone whose only day off is typically Sunday. And also, they write all the items thy have in the case on a small chalkboard posted on the wall to the right of the case. Every time I go, I find myself asking the employees what everything is, which I find to be a little annoying. Regardless- it's worth it. It's such a hidden gem and going there and experiencing their sweets is a real treat.
I moved to Pgh from San Francisco in 2010, and every single dealing I've had with AAA since I moved here has been great -- straightforward, super helpful people, and mostly quite brief wait times. \n\nThe agent that I have worked with from the start, whose name I think is Heather (long dark hair, second desk from the left), has always been willing to spend as much time with me as I needed to understand what I was buying and/or the process that I needed to go through.\n\nAlso, my car was totaled a couple of years ago (some jagoff who was texting rear-ended me, ahem, please don't do this), and they were phenomenal. I had a check for the full amount in less than a week.\n\nI see a lot of negative reviews here for services that are title related. I don't know if those people are even AAA employees, they might be DOT for all we know. I've had three title transactions, including one for a car that was from out of state, and they all went smoothly. \n\nI've been with AAA for more than 40 years, and when I lived in California I was seriously considering switching. Not anymore.
Among the best of the 'burgh.  Great live acts on a regular basis.
Dear Shadow Lounge, \nI miss you. You're wonderful in every way. The dance parties, the live music, the poetry slams, the local art, the totally reasonable drink prices, the cute and chill proprietor eye candy...I could go on. \n\nStay awesome. \n\nXoxo,\nAndrea
As a Brooklyn based live indie-electronic/hiphop performer that travels, Shadow Lounge is by far one of my all time favorites.  As a Pittsburgh native remembering it's first opening when it was just bboys, graff heads, MC's and DJ's doing their local thing, it's amazing to see this place has become so professional, original, and really stands-out and is positively active for the community and continuing growth of Pittsburgh.  The service is delightful on both sides (AVA/Shadow Lounge), the prices are just right, the sound system is a complete BANGER with crisp and clean sound.   The crowd is mad cool and always responsive to good music.  Shadow Lounge really holds it down for Pittsburgh's scenes no matter the genre.  Can't visit Pittsburgh without stopping by Shadow Lounge.
Went several nights in a row: Thursday, Saturday & Sunday. I cannot say enough how much I LOVE LOVE LOVE this place!!! Every night was different: African night, Latin Dance, Brass Band (that was amazing). The Ownership is way friendly & open to chatting which I love. The bartenders are open, friendly & genuine...anyone who remembers my name & my drink is a winner in my book! It shows they are listening when they actually ask you a question! The ownership was willing to allow us to order & set on fire a Flaming Dr. Pepper.....had to bring a little Southern treasure North! ;)\n\nI love the diverse, yet open and friendly crowd each night. I felt right at home.\n\nNow for the real surprise....THE FOOD!!!\n\nWe ordered the~\n\nTortas 7.00...we got one Chicken & one Steak..both were perfect!\n\nSandwiches with your choice of tofu or breaded chicken.  Served on toasted bread or multi-grain wrap with melted mozzarella cheese, fried bean spread, avocados, tomatoes, and onions. Topped with a chipotle sauce\n\nCheese Steak Torta 9.00\n\nGrilled steak served on toasted bread or multi-grain wrap with onions, peppers, mozzarella cheese, fried bean spread, topped with guacamole and chipotle sauce\n\nI was shocked & amazed at how wonderful this \"bar food\" was. The tortas were great & the guacamole homemade. \n\nI will be back every time I am in Pittsburgh!
Absolutely amazing! Great staff and service! Best music in Pittsburgh, hands down.  Good work guys!
One of the most eclectic venues in Pittsburgh. Shadow Lounge has a great variety of acts that it pulls in.\n\nI just went to their Titletown Soul & Funk Party and it was a really great time. Great music, fun crowd, pretty decent prices on drinks. I'll definitely be going back for Titletown and in general, Shadow Lounge is a great place to see alternative acts in Pittsburgh.
I love this store. I can just spend hours walking around getting ideas of things to either update or change around my house.\n\nAll of the sales associates are very helpful and knowledgeable. Sometimes it's hard to find someone to help you because they are busy helping other customers.\n\nThey even cut keys that actually work.
I went to a yelp event here, where we were able to make a fused glass piece and also watch some demonstrations and go to the gallery. Everything in the gallery was amazing. The demonstrations were neat, and the fused glass was something I would go back to do again.\n\nI really didn't know that the glass center was open most of the time, and if you go there on any random day, you can watch whatever is going on. I think that is pretty cool! They also have classes where you can blow glass or make beads or whatever you want... I can't wait to pick up my piece and come back for another class!
Got my hair done in an updo (for only $25!!!!)  yesterday for my wedding.  they did amazing!  they listened to what i wanted and although it took quite a while (i have really long hair) she spent the time to do it right and exactly how i wanted it.  great service!!   The price is not high but the quality is!
Great for a quick cut.  $22 for extreme attention to detail and excellent finish.
Great Hoagies! \n\nI always get the Steak Deluxe hoagie and my wife gets the Italian Deluxe and then we give each other half of the other ones hoagie because we can never decide on with one to get.
AH!  I am never shopping anywhere else for groceries ever again (except if I want like ketchup and bologna and stuff-- then I'll have to go to giant eagle.)  But, after coming from the middle of nowhere midwest, I cannot tell you how good it feels to see cheese and meat in the grocery store that I actually want to eat.  \n\nAH!
I love shopping here. The staff is really nice, no attitudes. Even the other shoppers are kind. It's always nice. Thanks to everyone for making Whole Foods a nice shopping experience.
Alright, so I braved this place yesterday (new years eve) and it was totally insane. There was honking, some road rage and confusion. But I will say that I should have known better coming into a grocery store before a major partying holiday.  \n\nAnyway, in terms of produce this place is awesome. I got my meat and bacon from this joint and have not been disappointed. I also love their premade hamburgers. They are delish. This is also a great place to find a great assortment of cheeses and grass fed butter ( I go for the kerry gold products, they are just awesome).  \n\nAlso if you are grilling and dont want to cook too many sides, you can pick up some of their sides from their deli section. I haven't had a bad experience with their food and you can always give everything a taste before having the clerk put it in a container.  This is certainly the place to get specialty items like hemp seeds, chia seeds, and other natural dietary supplements... just beware they are not cheap. Overall, whole foods is not cheap, but if you want quality this is the place to go. Just dont go here on New Year's Eve or Christmas Eve... you'll end up ripping your hair out!!
TimeBomb is without a doubt the best spot in Pittsburgh to get all the exclusive Raw street merchandise. This is my favorite store in the city not only because of it's selection of merchandise, but for it's uniqueness. \n\nThe owner Brick who started the store in '95 I believe is a great guy who always takes care of his loyal customers. I've received free apparel, stickers, DVDs, mixtapes, you name it from Brick. He's a man who knows how to keep his customers coming back! \n\nAll in all TimeBomb is the place to shop in Pittsburgh if you're looking to \"Get Your Life Right\"
I first found the Newman Chiropractic Center about 2 years ago when one day, my lower back pain got so severe I could barely walk. I called one or two other Chiropractic offices first and neither could see me that morning or even that same day. Dr. Novak at the Newman Chiropractic Center was able to see me immediately and since that day, I've never even thought about going anywhere else. Whenever I need an adjustment, I simply call ahead and let them know I'll be stopping in; they are extremely flexible and understanding of my busy schedule.\n\nI look forward to visiting the office for an adjustment because I know that when I leave, I will feel amazing. The office itself is not as posh as you might find other places in Shady Side but it's welcoming, comfortable, and certainly gets the job done. \n\nI have and will continue to highly recommend Dr. Novak to anyone who is need of Chiropractic care.
As the reviews of Casbah appear to be particularly long-winded ... the place is nice, fancy, organic-ish, alternating menu, nice atmosphere. Good date restaurant. Good food-lovers restaurant.
This is my favorite Big Burrito restaurant and definitely one of my favorite restaurants in the country. \n\nGotta be honest, though. Just about every time I'd been here, it's with colleagues, which means lots and lots of boozing!! Therefore, consequently, as a result, in sum, I don't have a crystal clear memory of what I had for appetizer, entree, dessert, etc. \n\nWhat I can tell you is that I had never been disappointed with anything I've ordered here. And believe you me, if the food is not that good, I will remember it no matter how drunk I am. Sure, it's not exactly a \"Mediterranean\" restaurant, but who cares? The food is great, it's in a super cute hood, the atmosphere is cozy and comfy, and the service is always spot on. \n\nI do recall that the very last time I ate here was with a dear friend and two of her British colleagues, and we had ourselves a grand ol' time. I had the arugula --one of my favorite words. It's lovely, no? Say it with me. A -ru-gu-la! Fun, right?!! And so flavorful!! --salad and cioppino, which was outstanding with super freshy fresh ingredients. What about dessert, you ask? Sorry, kids. By that time I really was drunk, and I can't remember. It was super tasty, though! I remember everyone liking mine the best. Sure do, sugar!\n\nSo pay no mind to others' taxonomy quip and give this place a whirl. It's a great date or small group place. Oh, and super fantastic wine list, too!
Hard to remember another restaurant that hit home runs from start to finish.  Yinzes say it's pricey but I disagree, the quality is hard to find period.  Very progressive menu but not too wild, products are from near area farms, very knowledgable staff.  And butter served at the right temperature, that's a novel idea!  Just a great experience, can't wait to get back there.
casbah is the last big burrito restaurant i had left to try and i really liked it. i started with the sangria to drink which was delicious, and i'm usually not a huge fan of sweet drinks like that. we split the grilled flatbread app. the dips weren't anything super special, but the bread was thick and flavorful. no complaints. then we both got piccola gusta and split all our items. (the piccola gusta gives you salad or soup, half a sandwich, and half a pasta) between the two of us we had the tomato & basil bisque, arugula salad, crab cake sandwich, salumi sandwich, orecchiette pasta, and ricotta cavatelli.\ni'm not a big fan of tomato soup, in fact, i never eat it, but i tried the bisque and loved it. it tasted more like a tomato sauce than soup. the arugula salad was great as well. the crab cake sandwich was really small but good, and the salumi sandwich was amazing... probably my favorite part of the meal. both pastas were good, but i personally preferred the orecchiette, the cranberries sealed the deal for me.\ni love the atmosphere, we sat out on the covered patio, and the service was great as well.\ni'll definitely be back again, hopefully to try the different brunch and dinner menus!
Casbah is definitely my favorite restaurant in P-burgh; in fact, usually when I go somewhere else I wind up regretting that I didn't just go to Casbah. Every dish I've had has been excellent; some favorites are the sheep's milk gnudi, tuna tartare, arugala salad, bread pudding, and pretty much every soup. The short rib ravioli is a must have although arguably a touch salty. The menu is so inventive!
My wife and I go to Casbah every year for my birthday. It is my favorite of the Big  Burrito restaurants, and they have a birthday deal for $30 off an entree. \n\nThis time I started with the Parsnip & Chestnut Soup, garnished with braised chicken, arugula & almond pesto. It was divine, with the rich sweetness for which parsnips are noted. My main course was Elysian Fields Farm Lamb Loin with flageolet beans, merguez sausage, turnips, greens and whole grain mustard. It was cooked perfectly pink, as ordered, and the flavors complemented each other.\n\nFor dessert, I skipped my usual chocolate - they offered Chocolate Mousse, Chocolate Cheesecake and Dark Chocolate Raspberry Bread Pudding. I decided to try the Pumpkin Bread with Butter Rum Sauce and Cream Cheese Ice Cream.  The cake was light and tasty and the ice cream and sauce were excellent.
Brunch = best in the burgh.  Hands down.  Best. eggs. ever. I am not even sure how the eggs can be that good.  I know what you are saying, \"They are eggs, Jessica.  Get a grip.\"  No.  I will not.  I cannot.  I want to stand on top of rooftops and shout my love for these eggs all over town.  \n\nJ, H and I went there a few Sundays ago.  We all got the same thing. When was the last time you went to a meal and all three people ordered the same thing.  It was that good.  The scallop breakfast is out of this world.  2 perfectly cooked scallops, scrambled eggs (the eggs!!!), the creamiest, tastiest grits in the world, buttery croissant and sausage, apples and butternut squash.  Don't think those things go together?  They do and are awesome!  J and I also both got orders of bacon cause no brunch is complete without bacon.  \n\nOur service was also great.  Nice hostess, awesome waiter.  All was perfect.  \n\nReally freaking good brunch.  Really.  Cannot say enough about those freaking eggs.  \n\nOh, but don't order an additional mimosa from the deal - they are $8 a piece which is a bit steep.
Oh I love this place.  It has a great menu and wine list.  It has all the great dishes with a touch of flare.  I took this meal to seafood town from start to finish and have no regrets.  The staff was really friendly - realized I was there for a special occasion and brought out a desert that said congratulations - the little things.\n\nWe dined outside and I felt tucked away in a Europe-esque atmosphere for a few hours.\n\nIt is worth reserving a spot on the patio to get the full experience.
Love Casbah.  Been going there for years and have never had a less than great meal and service.  OF course their signature lamb is to die for (with the Stag's Leap Petite Syrah).  What can I say -- the cheese plate is great.  Everything is well-prepared and the service is among the best in the -burgh.
Casbah is fast becoming my favorite restaurant in Pittsburgh. I have been there twice now and both times the service and food was impeccable. \n\nThe calamari and the proscuitto appetizer are a great start to the meal and not too heavy or filling and I could eat a whole basket of the warm bread. I'd love to know where they get it from as I can't imagine they bake it there, but maybe they do! \n\nThe pork chop is their signature dish and does not disappoint. My husband had the duck the last time we were there and it was juicy on the inside and had a great crispy skin. I had the red pepper casereccia and was thrilled with the amount of seafood in the dish. There were 4 HUGE, delicious scallops and a ton of lump crab. Very impressive. I was there with a group of 6 this time and everyone had clean plates at the end of the meal. \n\nI like the fact that it seems like the menu changes with the seasons. The proteins may stay static, but since they use a lot of local ingredients, the accompaniments/side dishes might be different every time you come. Honestly, this is one of the best restaurants in Pittsburgh. I plan on trying it for brunch or lunch sometime soon.
My absolutely favorite dish is the potato gnocchi. Just amazing! Service is fantastic, nice decor. I wish they wouldn't use such huge paper towels in the bathroom, but other than that I really like this place.
I recently realized that I had only given Casbah four stars after my first visit here for New Year's Eve 2012... What a terrible judgment call that was on my part. So I'm back to proclaim that over a year later - having dined here again in 2013 - with a year of dining experiences across the country -  I still regularly dream of this restaurant. Do I dare say it's my favorite restaurant? I'm not sure, but if it's not my favorite, it's certainly close.\n\nWe returned after NYE last year to celebrate my birthday in March, making sure to bring along the oh-so-coveted Big Burrito birthday coupon. I ordered the Orecchiette with Chicken, Cranberries, Goat Cheese & Sage Cream. Oh. My. Goodness. Don't order this if you're on a diet... but order this if you love delicious food and living life to the fullest. It was ridiculously creamy, and the cranberries packed the perfect fruity balance to the rich dish. My husband ordered the Double-Cut Pork Chop with Kale & Butternut Squash Risotto. While recently dining at a highly rated restaurant in NYC, he said, \"My double-cut pork chop at Casbah was better than this double-cut pork chop.\" That's when I knew that I needed to update my review of Casbah.\n\nFinally, my delicious birthday dinner ended with the Dark Chocolate-Raspberry Bread Pudding. I love ordering bread pudding at restaurants, and I think this is the best of them all. I would confidently enter this dessert in a bread pudding competition, knowing that I would be walking away with the blue ribbon.
I have a soft spot for this place -- probably because it is one of the first restaurants my fiance ever took me to, and he made a special night out of it. We've been back many times, for many occasions, and Casbah has never disappointed. Great wine, cocktails, food, service, and atmosphere. It can be a little more cramped on the inside, but it's never too loud. If you can sit outside, it feels nice and spacious. It's also very nice downstairs.\n\nThe valet parking is a huge plus in my book, especially in that area of Shadyside. The service is always prompt and never overbearing. \n\nThe last time we went, we had the sheep's milk gnudi and I'm pretty sure it was sent straight from heaven down on to our plate. I nearly fought my fiance for the last piece. He loves me so he let me have it. The swordfish was wonderful. The lamb is always great. The short rib ravioli melts in your mouth. I'd highly recommend any of those.\n\nThe dark chocolate raspberry bread pudding is worth unbuttoning your pants for...and if you like dessert wines, you'll be in heaven for sure!
Best \"Babaganoush\" we've had since we visited Egypt.\nThe gaspacho soup was fantastic, and since my husband wouldn't share his short rib ravioli, I can only assume they were suburb also. \nThe atmosphere was a tad basic, but it was also different and therefore interesting and enjoyable.
The food here was absolute perfection; each bite was perfectly orchestrated to deliver optimal flavor and enjoyment. The service was also fantastic!\n\nFor my entree, I had the cioppino -- it may be one of the best that I've ever had. The bowl was filled with beautiful looking seafood: large shrimp, clams in their shells, mussels in their shells, a gorgeous piece of perfectly seasoned halibut, and enormous wonderfully cooked scallops. They knew how to cook each piece of seafood to showcase it well. And the charred sourdough served with the cioppino was the perfect complement to soak up all of the delicious, savory flavors of the broth without becoming a soggy mush! My grandfather had the halibut and loved it... Cleaned the plate!\n\nI had heard rave reviews of the dark chocolate raspberry bread pudding, so we had to share one for dessert! My grandfather said it was incomparable to any bread pudding; it was a sweet, smooth, decadent indulgence that paired well with the house coffee.\n\nAnd the complementary salted caramels presented with the check were also amazing! I definitely need to come back again to try more of the menu... I think only wonderful items could possibly come out of that kitchen!
I took my boyfriend to Casbah at the end of September for his birthday. We were seated near the door for our reservation however it was a very warm night so it was nice to sit in an open air setting. Our server, her name has slipped my mind, was excellent. I am not a fan of red wines but my boyfriend is and it being his birthday, of course I said let's get a bottle of red. We explained to our server what white varietals I enjoy and she suggested a bottle (which has also slipped my mind being months ago that we were there)that was perfect-both of us enjoyed it. We started off with the papardelle. The rabbit was delicious and it was perfectly seasoned, perfectly cooked-the flavors were amazing together! For entrees, my boyfriend ordered the duck and I ordered the short rib ravioli. His words to describe the duck were \"life changing\". I was only able to taste a small piece of his since he ate it so quickly, but I agree it was excellent. The short rib was so tender and juicy. I was concerned it would be overly salty and it was not. It was the best ravioli I have eaten hands down! For dessert, we ordered a cheese tasting. It was the perfect way to end our meal-with the cheese tasting and a glass of wine. I can't wait to go back to Casbah and sample some other items-I would have ordered the entire menu on our first visit if I could have!
This update is for Casbah's brunch.\n\nAlright, Casbah. You got me, you got me good. Dinner as I mentioned before was decent, but the brunch, amazing. Compared to dinner, brunch at Casbah is definitely the better meal and deal. I don't advocate playing favorites when it comes to siblings in the same family, but sometimes you can't help it. Brother Brunch gets the nod here.\n\nBrunch is basically a fixed set. For $28, you choose an adult beverage (or non-alcoholic), an appetizer, and an entree. They start you off with some pistachio scones, buttermilk biscuits, and cornbread. Perfect, I like to stretch before I get my grub on. For my Prix-Fixe (fixed set), I went with the mimosa, smoked salmon, and sea scallop fry. \n\nSMOKED SALMON: If you like smoked salmon, then you would enjoy this appetizer. It's what you would expect but also a larger size than I thought it would be! \"Oh no, there's too much of something I like,\" said nobody ever. Upon seeing the smoked salmon display fanned out on its plate with bits of egg, red onion, and aioli garnished over top, my salivary glands couldn't control themselves! \n\nSEA SCALLOP FRY: You know I love me some scallops. The dish came with two scallops, a small croissant, small bits of fennel sausage, a side of white corn grits, and a little bit of butternut squash and caramelized onions. I was tempted to go with the classic eggs/toast/waffle as an entree, but I am so glad I put on my big boy foodie stretchy pants and took a chance. It's not your typical brunch dish and it's one I would definitely recommend. \n\nAll in all, fantastic brunch experience. Definitely felt comfortably full, but not in a self-hatred, \"I-regret-this-decision-immediately\" kind of way. Service was professional; our waitress kept the waters filled and came in to check on us a little after each dish was served.
Let me say that my five stars are based primarily on the calamari appetizer ... it is SOOO good! The squid was very lightly battered and fried so briefly that it was tender and delicious. Seriously, it was one of the best I've eaten, and I've made it a point of sampling calamari. The entrees (short rib ravioli and cavatelli) were very good, too. As for the Carrot Cob for dessert, forget it. It only detracts from the otherwise wonderful meal.
Upon receipt of the much-coveted Big Burrito birthday voucher, I had to make the tough decision about which of their restaurants to visit.  I was torn between Casbah and Eleven, but upon perusing the menus, reading reviews, and giving the matter much thought, I settled on Casbah.  I knew I'd made a good decision when I invited some friends to join me, and they said that, based on their past experience, I'd made an excellent choice!\n\nOur meal started off with a few slices of bread, which came with butter and a Greek yogurt spread.  The butter was good, but the yogurt spread was amazing, and both of them dressed up the bread very well.  We then ordered an appetizer of the bruschetta, which was not your normal bruschetta, but was delicious.  I'm not entirely sure of the ingredients, since what we received doesn't match the menu description posted on the website, but one notable thing about it was that it had some pomegranate seeds that gave it a subtle sweetness and juiciness, complementing the other savory ingredients.  For my entree, I ordered the orecchiette, a dish consisting of ear-shaped pasta tossed in a goat cheese and sage cream sauce, with chicken and dried cranberries.  Flavorwise, this was one of the most well-balanced dishes I've ever eaten, with the savory ingredients and sweet hints from the cranberries (which were actual cranberries, rather than craisins, as I'd imagined) melding together in perfect culinary harmony.  The pasta was also cooked to a perfect al dente firmness, which held up well in the microwave several days later when I ate the leftovers.  The cranberry-lime dry soda that I ordered to go with this entree complemented it very nicely, and was a great alternative to wine (while I was tempted, I didn't order any since my dining companions decided not to, due to having driven).\n\nMy two dining companions ordered the Scottish salmon and the gnocchi, respectively.  Based on the samples that they provided me, Casbah did a great job on these dishes, as well!  The salmon had a subtle saltiness that complemented the flavor nicely, without overpowering it.  My friend who ordered it had had it before at Casbah, but had since been to Scotland, and he said that it was very similar in quality and taste to the versions of this dish that he'd tried there.  The gnocchi was one of the most unique and varied dishes I've encountered, and, based on the two bites that I tried, brought the ingredients together in a medley of flavors and textures.  I think my friend who ordered it described it best by saying that every bite was a bit different, but that they were all delicious!  Although all of us tried bites of each other's dishes, we each liked our own choice best, so we chose well.\n\nAfter our entrees, we decided to order dessert.  Although I was tempted by the dark chocolate raspberry bread pudding, since many reviewers speak highly of it, I decided to follow my instinct and get the chocolate-hazelnut bomba.  I'm so glad that I did, since this dessert was amazing!  If you like dark chocolatey, torte-like desserts or Nutella, this dessert is a must-try. Since I mentioned I was at Casbah for a birthday dinner, the dessert was served with \"Happy birthday\" written on the plate in chocolate icing, which was a nice touch.  My dining partners ordered the creme brulee to split between themselves, which came topped with an apple compote.  Based on the bite that I tried, it was a good rendition of a brulee, but couldn't match the star power of the chocolate bomba.\n\nWe visited at 7:30pm last Sun., at the later end of their serving hours, but service from our waiter, Brian, was very good.  We were seated in the tent-like area in the front of the restaurant, which stayed surprisingly warm during most of our visit.  At one point before dessert, upon returning from the restroom, I noticed that it'd cooled off, but the manager came out to turn on the heating elements, and it warmed back up in less than 10 min.\n\nIn sum, if you're looking for a solid fine dining experience with innovative, delicious food, Casbah is a great choice.  The food was impressive in its quality, and the service was what I've come to expect at a higher-end restaurant.  I'd particularly recommend getting on the Big Burrito mailing list to receive a $30 birthday voucher and $10 off coupons for the holidays, and taking advantage of one of these occasions to try it.  I'm certain that you'll be as pleased with your experience there as me and my dining partners!
Casbah continues to be my favorite Pittsburgh restaurant. High quality service and creative dishes. Sign up for mailers for Big Burrito special offers and birthday discount.  \n\nMust try:\nCalamari\nCheese plate\nShort Rib Ravioli\nPork Chop\nWatermelon Gin Fizz
I used to live about four blocks from the Quiet Storm, and for a period breakfast here was an every day affair.  Those two facts have nothing to do with each other--the period in question was close to the end of the first semester of my (super-)senior year, when my friends and I would stay in our studios all night working, haul ass out to Quiet Storm for ambrosia-caliber restorative tofu scramble and coffee, and go back to school bright-eyed and bushy-tailed for another day of class.  And then usually I'd take a three-hour nap after the first class.  But I'm sorry, what is it I'm reviewing here?\n\nThe Quiet Storm has absolutely the best tofu scramble I've ever had.  I'm an accomplished vegan eater (I get stuff in my mouth first try nine times out of ten), I've had the best scrambles New York and San Francisco have to offer.  Believe you me, Quiet Storm tops them all.  I wish I knew their secret recipe, but the part I do know--baking the tofu rather than just sauteeing it--makes a tremendous difference.  Come in on a lazy Sunday morning, get the Nothin' Fancy, and you will see for yourself just how good tofu can be.  On top of that, they are as vegan-friendly as can be, with earth balance for the toast; soy, rice, and almond milks; and a selection of specifically vegan mixed drinks and milkshakes.  Plus, sandwiches!  Get the spicy spinach and peanut butter wrap, ask for added tofu (planks not crumble), and be astonished yet again.\n\nAND AND, as a delicious cherry on top, they have theme brunches, fantastic theme brunches that show off the creativity and chops of the cooks here in a way that the regular menu can only hint at.  Check out their website and see when the next theme brunch is, and make a point of going.  Get there early.
CASH ONLY!!!  What a pleasant surprise!  I went here for the first time last night and wasn't sure what to expect when i walked in.  The place seems to have some spacial issues.  There was a bar but they don't serve alcohol, more of a coffee/diner bar.  The tables and chairs seem odd and it took me a while to find a chair that was comfortable, but maybe this is by design.  I am not a coffee expert but i really enjoyed my several cups of decaf.  Anyhoo, to the food.  This place is vegetarian only.   I started with a Hummus plate, unlike most creamy hummuses this hummus was gritty as i could actually taste the chick peas with each bite.  The hummus was surrounded by fresh crisp cucumbers, carrots, celery, calamata olives (big fan) and pita. Perfect starter.  For my main entree i ordered the curry special.  Do not expect an Indian food experience but this will not disappoint.   Everything was in the bowl, chick peas, basmanti rice, carrots, and other miscellaneous items.  Once i started dipping my pita into it I could not stop.  It was savory, spicy and just the perfect compliment to the cold snowy night.    This is one storm i will enjoy braving from time to time.
After three trips to Quiet Storm I am hooked.   I had the Bahn Mi, then the Veggie Gyro, then a burrito.  All were a large portion with excellent fresh ingredients at a price that was really really great.  \n\nMy significant other is addicted to the chili, which actually has a good heat level.  \n\nAlso the milkshakes are to die for.  Can't get enough of them.\n\nService is prompt and attentive.  The waitstaff is knowledgeable and friendly.  Service is quick even when they are busy.  This is the perfect casual restaurant.  The decor is funky  and cool.  There is even a pinball machine!\n\nWill return again and again I am sure.
My husband and I stopped going here, back in 2010, because of the bad service we were receiving. We used to call the servers \"Whole Foods Rejects\"; they were always cranky and we felt not welcomed, rushed. At the end of 2011, I think they got a new manager, the service has been optimal and we haven't stopped going since. Their food is delicious as well as their drinks and coffee.
Nothing matches in this place! The tables, the chairs, the tiles and that's how we like it! Lots of delicious vegan items. Definitely a good place to try new things. Good coffee too!
I love quiet storm! I think it's as good as you can get for vegan cuisine. The country burrito is BOMB! So good, there has to be crack in the gravy. I also enjoy the tahini queso, I often add it to my burrito. It's best on the nachos. For around $13 you can get a delicious filling breakfast/brunch coffee/tea included. They also have great pastries & dairy free coffee drinks & milkshakes! It's a vegan dream come true. It does get a little crowded during Saturday mornings so expect a wait, but completely worth it. The atmosphere is oozing with hipster ambiance associated with the area (Garfield) which also means they often play good music! Last time I was there it was all Neil Young! Accompanied my burrito perfectly! I definitely recommend this place to vegans & NON-vegans alike!
I was somewhat worried about going here since the reviews seem to be bimodal, so I was pleasantly surprised when our food was flavorful (some reviewers complained of blandness) and not trying to imitate meat (some reviewers said that seemed to be the goal), but exploiting the wonderfulness of vegetables and scrambled tofu (which, despite the other complaints, was just fine). We had the \"tenders\" appetizer, with both the vegan BBQ sauce and the vegan wasabi mayonnaise. We much preferred the BBQ sauce, but I am guessing if you are a wasabi fan, you would like that too. We all thought it was wonderful. On the advice of the server, I had the peanut wrap. It was spicy, heavily peanut-flavored, but full of yummy veggies. I also had a side of chili, that I liked a lot (and I make my own veggie chili at home, so I am picky). Ben had the apple panini with the gazpacho side. We both thought the gazpacho was kind of plain (it got better by adding chili!), but the apple panini (with \"seisage\", cheese, etc.) was very good. Finally, Panchu had the coconut burrito, which was huge, but he ate the whole thing, and was very happy. We all split a vegan cinnamon roll for dessert, and I really wish I had been able to get my own!\n\nSome complained about the wait; I think this place fits well with the \"slow food movement.\" If you want fast food, go to McDonald's.\n\nSo, based on one observation, I gave it five stars. YMMV.
Quiet Storm is a delicious and cozy little place located in the colorful Bloomfield area. The buildings surrounding Quiet Storm are often painted with cute art or have little interesting things about them. I love this neighborhood, but I love Quiet Storm even more! \n\nI've only been here twice, and I always want to go more often but somehow it doesn't happen. I've turned on three of my friends to Quiet Storm too, and they love it just as much. The first time I visited I ordered a tofu hash. It was an amazing blend of seasonal vegetables, including some I would never eat otherwise. The tofu was nice and firm, the seisage was spicy and perfectly chewy. The vegan \"cheese\" sauce was also rich and delicious.  The portion was so huge, I couldn't finish it. Leftovers are rarely as good as when the meal is fresh, but I was pleasantly surprised to find that my leftovers were even BETTER than the fresh meal. I think this is because the spices and vegetables had more time to meld together in a perfect veggie harmony. \n\nThe second time I visited was 4/21/2013. A group of my friends came here for Brunch. Two of us ordered the Vegan Country Burrito, another friend ordered the french toast with pistachio honey topping and my other friend ordered a tofu hash with black beans and salsa. Everything was generously portioned, but some meal choices were sold out. They were a bit disappointed that there was no more falafel. All of us devoured our plates and happily chattered about the complexity of flavor, protein content in vegan food items and how much we loved the atmosphere. \n\nQuiet Storm is a great little place to visit. It's never lacking in interesting things to look at while you eat. Food comes as quickly as possible. There are plenty of options to please everyone, and if you think you don't like vegetables, try one of their plates and you may change your mind. (Seriously, I am one of those vegans who hates veggies, but Quiet Storm food can get me to finish all of mine) \n\nTip: If you want to go for Sunday brunch, go early so your favorites will still be available. \n\nYou may also want to nudge the servers a little more than you usually would, because even though our drinks were bottomless, it was a pain to get them back to give us refills - even for water.
My favorite for Pt. Breeze/Pittsburgh East End. Flat New York style, not greasy, timely delivery, they know my orders!
Great pizza, reasonable prices, fast service - cant ask for much more!
This Valentines Day I ordered a pizza for my boyfriend and asked that they make a heart on it out of green peppers. The pizza was great, the heart was perfect, and he loved it!
By far my favorite Pizza place in the east end.  The buffalo chicken pizza here is fantastic, and very unique.  I haven't been able to find anything even remotely approaches it in other cities.  \n\nThe place is a bit pricey, but I feel its worth it.  My go to pizza delivery place!
I moved to PGH about 3 years ago with my cat and was nervous about finding a new vet. My previous vet in NY was just wonderful and I was doubtful that I would find another as good or as caring as her. Over the past 3 years I have taken my cat there not only for his yearly's but for other heatlth issues and was alway met with caring staff. Dr. Simard is my favorite vet there, and I try to get her as often as I can, but I have also seen Dr. Berger who is great and have heard good things about Dr. Schroth as well. Dr. Gerson is the owner, I have seen him once and he is a tad gruff, but if you are direct with him he is easy to work with. \nMy cat has always had a bit of a weight issue and since going to Point Breeze and working with Dr. Simard my cat has gone from 25 lbs to 18lbs and we seem to be well on the way to Dr. Simards goal of 16lbs. \nMy cat was also treated by Dr. Simard for a bad case of worms, after apparently catching and consuming a mouse in our basement - again they got me in right away and before I knew it he was worm-free. \nI have never felt like they wanted to up-sell me on anything, and they have always been very patient and willing to hear my concerns. \nI really love this clinic, and truely believe that they exceed in animal care.
I took my cat here for a preliminary checkup after adopting her from the animal shelter & then again to have her declawed. I was very impressed by the facilities and service. The facilities are spotless & modern, and the vets seem both knowledgeable and willing to spend time with you and your animal.\n\nI was particularly impressed when I had my cat declawed. They kept her for several days to monitor my progress & called me each day to update me on her progress.\n\nIt seems a bit expensive (although I have no other point of comparison) but the service is well worth it.
There is nothing better than a neighborhood market, and Frick Park Market fits the bill. Come here for grocery staples, a great homemade sandwich (get the breakfast sandwich, any of them!), or just to hang out. The owner will be there & is happy to talk to you.\n\nThe best part about the market, though, is when the kids get off school & come into the store for candy & soda. You can tell that the business is connected to the neighborhood and that everyone gets along. Pittsburgh treasure!
anything you need you can find it at the market :)
There is nothing like this in chicago!  (that I know of).....I hope I get to stay in Pittsburgh long enough just to take advantage of this co-op.  I love the bulk section, especially since I can choose the quantity of what I want to buy.  Super convenient for travelers.  You can buy pasta, granolla, flour, quinoa, cous cous, cane sugar, spices, YERBA MATE!!!, dried fruit, nuts, olive oil, peanut & almond butter, soap.....man, I could go on & on.  You can buy all of that stuff & choose how much you want of it.  \n\nI was suprised that they had cacao powder, for such a small place.  They have a nice little section of tofu, tempeh, & seitan next to a bunch of vegan cheese that looked really good.  \n\nThey also have a juice bar & vegetarian \"cafe.\"  I don't think I'd call it a cafe, more like buffet.  I wasn't all that impressed with the food they had cooked, but I'm not going to penalize them for that.  For such a small place it's pretty amazing what they already have going on there.  I really want to try something from their juice bar too!!  \n\nThere must be someone dj'ing the music in the store because I heard some great music that you wouldn't hear on the radio.  Everyone was very curteous and nice.  I should try to make friends with these people since I'm new in town.
I just found this place a month back and I'm kind of blown away by how awesome it is. Fresh produce, awesome prepared salads and dips, bulk everything, natural cleaners, and plenty of hippie garbage you can't help but fill your shelves with. The best part is that they try to stock up with locally sourced produce, milk, and meat. And you can get a good discount if you purchase stock in the co-op.
I was visiting Pittsburgh and looking for a throat spray called Singers Saving Grace. Whole Foods didn't have the item in stock but East End Co-Op did! Also, had a smoothie while a shopped. \n\nWhat a great find!
Forget Whole Foods when you have East End Cooperative! Honestly, this is quite possibly one of my favorite coops. They make some amazing deli items...so amazing that I went back twice during my visit to PA. I was only expecting to have a few options in the prepared food section, but the vegan options were plentiful. Their mock tuna salad was impressive, made with tvp, vegenaise, and spices. The potato salad was creamy and exceptionally delicious. And the vegan pasta salad was also impressive. Generally most grocers fail in this department, but East End excels by leaps and bounds. I can't believe how tasty their store-made food was. The prices were also very reasonable, if not low. If I lived in PA, I'd join their coop and would go there frequently.
12/1/13 got 3 bifold doors for 25 bucks, hard to find antique heater vent cover 10 , outdoor sensor light 4, ------------they have hard to find or odd size vintage/antique everything.  floor trim, paint,  staircase rails, bathroom sinks, counter tops, doors, windows, carpet tiles $1 , tiles back splash, furniture, misc hardware, door knobs, hinges,  some church pew benches large closet safe, front doors, door knobs, open 9-5 daily sunday 10-5-------off n braddock  - past regent square on a side street
I love this place!  You never know what your going to find!  They have all kinds of things, that are usually slavaged from a home or business.   Kitchen cabinets, tables, mantels, windows, doors, tons of doors!   If your some one who likes to fix old things or make new things out of old stuff, you must go here!  I picked up an old dresser today for $10 its needs the drawer fixed and to be refinished, but when its done its going to look beautiful!  They have old appliances , bathroom sinks and toilets, lighting fixtures, wood, paint, counter tops, flooring materials, some tile, etc., etc.!
Some helpful hints for the Climbing Wall:\n\n-A one-day pass is $12.  College students/active military pay $10.  Wednesday is 1/2 price for ladies (but only after they pay full price on the first visit).  Wednesday is also 1/2 price for guys who wear a sports bra.  Yup, you heard me right.  Wednesdays are usually pretty crowded.\n\n-They run a different membership special every month.  If you climb more than once a week, a membership can definitely be worth it.\n\n-If it's your first time at the wall, I highly suggest just doing the \"bouldering certification\" instead of the \"safety and belay certification class.\"  The bouldering certification takes about 5 minutes and then you can start climbing.  Decide if you like it, then do the belay certification.\n\n-If you \"like\" them on facebook, you can get updates about when they change the routes, what membership specials they're running, if they're selling any old/used shoes for discounted prices, etc.  \n\nThe wall is in a great location, on several bus routes, and right next to the East End Food Co-op.  It can get crowded, but everyone takes turns so you have plenty of opportunities.
Went to this place on a Groupon and fell in love. It reminds me of the days when I lived in Denver. I miss it! The routes are decently hard and allow me to push myself to get better. Staff has always been awesome. People there help give pointers. It does get pretty crowded sometimes, especially on Friday nights. I'd say they are almost in need of an expansion! Keep up the good work, Climbing Wall. I'll be seeing you a lot for the next year :)
I've been climbing for a few years but have friends who have never climbed. This place has lots of climbs at all different levels so my friends and I can enjoy climbing here together.  Plus they have instructional classes if you want to learn more. It has a great atmosphere - a great place to hang out with friends or meet new people. The staff are amazing! Very nice and very helpful. The prices are very reasonable, lower than any other gym I have climbed in (and I have climbed in lots of facilities). I definitely recommend climbing here.
OK, so I admit that I was underwhelmed by Cafe Zinho when I first went, a few years ago.  And then I didn't go for a long time.  A few months back, my husband and I randomly decided to give it another try, and boy am I glad we did!  It's fantastic, and has quickly become part of our regular line up.\n\nI'll say again that I'm not certain how the food is Portuguese.  That being said, it is mighty delicious.  I love the personal service.  I love the corn bread.  The starters are phenomenal, to the point where I sometimes think that the entrees are superfluous.  But when we get them, they are lovely too.  I love the ambiance.  In short, I owe Cafe Zinho an apology.
Visiting from NY, we actually found this highly-rated restaurant on Yelp ... and we were certainly not disappointed! It's situated on a nice residential block near a large liquor store (byob).  The ambiance is fantastic and the staff are warm, friendly and attentive. We were seated in the private back room because no other tables were available. A real VIP treatment.  \nFor starters, the goat cheese pastry and smoked salmon appetizers were to die for. Many of the others sounded great too.  Our daughter, who is at college here, was missing some of the food options of NY. Not any more. She had the lamb burger with feta cheese. I had the seafood stew and my wife had Chilean sea bass.  All fantastic! Thankfully we had just enough room for tres leches dessert. If anyone knows of a Portuguese restaurant this good in NYC ... or even in Newark Ironbound I'd love to hear about it.  We will definitely be back!
What a gem of a place in Shadyside.  It s places like this that makes me miss living there.  Food was outstanding!  Because it was our first time, we wanted to do a little bit of this and that.  2 appetizers, Becky s salad and the special of the eve:  smoked salmon on crostini with creme fresh, a clam dish, forgot name, with the best tomatoe-white wine, I could have drunk from the bowl, broth; Becky s salad (the lemon dressing was out of this world delicious--again, could have drunk it, good).  I m usually not fan of walnut in my salad, but the crumbled goat cheese made me forget about my dislike of it, that I ate it happily.  Good pairing.  The special of the night, we opted for sharing the lamb shank with reduced red wine sauce and simple veggies.  Small veggie selection by american standards--half russet potato, slither of zucchini, and a stem of green onion, but the star afterall was the lamb, and it was meduim perfect, just as I ordered!  \n\"Would you care for some dessert?\", Ramon, our waiter (he was fabulous!) asked.  And so round 3 begins.  Coffee, a chocolate mousse with whip cream, beauty and...  their version of creme brulee.  I thought it had a hint of peanut butter, but not sure.  Regardless it was  so, so divine.\nThis place was busy but we did not feel rushed, unlike most places.  The service was great, the atmoshphere quaint; it s definitely a neighbourhood cafe-- alot of repeat clientele, from what I gathered.  We shall return.\nFinally, on an end note. Cafe Zinho is BYOB, so bring your favourite bottle or magnum of vino.  And they only take cash or personal check, but they do have an ATM.
I was here on Mother's Day with my Mom, my mother-in-law, my aunt, and my cousin.  This was a \"girl's day out\", a gift to ourselves (we left the menfolk at home!).  Afternoon Tea was absolutely exquisite.  Don't get me wrong--I love a good ballgame and hotdog just like everyone else.  But sometimes I gotta do \"chick stuff\" like this too!  \n\nWe took the tour of the mansion and the Frick Art Museum.  Current exhibits include The Road to Impressionism: Barbizon Landscapes from the Walters Art Museum and 1806, Jena, a significant late-nineteenth-century painting by French artist Jean-Louis-Ernest Meissonier.  \n\nThere is a lot to see and do at the Frick.  Get off your butts Pittsburghers and enjoy this place!
What a Frick-ing fantastic place!\n\nThe Frick Art & Historical Center has all the bases covered when it comes to museums: historical site, visual art, beautiful grounds, classic cars and buggies, restaurant, greenhouse.  Not to mention that everything -- with the exception of the house tour -- is free.  No one could possibly say there's *nothing* that here interests him here.  Husband certainly couldn't convince me.\n\nI kid.  He's a trooper.\n\nWe arrived at the Frick on a gorgeous blue morning and started out with an excellent tour of the Frick family abode.  When the family moved to New York City after Henry Clay struck it rich in the steel business, they kept their house in Pittsburgh for return visits to the city; 93% of what's in the house is original to the Frick family, which always makes a house tour more interesting to me.  They lived lavishly, and Frick was an avid art collector.  His personal collection -- displayed both in the home and museum -- is impressive.\n\nAfter our tour we visited the Car and Carriage Museum, which had husband transfixed with its Model T Touring Car, Rolls Royce Silver Ghost, American Bantam Convertible Coupe, Panhard et Levassor Tonneau and Lincoln Model K Sport Phaeton among others.  Finally, we finished up with a spin around the Art Museum itself.  It's a beautiful building with a very manageable size.  I was thrilled to find a current exhibition of Medieval Persian pottery -- found along the ancient Silk Road route -- currently running as well.\n\nSay what you will about H. C. Frick (let's be real: the Johnstown Flood and handling of the Homestead Strike would have tarnished Mother Teresa's image), the Museum and Historical Site are *well* worth your time.
How have I been living in Pittsburgh for over a year without a visit to this awesome site?!  My husband and I finally paid a visit to the Frick thanks to the \"We Love Our Members\" promotion that local museums were offering to their members.  (We are members at the Carnegie).  I was vaguely familiar with who Frick was and knew there was a house tour, but I had no idea how much this site had to offer.  \n\nOur visit began with a trip into the shop/visitor's center.  There we browsed the gift shop while waiting for the tour to begin.  The gift shop building was once a playhouse for the children and you can still see where gutters for the bowling alley run through the middle of the floor.  It was a great place to start the tour and begin learning about the family and their connection to the area and American industry.  I am not a Pittsburgh native, so I knew very little about them.  It is important to note that you can't bring large bags with you on the tour, but they do provide free lockers to store them while you are in the house.\n\nThe tour continued by entering the house.  The enclosed porch provides a coat rack so you don't have to lug it around with you.  The house is detailed as if the Frick family was still living there.  We learned from our docent that they were fortunate that one of the family members lived there through the 1980s, so the house was well maintained and preserved.  Each room has exquisite detail and decor.  Our guide spent a great deal of time explaining and showcasing the art work.  Many local Pittsburgh artists were featured along with well known artists such as Monet.  Every aspect of the rooms were detailed including showcasing the new development at the time, aluminum.  The rooms upstairs featured less detail but were still interesting.  \n\nAfter our visit to the house, we stopped in the green house.  I'm not that in to plants, but it was interesting to learn that the plants grown there are used in the cafe.\n\nSpeaking of the cafe, we stopped in just to check it out.  They were fully booked that day (which is fine since we weren't planning on eating anyway) but we were so enticed by the dessert selections that we got two desserts to go.  A nutella cheese cake and a baked apple.  We enjoyed those later that evening after dinner.\n\nI am not that in to cars, but the car and carriage museum was very interesting.  The first section is carriages that the Frick family used.  My favorite was their \"special occasion\" carriage that even had  foot warmer!  The car area featured various automobiles that had a connection to Pittsburgh.  There is also the option of watching three short videos about automobiles in Pittsburgh.\n\nThe art museum alone is worth a visit.  They were preparing for an exhibit when we were there so only the Italian and French sections were open, but they were fantastic.  A great collection with amazing detail and descriptions of each of the paintings.  The interior of the building is an attraction itself.  It does not look like it was built in the 1960s with the fantastic marble and woodwork.\n\nOverall, a very enjoyable place to visit that I highly recommend to anyone because there really is something for everyone at Frick.
An often overlooked gem in the heart of Pittsburghs most beautiful neighborhood.\n\nThe Frick is essentially 5 small sights in one. \n\nThe grounds.  Nice 5 acre area that is well maintained giving a park like atmosphere.\n\nThe greenhouse. Lovely little greenhouse you can walk through.\n\nThe car museum is neat but currently closed for 18 months.  An early electric and steam car are the highlights.  Lots of olds rolls royces.\n\nThe cafe. Food.\n\nThe Clayton house.  12 dollar tour worth every penny.  The house tour takes about one hour and really is fascinating.  Not a huge mansion.\n\n\nAll in all just a nice place.
The best place for an artic swirl. :)
Hubby and I have taken to driving up Carson street to get to the Southside in order to avoid that HORRENDOUS traffic in Squirrel Hill.  We drove by Page Dairy Mart a few times and each time he would casually mention that he would like to go there someday.\n\nWell, we did.\n\nI wish I could comment on one of the DELICIOUS looking Sundaes, but I'm watching what I eat soooo... frozen yogurt it was.\n\nWhat I can say is that the yogurt was smooth and creamy and I LOVE that they have a ton of flavors they can \"mix into\" the yogurt so you can get almost any flavor you want.  Hubby had a cone of regular soft serve ice cream and said it was really yummy.  He also had an order of cheese sticks and said they were just o.k., so we will probably stick to ice cream/frozen yogurt from this place.\n\nThe kids working were fast and friendly so we left them a nice tip.  As someone who worked her way through college working at a frozen yogurt shop I can say -- TIP YOUR SERVERS, even if just your change -- they will greatly appreciate it.  :-)
Stopped in here after a bit of night time sightseeing of Pittsburgh. My sister and brother-in-law, who are the ones who live in Pitt, had never been here before, so we were all newbies! Huge plus that it's open until 11pm on weekdays. This little place is great. You walk up to the order window, pick from a handful of different soft serve favors and cone choices, and are given your fresh ice cream in no time! I ordered the strawberry soft serve in a waffle cone. HUGE portion, and less than $3! Obviously shocking to me as a native New Yorker, since nothing around here is ever that cheap. My sister had cheesecake soft serve, my other sister had blueberry soft serve, both also in waffle cones. My brother-in-law had key lime soft serve in a pretzel cone! So unique and actually really delicious, having that savory/sweet thing going on. 4 cones of ice cream for less than $12. Fresh, homemade ice cream, with really nice staff. I look forward to my next visit to pittsburgh, so I can enjoy this place again!
Great ice-cream at a reasonable price. I love their chocolate banana milkshake.
Get a Southside Shake with hot fudge shake and peanut butter sundae on top - absolutely amazing!
This place is a little gem! Hidden just down E Carson, past all the shops and busy streets there is a tiny little unassuming building on a large corner lot. I've never been a fan of soft serve or gone out of my way for it, but this place will make you do just that. Not to mention the fresh squeezed lemonade made to order (yes, they squeeze the lemons right into your cup.) Burgers and fries are also made to order, so be prepared for a short wait while you prepare mentally for the heaven you're about to consume. I'm not a fan of their fries (they tasted like they were made in old grease) but wow that cheeseburger. I have a small appetite and can't usually finish most things - so when I ordered my burger and fries I let the bf know he was expected to finish it for me. Little did we know he wouldn't get any of that delicious burger, because the second I took the first bite the rest magically disappeared. \n\nOh! They also have old fashioned dip cones which are one of my favs. \n\nDefinitely recommended.
I have had lots of items off of their large menu and everything has been good.
I've been coming to page's since I was about 5, literally. I love it. It's a local favorite for sure and for many reasons. 1) the history behind page's... Literally if you walk behind page's there are old photos of what the building used to look like and some south side history :P. 2) their ice cream is incredibleeee. They have a ton of unique flavors and combinations. My favorite item on the menu is their strawberry sundae with twist ice cream, with an Esther's chocolate covered pretzel on the side. Pure heaven. 3) their food is amazing as well. I love their south side hot dog! It's unique and amazing.. Toast bun, grilled dog and chilli sauce.. So good. Their fries are awesome as well. I also adore their lemonade, both regular and freckled. Keep in mind they are cash only though!
I gotta give my man Jonathan kudos for some recent changes he's implemented.  The upstairs now has a menu with smaller lighter items for the bar.  I can now finally go here and just grab an app' at the bar without having the customary food coma afterwards after his multicourse feast.  He's upgraded the staff and kept the pro's from the past (marney and errol).  Steve and Clint are good newer additions as server and bartender.  This is only my second 5 star review, probably should deserve 4.5, but wtf it's so obvious he cares and appreciates the business so much.  The food is still great, the patio is nice, the hood' location is still scary and fun and the smaller menu items and additional staff are appreciated.  I do wish he had more options than just italian wine, but last night we were able to find a great white.  The salmon carpaccio last night is the best I've ever had.  The mussels with diablo sauce was also excellent.  I  don't know of any other small restaurant chef in Pittsburgh that takes as much care in the quality of ingredients used (except for Douglas Dick at Bona Terra).  In my original post I said it was a bit pricey, but I've decided it's well worth the cost now.  I also tried a ceviche here that was out of this world.  There's definitely a lot more to have at this italian place than just pasta and red sauce.
Some people train for marathons, other people train for this meal. Before sitting down make sure you get in the proper state of mind and prepare yourself for a long night of indulgence. This being my first dining experience at Alla Famiglia, I was unaware of the challenge that I had undertaken. We had A Party of Five, empty bellies and an optimistic mentality; we couldn't resist the tempting appetizers recited to us and ended up ordering the mega meatball, calamari and shrimp, and sausage over polenta. All were amazing. The meatball was the highlight: twelve ounces of perfectly cooked beef, filled with mozzarella and covered in sauce and provolone (kisses fingers). Big plus for including the tentacles in the calamari. I've noticed these legs less and less while dining out, when did they lose suction as a staple of a calamari appetizer? Also adorning our table were a few clothing options in which to dress the bread, all of them enjoyable on their own or as an ensemble.\n\nOne would think after such a hearty opener all that remained was the main course. How wrong of an assumption that turned out to be. Before we could even think about crushing our dinners, we had to face two formidable courses of salad and pasta. As mentioned by other reviewers, the salad is great. Nice dressing, nice fillers, nice roughage. The pasta that's included with the entree was a fusilli bucati in a vodka sauce served family style. Unable to pass up the promise of a great carbonara with guanciale and fresh egg, we had two pasta opponents to tackle. Both were cooked so perfectly al dente I would have put them on my NHL all-star ballot as a write-in if voting hadn't already closed.\n\nAt this point in the meal, I had completely forgotten that I still hadn't even seen my main course. And I was fine with that. As a table we compiled quite the culinary collection: bistecca fiorentina, veal milanese, veal marsala, mussels in a diavola sauce and the sea bass special for the evening. You know when a meal is so utterly divine that you just stop talking to everyone around you and have a one on one pow wow with the gastro-gods? Yeah, that's what happened. I will say at one point during the meal, my brother had to get up and take a walk around the restaurant for fear he would wake up two days later in the ICU if he didn't fight off the impending food coma that threatened his existence. Instead of napkins they should have given us a white towel and a trainer to throw it on the table for us because we were doing our best impression of Apollo Creed...and our food was Ivan Drago.\n\nOur waiter, who we thought was our friend, then had the nerve to ask if we wanted dessert, some balls on that guy. Of course we wanted dessert. We decided on the tiramisu which I hope had a clean bill of health because it blew our minds. It was so good that I was upset with myself. I did exactly what I hate seeing someone do on any and every food network show. I took a bite, put down my fork, closed my eyes and just said, \"wow!\" I just hope it was as good for the tiramisu.\n\nOther housekeeping items: you can bring your own wine for which they charge a corking fee. All the water is bottled, but I didn't see it on the bill so I figure it's included. The chef/owner is extremely friendly and accessible, as he is cooking basically right next to your table. Parking at the meters next to the building is free after 6pm, despite what it says on the signs; our waiter informed us they have an unspoken agreement with the parking authority.\n\nHeavy on the belly, heavy on the wallet, heavy in our hearts!
Always fantastic.
Incredible Italian food. Mushroom appetizer is just phenomenal. So is the mozzarella cheese. Great fish. Expensive but worth it!
Might be the best restaurant I have been to in Pittsburgh! Made reservations on a Friday evening at 9:00PM for two.\n\nApps: The service was great, the server knew all menu items in detail by heart. We started with 2 appetizers my fiance wanted the Calamari and Shrimp that was in a garlic, herb lemon sauce...best shrimp I have ever had, they were colossal! I ordered the Meatball stuffed with bufala mozzarella smothered in a plum tomato sauce, it was unbelievable! \nThe salads course was great and I'm not a salad guy. We were both almost full at this point and we still had the pasta and entree course ahead.\n\nThe Pasta Course: The owner wheels out a cart to our table with a whole wheel of Locatelli Pecorino Romano, in which he will use to make our Cacio e Pepe, table side. He pours 2 portions of linguini on top of the cheese wheel, adding the heavy cream, EVOO and pepper, he mixes and digs into the top layer of the cheese wheel and serves it into our bowls.\n\nEntrees: I ordered the Veal Chop Milanese, I was so full at this point I took 2 bites out of my Veal and couldn't go anymore, but this was the best veal chop I have ever had, had to take the rest home. My Fianc\u00e9, she ordered the Chilean Sea Bass, but was equally as full, the fish was perfectly prepared and melted in your mouth, she took all, but 2 bites home also. Unbelievable experience!!
Fabulous!
good food, we had the bean appetizer, seafood diablo, and the flounder...It is expensive but well worth the money, classic.
Incredibly authentic Italian cuisine. If your looking for a memorable spot with some of the most delicious actually Italian dishes then look no further than Alla Famiglia. This is a restaurant to celebrate an occasion at such as New Years, Valentines Day, Anniversaries,etc. \nmy girlfriend and I came here for New Year's Eve and we could not have enjoyed it more. To start we had the Alla Famiglia Meatball. I couldn't get over the rich tomato sauce that the meatball was surrounded in and the smoothness of the actual meat. Just delicious, must have.\nWhen you order an entree you also get their house salad served in a homemade Italian vinaigrette (light and complimenting to the diverse salad topped with great peppers!) and their Penne Alla Vodka. This pasta dish alone is enough to warrant a visit . I am a alla vodka lover and this is the best I've ever had. It's hard to describe but its not to rich or creamy it's absolutely just right. The pasta itself was so smooth and melted in your mouth with their sauce.\n\nFor entree my girlfriend had their Ahi Tuna Steak (special). Prepared perfectly and with a great lemon butter sauce. I had their speciality, their double cut Veal Chop. This is something straight out of The Flintstones in its portion but let me tell you it's with every penny. I had the Veal Chop Pizzoaloa style wivh was with hot & sweet peppers, a great tomato sauce covered in provolone cheese. This was such a moist Veal Chop that literally fell off the bone and with the marbling it just melted in your mouth. \nEverything was spectacular , it's a restaurant you have to visit if your in the area at least once given you are willing to spend for your meal. $$$$ but you absolutely get what you pay for.
Just recently returned. PHENOMENAL meal! Glenn our waiter was superb. Loved the veal dishes.  I also enjoyed the new cocktail menu. One of the drinks was iced coffee with orangicello and frangelica cream. DELICIOUS!
UPDATED: Just wanted to share that we attempted to visit for a third time when my husband's brother was in town in mid-November of 2014.  We had reservations for 7:30 on a Tuesday, so we obviously figured we would be seated immediately.  The brother and his girlfriend arrived a couple minutes before the reservation and were told to go up to the bar while they set the table and wait for the rest of the party.  I arrived about a minute after and my husband a few minutes behind me as he needed to park due to the lack of valet during the week.  There was no one at the host stand when either of us came in.  So we went up to the bar, declined a drink... and waited, and waited.  The bartender soon became deeply involved in picking a wine for a couple at the bar, not his fault.  The brother eventually was able to flag down a waitress to ask if she could check on our table.  She looked very annoyed.  She eventually went over to the phone at the bar, called down, hung up the phone and said, dead pan, \"no, it's not ready yet.\"  Not a smile, not a sorry, not a \"can we get you a drink on the house?\" Meanwhile, there was an open table for 4 on that floor.  The bartender eventually told us \"that's for a reservation.\" \"Yes, we have a reservation... for 25 minutes ago.\"  \"They must have specifically requested that table.\"  They did, however, offer us the table right next to the door on the first floor though - the one with the 10 degree breeze coming in that night.  No thank you.  We were very insulted by the lack of table for our reservation, but more so by the lack of acceptable service.  We decided to leave and spend $20 on pizza instead of $100+ per person and enjoyed much better service.. which is never the way it should be.  Hopefully they solve this problem soon.  We'll give it one more go when the insult has worn off.\n\nMy husband won't hesitate to tell you what his favorite restaurant in Pittsburgh is: Alla Famiglia.  And to be honest, these days I agree with him!  \n\nWhile my husband enjoys many of the more \"up and coming\" restaurants with smaller portions and interesting flavor combinations, he often finds himself longing for the same quality food with better cuts of meat and bigger portions.  This is where we satisfy both of our appetites for big flavor and, well, big portions.  But to reduce Alla Famiglia to those two things alone would not do it justice.\n\nLet's start out instead with addressing the two biggest critiques of this place: its location and the price.  Yes, it is in Allentown, but they also have plenty of parking and valet if you prefer.  Honestly, we drive almost everywhere to get dinner, so this is not an issue for us.  The other thing I always hear about is how expensive it is.  Some of those complaints come from people who I know have no problem giving their money to the big steakhouse chains, while getting a lot less value.  No, it is not cheap.  You will likely pay upwards of $50 for your entry.  The veal chops are close to $70.  But, that's not all you get.  You get delicious, fresh baked bread, a spread, dipping oil and gustoso for same, a delicious salad, and homemade pasta served family style.  If you wanted to be especially frugal, you could approach this place like an Olive Garden senior special: feast on the freebies and take your entree to go.  But, even if you're full, it may be too difficult not to savor the meal as it comes out...\n\nI've been here twice and my husband has been here three times (lucky - he got to go for work and he said they ordered almost every appetizer, all of which were apparently delicious).  The first time I ordered the filet with gorgonzola.  It was one of the most delicious and largest filets I've ever had.  My husband ordered a veal chop with prosciutto which I don't think I recognized on the current menu, but he absolutely loved it.  The veal chop is one of the largest bone-in cuts of meat I've seen and the sear on it was absolutely perfect.  We also ordered the mussels, which were spicy and delicious, and the meatball appetizer, which I remember being tasty, but nothing too out of the ordinary.  I think there are other things on the menu to try first. \n\nThe second time we came I ordered the Milanese veal chop, breaded, slightly citrusy, and absolutely heavenly.    He had the cowboy ribeye which was also large and an absolutely beautiful cut of meat.  The husband has a thing about fatty cuts and avoiding anything that is the least bit chewy, and he barely had to leave a piece on his plate.  We also got the calamari appetizer, which was perfectly, lightly fried with a savory, garlic sauce that sets it apart from the sweet sauces often served with calamari.\n\nFinally, I should note that the service we have received here has always been exceptional.  Everyone is always professional and courteous.
Never thought I would be reviewing a bank, but that's the beauty of yelp! You can review so much more than just restaurants! \n\nI live fairly close to this bank and my parents use dollar bank, which is basically the reason I use them. I have been with this bank for about 8 years or so and have never had a problem with them! I love their free checking and I have a savings account with them as well. Their home equity is awesome too- fixed interest rate of 3.25%. \n\nThis particular branch has very helpful and friendly employees. They have a drive thru and it is always quick and easy. They will even give your dog a treat if they are in the car :). I've also never experienced long lines in this branch which is always nice!
This is one of my favorite bars in Pittsburgh. They have  been getting a lot of bands to play. Especially font of the Wednesday night Blue Grass jam night. The hummus is great. The staff is exceptionally friendly and knows my name. They have a great beer selection too.
Really great place to go. There was bluegrass music playing when I went which was a pleasant surprise. It wasn't too loud, so you could talk with others at your table. The food and service was great. Definitely want to come back here again
Crap!  I can't believe that I missed a \"First to Review\" by just a matter of weeks.  Max's Allegheny Tavern has been a shining star and a \"must\" for my Pittsburgh rotation of places to visit.  Years ago, when I worked on the Northside for Heinz, I spent many a rowdy Friday night here in the basement with factory workers.  \n\nWhat's there to say?  It's a Northside institution and always has a mixed crowd that is super cool and friendly.  The bartenders are friendly and manage to remember my name and drink choice even though I'm here only a few times a year.  My Friday nights here must have made quite an impression!  I love the decor here, dark wood paneling with lots of stained glass, and the downstairs bar is where the naughty people hang.  Jukebox and room for dancing.  The food is very homey and very reasonably priced.  The German nachos are always worth ordering, and they are smothered with Gouda cheese.  The spatzle is also a creamy indulgent treat.  And for those seeking the real Deutsch culinary experience, they have a large variety of sausages and schnitzels.  So it's a sausage factory in more ways than one.
I like this restaurant so much I had my wedding rehearsal dinner here.  (Both the families liked the food very much.)  Max's is the best German food in Pittsburgh -- actually, it's the best German food I've had outside of Germany, and I've definitely had worse meals in Germany as well.\n\nMax's is in a restored hotel, and the decor is very much in the Victorian style of the original hotel building.  The exception is the bar area that's good for happy hour or watching a game, or just having a beer -- that has a lot of neon and a jukebox.  But the bar area is also tasteful and pleasant to be in.  Max's has a full bar, but their real specialty is their excellent selection of German beers, both in bottles and on tap.\n\nI haven't met a wurst I didn't like, and they're pretty much all offered here.  The Braunschweiger sandwich is pretty delicious and unique in my experience, and the schnitzels are very delicious as well.  Another specialty is the kase spatzle (Spatzle noodles with smoked Gouda cheese -- a twist on mac and cheese that ensures that even a picky child will have something to enjoy here), but my two favorite menu picks here are the hassenpfeffer and the spinach salad with warm bacon dressing.  For sides, the red cabbage salad is my favorite, although the sauerkraut is also very good.  I don't care for the German potato salad, however -- I like the kind that has caraway seeds and vinegar, and is served cold, but Max's offers the kind that has an unidentifiable sauce and is served warm.  Some people like that style of potato salad though, and from what I can tell, Max's does a decent rendition of it.\n\nIf you're looking to reserve a room here for a banquet, you have a lot of options.  The basement \"Rathskellar\" is more bar-like in its atmosphere.  It would be a good place for some guys to have a birthday party or something.  For a rehearsal dinner or other formal event, one of the upstairs banquet rooms would be better.  Depending on the size of your group, you can arrange to have a buffet-style dinner, or individuals in the group can order directly off the regular dinner menu.
Definitely my favorite German restaurant, this place brings back memories.... often a bit negative as it's right near the hospital... yes, my Mom took me there after my arm breaking fiasco, that time I got hit by the car, etc., etc. (I was obviously an uncoordinated child), but also wonderful as I could literally lose myself in their vast array of tasty foods.  It's definitely a North Side staple, and the atmosphere has a \"well worn\" appeal with old pictures of the local Germanic community and of the area.  This place has it's own personality, which is a plus in my opinion!\n\nAs for the food... well, you can't find much better German food than this and at this price!  Both of my parents favor the peasant platter.  Me, I love the stuffed pretzel appetizer, all the different sausages (the weisswurst is amazing!), and their kasespatzle (thick, doughy egg noodles with butter and cheese).  I will always associate Max's with the best, most flavorful German food at an affordable price!
Not only does this place have a very nice atmosphere, the food is good (and cheap) too!\nFor under 10 dollars a person we each got:\n-A drink\n-A Bradtwurst sausage\n-2 giant potato pancakes, served with sourcream (note that these are NOT latkes)\n-A huge bowl of saurkraut, which also contained some pork and cranberries.\nDelicious home-baked bread, which was served with some saurkraut (prepared differently than the side) and apple-butter sauce.\n\nYUM!\n\nIt's hard not to like this place. I'm still having cravings for those pancakes :(
A Pittsburgh tradition.  Try the Cheese stuffed pretzel appetizer, Count Esterhazy Schnitzel, and Apple Strudel (of course) for dessert.  Yum
I have been going to Max's for 20 years.  I love this place.  The Einlauf soup is just simple good eats, but if you're ever there when the soup special is beer cheese - ORDER IT!!.  I love their potato pancakes, sauerbraten and the basket of German rolls served with sauerkraut salad and apple butter.  The waitresses have been there for years, they are the best!  Most delicious long island iced tea in the city.
This is my favorite restaurant on the Northside, possibly favorite restaurant in all of Pittsburgh.  I tell all my friends that this little restaurant is the best kept secret in Pittsburgh.  Max's is a quaint little German place that always has plenty of seating, even on Friday and Saturday nights.  The service is good.  The food is great, I always end up getting the potato pancakes.  If you are looking for a place to check out that isn't going to be as crowded and will be more \"authentic\" German food than other places you should definitely come to Max's!
Excellent German food.  I went in for an early lunch, the service was great.  Had a whole feast of great dishes.  The best sauerkraut i've ever had -- subtle, with caraway.  Sweet and sour cabbage, potato salad, spaetzle, a great weisswurst, and a great wheat beer on tap.
I honestly can't get enough of this place.  We used to come here after going to Pirates games since its right up the road.  Now its one of my favorite places to go out with my friends.\n\nIts a bit pricey (~$15/person), but the quality and quantity is superb.  The service is pretty good.  The atmosphere has a nice feel to it, perhaps its the antiquity.. I love the cuckoo clock and tapestries they have.\n\nNow, to the food:\nThe bread they give you... with apple butter!! ... is very fresh and tasty.  Try not to fill up on it while waiting on your huge main course.. The Bavarian soft pretzels were warm and soft when we ordered them.  Also delicious.\n\nThe sampler platter is a great deal if you don't know yet what you like.  You get 3 entrees and the typical sides for ~$16.  My favorite, though, is the schnitzel liechtenstein, with sauerkraut and potato pancakes.  Fresh and delicious everytime.\n\nI would definitely recommend this place to anybody who likes ethnic, or German/Bavarian food, or just trying new stuff.  It's awesome.
I work on the North Shore and have heard many coworkers rave about Max's.  When I finally tried it, I wish I had not waited so long.  Entering Max's is like going into your grandmother's living room.  Very welcoming and nostalgic.\n\nThe menu is bigger than I expected with a variety of traditional appetizers and sandwiches along with a large selection of German items.  Everything from multiple varieties of schnitzels, sausages, chickens and a sampler platter that lets you choose a combination of all of the above.  All of the items we tried were full of flavor and served at the perfect temperature.  Speaking of being full, the food is very rich so you will leave with a full stomach.  \n\nThey have a good selection of beers and even offer a sampler option.  The dessert selection looked delicious, but we were beyond stuffed so will have to savor them on a future visit.  I can't wait to go back!
Tremendous selection of German dishes.  All the sausages come from a particular manufacturer in Wisconsin that uses 100 year old methods of making them (according to the menu).  I don't know if that's a good thing or not, but they taste terrific.  \n\nThe options for sides are as plentiful as the moan dishes and the hot bacon potato salad was awesome.  \n\nDefinitely recommend giving this a try.
Max's is great. It feels like your German grandmothers house and the service matches this feeling. The food is authentic and inexpensive. If you are not too familiar with German food, just ask and the waitress will walk you though the favorites.\n\nI love the sausages and the stuffed pretzels are amazing, but the Apple Fritter is the greatest thing ever.
Man, I just love this place.  Pennsylvanian German for sure. Some peeps don't know the Difference. If you want real Pennsylvanian German food, then this is your place. This is the kind of food that my grandmother cooked up in Erie, and my uncle sells at the butcher shop in Girard.  Go in the off hours; cause the bar is packed at lunch and late. Also go ahead and put a coin in the machine! You'll see. It pisses the bar crowd off temporarily but so worth it!
I love this place.  The atmosphere, the bartenders, the waitresses and most of all the food. The potato pancakes are delicious as are all their soups. I think there is something for everyone here. Their desserts are all delicious. We eat here before most concert or sporting event.
I somehow discovered this place when searching for sandwich places to enjoy with a friend.  How I have never noticed it when walking by it on East Ohio Street, not 10 minutes from my house, I will never understand.  Maybe because the entrance is set back from the sidewalk a bit, so it looks dark (i.e. possibly closed) when you first walk by.  Or maybe because it's overshadowed by the Isaly's next door.  Please, I beg of you, fellow Yelpers, don't ignore this place any longer!\n\nPlease note, as other reviewers have, that North Shore Deli is cash only.  But believe me, you won't need much.  They do have a website that really just lists the sandwiches they offer and their hours or see my photo of the menu board showing the sandwiches available (all named after local streets).  \n\nIt was difficult to decide on just one sandwich.  But after reading the few reviews here, I decided to go with the hot sausage.  When I first arrived, the meat was still cooking.  I didn't mind, I told the gentleman I would return and took a stroll over to Priory for some sweet treats for later.  When I returned, I was the only patron there but was greeted again and friendly small talk ensued.  I opted for a side of macaroni salad as well.  \n\nWhen I got home and unwrapped my sandwich, I was surprised by the hot sausage that looked like it was exploding at both ends.  And that it was, my friends.  Exploding with flavor, that is.  The ends were crispy and delicious and the sausage was just hot enough that the macaroni salad was the perfect cool salad compliment.  I guarantee you, this is only the first of many visits.
You really need to try's this place. Great sandwiches, a hot dog/sausage cart, and friendly service!
We've stayed here twice during recent trips to Pittsburgh, and while the city itself is a bit hit and miss, the Priory is always comfortable and welcoming. A great place to escape after a long drive or a stressful drive around the maze of roads and traffic that make up Pittsburgh.\n\nEach room is pretty unique and always well appointed and very clean. The staff are friendly and helpful with whatever you might need and it's an easy drive to most of the attractions around town.
Great european style boutique hotel.  You can not beat this hotel for the money!
Awesome fast pizza
I was fortunate enough to enjoy a Saturday night Oktoberfest celebration here this past weekend. A friend of mine is a member of this private German heritage club, and got tickets for me and our lady friends for this celebration.\n\nWe brought our own steins (which cost varying prices to fill throughout the night depending on whom we asked), but were always full of beer from excellent breweries like Spaten and Hofbrauhaus. We enjoyed a phenomenal buffet, with two delicious wursts, pork cutlets, potato pancakes, sauerkraut, and a whole mess of tasty German sides dishes. And we spent the next three or four hours in a handsome ballroom with folks as much as three times our age, drinking beer and enjoying awesomely German music from \"Fred Zurich and His Sound Machine\".\n\nWhat a great time this place was! I've never had so much fun being 1/4 German in all my life. If you have a chance to visit, take it!
Good neighborhood bar/restaurant. Always good food. Never got sick, or anyone I was with get sick. Have been there with another person upto party's of 10. Always friendly staff. Usually goto Billy's once a month, maybe more. Living right on top of the hill from Billy's, we are regulars there!
There are actually 4 museums in the Carnegie Museum group in Pittsburgh. I'll review the Natural History and Art Museums in this review (separate review for the Warhol forthcoming.)\n\nThe low-down - for $15 you get admission to both the Natural History Museum and the Art Museum. It is well worth the money as you can spend hours on both sides.\n\nThe Natural History Museum is a dinosaur lover heaven. The fossils are seriously awesome, especially the one that you see when you walk in (that is still in the huge rock face.)  Just a great collection and definitely a good place for families.\n\nThe art museum has some great items in it - the Monet probably stands out for most people. I loved the \"Chariot of Aurora\" installation - a 32 panel wall that once graced the luxury cruiseliner Normandie. There were plenty of gems in the modern collection besides the Monet - loved the John Singer Sargent and the Bourgerou. \n\nAlso impressive was the Hall of Architecture and the Hall of Sculpture. These transform you into another place and time while you are there. \n\nI thoroughly enjoyed the time I spent here and would not hesitate to come here again. Highly recommended.
Totally incredible way to spend an afternoon with my family - these museums have it all! Since we have a family membership (which I highly recommend), we typically pop in for an hour or two at a time, focusing on different areas of the complex in Oakland every time we go. Our daughter seems to enjoy the dinosaurs the most, but she's also intrigued by the art collection! My favorite part is the Hall of Architecture, filled with many incredible casts of facades and sculptures. Just the fact that they have casts of the Venus de Milo and Nike of Samothrace is unbelieveable - I don't think that casting of these timeless works of art is even allowed anymore. Don't miss out on the basement kid's room, because it's full of hands-on activities for the young ones.\n\nWe will definitely keep our membership current as the years go on - it's timeless, and always fun!
It's the first time I've \"Yelped\" anything other than a restaurant. However, after spending the better part of a day enjoying the Art/Natural History Museums, I'm branching out...guess I'm way overdue! \n\nUndoubtedly, there are plenty of bores who cannot imagine a quality museum anywhere west of Bilbao. Pay them no mind. The range and quality of exhibits at the Carnegie are rightly rich sources of pride and accomplishment to the organization and Pittsburgh. And, each and every staff member I spoke with was courteous, helpful and obviously well trained...something that's not always the case in many exalted European settings. If you're traveling with children you'll appreciate the numerous interactive areas created for the kids.  \n\nPittsburgh is so much more than football, hockey and salads with hidden french fries (tell me again why they do that?). You'll completely understand when you visit the Carnegie Museums.
Decided to hit this place before hitting on 12 while the dealer shows a 9 at the Rivers.   We didn't have a reservation but the server seated us anyways (we had to be done by 7).  It is BYOB but they deal you a $4 corkage fee per person drinking.  The bread sticks were fresh and warm and were the perfect accompaniment to the delicious soup du jour, potato soup.  The side salad that comes with the meal would make the hall of fame for any side salad league.  It came with olives, Gorgonzola, julienned carrots and other veggies.  I had the pork tenderloin with veggies and mashed potatoes.   The tenderloin was perfectly cooked and the mashed potatoes were like having two aces in the hole.   It would be tough to find a better waitstaff.   Plates disappeared, water was filled, and I never knew they were there.  If your looking for a place to try before going to the casino or bucco game this is a sure bet, just call ahead for reservations.  They do have outdoor seating but the views wont show up on any postcard.  PS The 7:00 reservation called to say they were going to be late so we were allowed to relax at the table till 7:30.
This is our favorite restaurant, bar none. The food is terrific, the service is top notch, they remember our names and it always feels special when we dine there. I've never had a pasta special I didn't adore. \n\nI truly feel like they are happy to see us when we come in the door and go to extra pains to treat us well and we are just an average couple who aren't spending hundreds. That doesn't matter - we are their customers. \n\nWe've been by for lunch which is very competitive price wise with nearby restaurants.
We made reservations for my mother's birthday for 14. No one in my family had ever been to the restaurant; we used yelp and trip advisor to find it.  They were ready for us and everything was fabulous.  \n\nI had spaghetti and meatball.  The pasta was perfectly done. The kitchen was great.  Everyone got their meals almost at the same time (which is very hard for a small restaurant with a big group).  The people were professional and friendly.  The BYOB allowed us to have wine that suited everyone's taste.  They did the pasta and non-pasta dishes very well.  \n\nThis small restaurant is a gem in an up and coming neighborhood.  We walked from the Priory Hotel on a beautiful March evening.
Service is friendly and quick! Everything comes at a timely manner and all the food is fairly priced. Although it's a little small, it's really amazing! The pasta is incredible!
I have been here several times and always have a great experience! The food is always delicious, the staff is super friendly, and there are plenty of different dishes to choose from. The desserts are particularly great! The apple pie is delicious :)
I've eat'n here a few times over the last couple of years and have been very pleased with both the food and service every time.  I most recently was there on this past Saturday, which I don't recommend showing up on a Saturday without reservations,  we got the last two seats at the bar and were lucky to get those.  We ordered the pasta special and it was amazing.  It was shrimp and crab ravioli in a white wine sauce, cooked with asparagus, roasted yellow peppers, and mushrooms.  It was probably the best ravioli I ever had.  It was topped with four huge pieces of shrimp cooked to perfection.  Most meals come with either soup or salad, either is guaranteed to be delicious, and some bread served with olive oil for dipping.  Some other things I've had that I really enjoyed were the spaghetti and meatball, the hot anti-pasta, and their fudge.  Everything has a very home cooked feel to it, better than mom used to make.  They also use the freshest of ingredients, the secret to any good Italian meal.  The service here is very good too, and very friendly.  If you want a good home cooked Italian meal and warm, friendly atmosphere, this is the place for you.
I ate here this past Friday evening with my girlfriend and two other dining companions.  I had made 7 PM reservations for us and we arrived shortly before that to a table that was ready for us.  The inside of the restaurant is actually much tinier than I had expected with as many people crammed in as possible.  It probably was helped that the night we were there, there was a party of 10+ next to us.  They would also order just before us understandably leading to some slower service times for us which I would guess is not the norm.  Other than it being crowded there was not much else in the dining room to look, just some table and chairs as well as some pictures on the walls.\n\nFor dinner my girlfriend and I decided to start of the evening with the polenta to share.  It came out cut into pieces and served with some sweet sausage and a pesto drizzle.  I thought that the sweet sausage was the best part of it with the polenta being ok while my girlfriend really enjoyed the polenta.  For our dinner entrees I ordered the Penne Vodka which came with a tomato basil cream sauce and prosciutto while my girlfriend went with the Penne Parma that had some artichoke hearts, roasted red peppers, olives and sweet sausage in a garlic wine sauce.  Both pastas also came with salads before the meal and both my girlfriend and I ordered the house balsamic dressing.  The salads came topped with many different things and I thought that they were pretty good salads for being included in the meal.  The Penne Vodka that I ordered ended up being really good!  It was delivered when still at a fairly hot temperature and I really enjoyed the sauce.  It's only peculiar item was that the prosciutto was almost off to the side and not in the pasta which I found to be odd but I still enjoyed it.  Even though I really enjoyed my pasta, I actually thought that my girlfriends meal tasted better.  The garlic wine sauce on hers was awesome and made each bite of her entr\u00e9e that I had a treat.\n\nThe bottom line for me is that I would definitely head back here again.  I was very happy with all of the food that we had and also loved that the prices were good for the quality of food that they were serving.
After reading some peoples reviews I wasn't sure of this place. My boyfriend and I decided to go anyways. All I can say is, wow you people don't know food if you left a negative remark! Our food was phenomenal. The service was phenomenal. No it isn't a super fancy place, but the food is incredible and very reasonably priced. Our $56 dinner was worth every penny. I had a special, he had ravioli's and we split a desert. Amazing little place that I will 100% go to again.
Caruso's is the best place to buy beer (and pop and snacks and smokes) on the northside by far. Hidden in its original spot in the Mexican War Streets, Caruso's is a home away from home. He has a wide range, from cheep crap to really really good stuff. If you don't see it he will try to get it in. You can go and just hang if you want as well. Dogs welcome. Family owned since 1930 and Sam has been there for 40 years. Do yourself a favor and stop by.
I haven't been a member of the Allegheny YMCA for very long, but I've had a great experience so far.\n\nThe building itself is on the older side -- I'd guess it's probably about 100 years old.  The equipment, however, is pretty modern, and many of the rooms have been retrofitted for modern gym conveniences such as air conditioning.  \n\nThe Allegheny YMCA has the following features:\n1) A room with cardio machines (some traditional elliptical trainers, some of the newer breed of elliptical trainers that are like a mating between a stair-stepper and an elliptical, rowing machines, and exercise bikes).  Most of the cardio machines are only about a year old and have those weird little TVs mounted on top, so you can see Barack Obama's mouth silently moving as you get your workout.\n2) A basketball court with a track on top of it (28 laps = 1 mile).\n3) A spinning studio.\n4) A pretty decent weightlifting room, with a good balance between weight machines and free weights.  There's also a good range of free weights, so a weakling like me and a strong man like the dude I saw with biceps bigger than my waist can both use the weight room.\n5) A pool that is not Olympic size, but is big enough to get in a decent workout by swimming lengths.\n6) Secure access to the women's locker room (as well as to the fancy men's locker room).\n7) A group exercise room.  Group exercise classes are included in the membership fee, and the instructors are really nice and also inspiring/motivating.  There's a good range of classes for all ages and fitness levels, including Pilates, yoga, water aerobics, spinning, and cardio kickboxing.\n\nThe membership fees are pretty reasonable here (a family membership for 2 adults and 2 children is $58/month plus a $125 joining fee), and if you are employed by UPMC, you get an additional discount.\n\nMost importantly, the Allegheny YMCA is a very welcoming place, regardless of your age, gender, or current fitness level.  Gyms can be intimidating if you aren't in the greatest shape to begin with, and some gyms have members who aren't kind towards women who aren't super-fit or super-skinny.  But at the Allegheny Y, everyone I have met has been extremely friendly and nice to me, which is the best incentive to keep going to the gym.
I'm still giving this Y five stars because I like the other patrons and the atmosphere so much; I just want to re-evaluate the place now that I've gotten way better at various activities.\n\nThe cardio room is still really, really good.  I've never had to wait for a machine, and the machines are quite nice and new still.  \n\nThe weightlifting room is also totally adequate, with pretty much a full complement of machines (older, but still serviceable), and a good assortment of free weights and related paraphernalia, including a Smith machine and a regular good ol' power cage.  There isn't any platform for Olympic lifts, and I haven't seen anyone in here perform them (there isn't a lot of room, so I'm not really sure how one would even go about powerlifting safely in this gym.)  However, there is a bucket of chalk in one corner.  Go figure.\n\nThe pool is fine if you aren't really hardcore into swimming.  If swimming is a major form of exercise for you, however, it might not be the best pool for your needs.  It's a four-lane pool, I think 25 yards long.  It is heavily chlorinated, and it tends to be QUITE warm, especially on Monday mornings (this is because kids with sickle-cell anemia use the pool on Sundays, and the water needs to be especially warm for them -- it hasn't cooled down yet by Monday.)  Since I am at Pitt, I have access to the pool at Trees Hall, which is superior by any metric, so I use that instead.\n\nI like this Y quite a lot and wouldn't consider switching, even though there are newer/fancier Y's in the area.
Awesome spot to grab a dog for a buck. Nothing fancy, must standard ingredients and friendly service.
Classic North Side staple.  The food is made to order, the service is fast, and the staff is great.  My stand order is hot dog with onions and a side of fries.  But the grilled cheese is also exceptional.  The lunch line can be unreal, so I usually just stop for dinner on my way home from work.\n\nCASH ONLY.
I came here with a party of 40 very hungry Pitt students. The food was amazing. We had roasted beef, chicken, and pasta. The management was lovely and really involved during any party issues. The staff was also very kind and able to keep everyone's glass full, despite our camel like drinking habits. Thank you!
Absolutely the best!!!  \n\nNot from Pittsburgh.  Was there on vacation with my kids.  They absolutely LOVED IT.  Even my youngest, who is hard to entertain, left the place praising it.  If you have kids and are in Pittsburgh, this is a great place to take them.  We have been to other city's children's museums and this is one of the best.\n\nThere are tons of stuff for them to do.  There is also a nice variety.  Something for everyone.  Even my wife and I were entertained.  The price of admission was well worth it considering movies are about $10 for only 1-2 hours.  We were there for at least 5 hrs and it didn't even feel like it.  The best was there were activities that left you with free \"souvenirs\".  We left with various art creations that the kids made that were really cool.
Oh my God. They're playing the chicken dance song on their website! Bahaha!\n\nSo what is so great about this place? Mister Rogers of course! For those not in the know, Fred Rogers was from Pittsburgh, so of course there will be a great display of his world somewhere in the city. And here it is. \n\nBeyond that there are always cool displays up in the rest of the museem. Bottom line: Great for adults and kids alike, another of the must see Pittsburgh sites.
Why would I be writing a review of a Children's museum when I don't have any children?!  Because it's an awesome museum, that's why!\n\nBut in all seriousness, they throw the best parties, mostly because they have thee coolest space to do it in!  When you go to a party at the museum you're allowed to \"play\" just like a kid would during regular business hours.  \n\nHave I gone down the twisted slide connected to the treehouse in a cocktail dress?  Yes I have!  Have I walked across the mini Pittsburgh bridge in the mini-Pittsburgh playroom?  Yes I have!  \n\nLike any good museum, they constantly have changing exhibits, so things I saw are probably not there anymore.  But the interactive exhibits are all about participation.  If it peeked my interest, I'm sure it would peek a child's! I have no doubt people of any age would have a great time here!
This place is amazing from top to bottom. 2 hours down we are still here.
This place is a blast for kids of all ages! All floors are packed full of great fun for kids, and make this place a nice way to spend a lazy Saturday with your turbo-charged little one - just be sure you are well-rested before you go!\n\nThe only place that was a bit much was the water zone, but that's to be expected whenever you join a young child and lots of splashy water fun. Our little one looked like she worked on \"The Deadliest Catch\" after she was done terrorizing the place, but it was well worth it to see her having such a good time; it's similar to the \"other\" kids' museum nearby. They are renovating this exhibit, and it will be interesting to see how it evolves.\n\nLoved the art studio, the garage, and the nursery, where our little one really had a blast running around and playing with all of the activities. Obviously, the section on Mr. Rogers brought back all sorts of warm, fuzzy memories! Admission was completely reasonable, and a membership is totally worth it if you will visit with two adults and one child 3x in one year; you even get reciprocal admission to many science and childrens' museums nationwide!
I moved from Columbus, OH to Pittsburgh and was elated to find out that my COSI membership in Columbus was still usable at the Children's Museum. While C-bus's children's museum is mainly about science, Pittsburgh's has art and what not going on. \n\nMy son loves this place and has finally discovered the art room. He's not super creative but he likes the fact that he can pop on an apron and paint. He even threw a clay cup and silk screened some paper cut outs.\n\nThey have other workshop space where you can sew or build lil motors. The changing tough art exhibits are neat too. \n\nOn the downside, if an exhibit opens try to see it early. Simply because kids tear shit up. We went on the opening day of Clifford and by the final week props were missing and there were kid bite marks on Clifford's bones o.0 .
I love this museum! I've gone several times with friends and their children. There are so many fun things for kids to go, and so much to explore, even if you are an adult.\n\nKids seem to love the art stations where there are always a variety of crafts and items to create/construct. I love how they are always changing exhibits to stay current and keep things fun and creative for the regulars. \n\nMy favorite thing about this museum is the \"funhouse\" slide area. My nephew loves this slide and loves the anti-gravity feel when he is inside. It's too fun!
was in the neighborhood on a girls weekend. this place is fantastic.  great prices, great slice.  service is a tad bit slow (since they make it to order!) but the food is worth the wait. they seemed to be doing a great take out/carry out order,  If you are in the area, stop by . . . it is totally worth it!
Steel Pride, baby! Always gonna love the black and gold!\n\nEvery city I have lived in has had more than one Steeler bar. Never fear, if you a fan outside the Burgh, check out: http://www.post-gazette.com/steelers/steelerbars.asp to find out where you can watch a game with the Steeler faithful.
As I sit in my living room, gazing at the baby sized Steelers hat that I wore as a newborn arriving home from the hospital, it's obvious I have no choice but to bleed black and gold.\n\nI've been there for my Steelers (oh, our Steelers, your Steelers) through seasons good and bad (even last season). I have screamed my head off at those ESPN analysts who constantly underrate (if they don't ignore) my black and gold (oh, and  by the way, did you know that Ben had a motorcycle accident, an emergency appendectomy, and a concussion last year? did you hear about that? didya?). I have thrown away one perfectly good Troy Polamalu jersey for fear it was cursed (and replaced it with an excellent number 43 throwback jersey). And, when I lived in San Francisco, I woke up for 10am games and had a beer in my hand before kickoff.\n\nThere is nothing, nothing in this world that could ever get me to root against the Steelers, or to believe anything other than the Steelers are the best football team in the history of professional American football. \n\nPlus, Heinz field is easily the most beautiful stadium in the nation. \n\nNow, we just need a ring for that other hand...
The Steelers are the coolest team in football. They have the best colors, city, history, most fans, etc. \n\nAnd they pretty much dominate.
5 time Super Bowl champs.
Being born in 1970 was about perfect. Pittsburgh was becoming the City of Champions. The Steelers will always be my favorite team. I even have the logo on my neck, under my ear :D  Mostly having this tat lets me know where the Steelers bars are in other towns, as soon as someone sees it the usually tell me.
I didn't even like football before I moved to Pittsburgh, but that all changed when I discovered the glory of the Pittsburgh Steelers.  I came here in 2005 and got totally sucked into the march towards the 5th Super Bowl win, and I never have become uninfatuated.  Now I scream and wave the Terrible Towel around in the air with the best of 'em.   I'm crossing my fingers that we'll be the first to 6 Super Bowl wins...
A ring for each finger and a sixth for my... \n\nother hand!  \n\nYou're dirty!\n\nGo Steelers!!!
Steelers, you did not let us down. I have nothing but love for this team, this city, and its fans. I waited a full day to write this so that it wouldn't sound too obsessed.\n\nBut, that's 6 times, baby! You can't fuck with that. That's the best EVER.\n\nI want to thank my Mom and my Dad, for having me on the western side of the great state of Pennsylvania. I also want to thank them for being the best and least annoying people to watch football with.\n\nI want to thank Mom specifically for giving me a general ADHD-proof explanation of what the hell is going on during a football game. I'd never be able to watch football if it weren't for her. I also want to thank her for freaking out and screaming the way I did when #92 intercepted the football and ran it 100 yards into the Pittsburgh end zone. I'd also like to thank her for not getting mad when I started jumping on her furniture when #10 made a game-winning catch with 2:4x left to go in the 4th. I also want to thank her for making Dad and me delicious chili and a Steelers cake so that we wouldn't get ill from all the excitement.\n\nI want to thank Dad specifically for his love of the game and for explaining its intricacies to me [but only after Mom has had her say first.] I also want to thank Dad for laughing with Mom and I rather than at Mom and I. \n\nI want to thank the iron and steel workers who have made the three rivers region what it is and for inspiring the best football team in the NFL and for being its best fans. For once, the working class comes out ahead!\n\nI want to thank #43 Troy Palomalu for intercepting and scoring at 40 yards, thus sealing a Steeler victory during the AFC Championship vs. the Ravens. http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=IdlQ28cqgr8\n\nI want to thank our even-tempered head coach Mike Tomlin for guiding our boys to a 2009 Super Bowl victory.\n\nI want to thank #92 James Harrison, NFL.com Defensive Player of the Year, for making an unforgettable interception in the Cardinals' end zone and running it 100 yards into the Steelers' end zone! Damn, bitches! http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=CyeAypl7xkI\n\nI want to thank Cardinal #11 Steve Breaston for blocking fellow Cardinal #15 Larry Fitzgerald during our record setting 100 yard run. LOL! http://images.ocregister.com/newsimages/2009/02/01/b78465123z120090201212121000gflgcrqt1_lg.jpg\n\nI want to thank #10 Santonio Holmes for making an impossible catch to win the Super Bowl. You left us breathless when your feet touched the end zone. Love. http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=_ijHpXrSgQQ\n\nI want to thank the Cardinals for an unexpectedly good game. (LOL-I accidentally wrote Ravens at first!)\n\nI want to thank Liz for rooting for the Steelers. I guess I'll thank Scott for going for the Cardinals, so I had a face to rub our victory into. \n\nGo Pittsburgh! I love the Steelers! XOXO! S.W.A.K.
I wanted to choose something special for my 100th review.  It has to be something near and dear to my heart...I choose to rate my most favorite professional sports team, the Pittsburgh Steelers.\n\nBeing that I was born in Western Pennsylvania and raised in Pittsburgh during the dawn of the Steel Curtain, the Immaculate Reception, and the four Super Bowls in the late 70's and early 80's, it is hard to find a better reason to not rate this sports team a 5 Yelp Stars.  Now that the 21st Century is started....2 more Lombardi trophies were added.  I am not saying dynasty, but this team has a history of success and it is not hard to say for a small market team...this team is very successful.\n\nAs a fan of National Football League and the Pittsburgh Steelers, this team is a model for the way other organizations should be managed.\n\nDallas and San Francisco are in the holding pattern at 5 Super Bowls.  New England, New York Giants, and the Indianapolis Colts' does not have the history and only time will tell.....here we go Steelers, here we go!!!
She's dressed in black and yellow, she says \"Hello,\ncome sit next to me you fine fellow.\"\nYou run over there without a second to lose\nAnd what comes next, Steelers bust a move!!!
Perfect experience for this Steelers fan from Maryland. Had the walk up tour, tour guide knew exactly what she was talking about with a great personality to match. Had a really great time :)
Seattle may have just won the 2014 Super Bowl, but the Steelers still rock with six rings, Baby!!! Just stating what all Steeler fans know: a Steel Dynasty is still unmatched no matter what team claims the title of current Super Bowl Champs.. Go Steelers!!!
Yay for Steelers! It's awesome that Mike Tomlin looks like Omar Epps. Also Pittsburgh food is awesome. Pierogi, pork and sauerkraut, hoagies, pizza, and stuffed cabbage rolls.
Go Pirates!!! That's all I can say. They've made me love baseball and Pittsburgh again. They're only going to get better.
My wife and I have visited St. Anthony's Chapel three time so far and every time the experience is a moving one.  I would recommend the guided tour.  The amount of relics contained in the chapel is amazing.  If you a person of faith this is a wonderful place.
This is a gem in Pittsburgh.  The owner, Tom, and the workers will remember your name.  Its just like being in a small town.  Fresh meat and friendly people.  The meat is the best I have found in the city and is affordable too.  The best steaks I have ever eaten have been purchased from there and cooked in my own kitchen!  They are also very knowledgeable.  They can answer any question you have about what cut of meat to choose or how to cook something.  They're also more than happy to share tried and true recipes, which have always worked out for me.
My dog means the world to me and I couldn't imagine anyone better to handle her care than Dr. Dorn. I grew up raising puppies as a family hobby and became very attached to quality care from a vet in my hometown. My standards for a vet are high and I was more than pleasantly surprised by WLAH. \n\nMy first experience with Dr. Dorn was no more than 2 weeks after my adoption of my dog. I was pretty certain that she had UTI and it was confirmed. He was such a nice doctor and all of his staff was understandable and sweet. It also felt like a family environment and the office building is adorable. I didn't feel like I was taking my dog to some overly commercial MedVet (the worst place you can go) or chain. The whole appointment, plus medicine, plus taking out her stitches (for free) was $45. I was in shock! It was very reasonable.\n\nNo matter where you live in the city, I highly recommend Dr. Dorn!
Great small grocer!\n\nGiant Eagle offers a lot of things, but they don't offer me everything I am looking for when I go shopping.  Kuhn's, on the other hand, offers all of those little idiosyncrasies and nuances that I look for that I cannot find anywhere else.  The biggest thing for me is the fact that they carry Boar's Head brand luncheon meats.  I really don't know how anyone eats any other brand of luncheon meat since they all just taste so stale in comparison.  \n\nI can tell that a higher number of Italian-American folk patronize this store as well.  Why? The pasta selection is awesome.  I despise the typical noodles carried everywhere else; but here I can find the noodles that I have grown to love.  \n\nGetting beyond the reasons above, I do enjoy the store as a whole and the fact that I can find what I am looking for.  I will definitely be returning; I just have to make certain to be careful of the parking situation since this particular store's parking lot layout is prone to jamming.  In this case, it is better to park near PNC and walk.
Best shop by far in the South Hills.  Purchased a Cannondale 29er there, and have had numerous service visits for various bikes.  Always helpful and always call to let you know when service is fixed.  If you are in the market for a Cannondale in the South Hills this place has better customer service BY FAR than the other South Hills Cannondale dealer.
Always leaving incredibly happy
Because I am the cheapskatiest of cheapskates, I love Groupon, but I have always been wary of buying Groupons for things like haircuts - they're so personal, and when they go wrong, they can go SO VERY WRONG. \n\nBut, feeling particularly poor and without having established a favorite hair person here in Pittsburgh, I took a chance and bought a Groupon for Sergios.  I even made an appointment with someone totally unknown - no yelp reviews, no word of mouth approval, no bio on the website, no nothing!  That's right y'all I can be spontaneous.   Good thing I only had highlights & a trim planned...and lucky me, it was fantastic.\n\nYou can tell that the space has fairly recently transitioned from down-home barbershop to classy salon (due to a change of ownership from father to son, apparently).  All of the staff seemed uniformly very young and very hip, but still friendly and accommodating.  The music was all 90s and 2000s pop and alternative throwbacks that were such a delight.  And my mystery hairstylist was awesome - Dave not only gave me a really great cut and the most thorough highlighting of my life, but he also charmed my pants off - just a genuine, friendly, interesting fellow.\n\nI highly recommend this little gem - and if you've never been to Dormont, here's your chance! (I hear there's karaoke at the Apple on Tuesdays...)
I am a huge fan of Sushi Three. They live within walking distance of my home, so it's no problem getting here and the temptation for sushi is always in the back of my mind! Admittedly, the price of the food here tends to keep my cravings in check for a couple months at a time, but when I do come here, I enjoy every bite. Occasionally I also order take-out since they have very reasonable lunch deals, but really, I prefer to sit and eat at the restaurant itself.\n\nSpeaking of: the place itself is very quiet, which I actually like; I can just sit, talk with a friend or read a book, and then (what a radical concept) enjoy my food in peace. This is a big deal for me because the other places I know of where I can get sushi are loud, busy, and quite frankly, a little limiting options-wise compared to Sushi Three's menu. If I want sushi, I either come here or I get a small pack at Giant Eagle. That's how much I hate the other sushi places I've visited in Pittsburgh. If I'm going to pay as much as I do for my fish, I want to be in a place I can sit and actually enjoy my food.\n\nBy the way, Sushi Three does serve things other than sushi, so people looking for some Japanese food that isn't rice and fish are definitely going to find something. There's some really delicious beef, chicken and pork dishes. But of course, a place with the word \"sushi\" in its name is going to specialize in sushi, and there are pages and pages of sushi options available here. The orders come in various styles and sizes as well, so couples can get something to share or just get something smaller for themselves. The combos all come with soup and salad, which are also very yummy.\n\nI at this point have developed a routine order: a large salad and an order of softshell crab rolls are all I need here. Sure, I'll occasionally snag a bite from someone here with me, but the truth is that Sushi Three makes such enormous orders that I can't eat more than that without feeling a bit sick. \n\nBut hey, at least you get your money's worth! I say definitely give this place a shot if you're a sushi fan.
I go there as a tradition with my best friend when she comes home and it's one of my favorite places. The resteraunt is quiet and low lit so it's very relaxing. Service is quick and friendly. The lunch specials are amazing deals and there's enough variety there that I never get bored with the choices. Their tempura is the best i've ever had, and the rest of their food is just as amazing. Their ginger dressing makes me want to drink it straight. Even thinking about it has set me drooling!
I love how it's the only restaurant that is open 24 hours near Mt Lebanon\n\nIt's always good food, even after a night out at the bars.
One of the best pastries I've had in my life I got here. I think it's called a \"French bearclaw.\"
Any pittsburgher knows the top 3 pizza joints: Beto's, Fiori's, and Vesuvio's. Beto's is my favourite. \n\nI was never a fan of square pizza until I was introduced to this place. I love how they put the cheese on very last & isn't melted when they serve it to you. if you want extra cheese they give you a whole bag of shredded cheese. and it's cheap!! .99 a slice!\n\nI can't wait until I'm back in the 'burgh to take my fianc\u00e9 there so he can see what real pizza is like.
Some of my favorite pizza on the planet. If you haven't had it remember, it is unique, don't walk in expecting 'factory' pizza. It is square cut and the cheese is put on after the crust and sauce are cooked. MONEY!\n\nIf you are taking it out get the cheese on the side, we even get 'extra cheese' a lot of the time.\n\nToppings: most toppings on the pizza are put on after it is cooked also. I usually go straight cheese ( not a fan of cold pep or mushrooms) \n\nThe sause is old school nothing fancy but darn good, nice chunks of tomatos in the sauce.  \n\nIf your in town worth the experience, if you live near by...lucky you!
I was out with lesbian friend of Joe D the night before new years eve. Note to self: veggie burgers are not a meal for a man. After seeing Harry Potter 7.1 at the theatre we both proclaimed we were hungry for abnormal pizza. Let me explain, we didn't want to order generic, neighborhood delivery pizza. Pretty much I'm tired of tasteless, no crust pies that lack nuance. Since lesbian friend of Joe D lives in Dormont, Beto's was a natural. She's never had the beto's experience. So I told her to follow my lead, I ordered two slices, one with black olives, the other was plain, small drink. She ordered two slices , extra cheese and pepperoni. I forgot to tell her, nay, I purposely didn't tell her about the cheese because I knew she'd turn her nose up at it because the idea of cheese not melted on a pizza would surely upset the planets and cause disruption in the space/time continuem. But it backfired on me and the one thing I didn't expect was her to order extra cheese. \n\nWe sat down and I explained to her the total stupidity of ordering a large drink in a place that offers free refills. Order a small, it's way cheaper and this really sounds like a scene that could have played out on an episode of Seinfeld.\n\nPizza time! The look on her face was one of shock, like mine when I realized that America was indeed stupid enough to elect George Bust for a second term. The cheese was piled high, and no visible evidence of anything under this massive mass of diary goodness. Like a trooper she picked up a slice and dived in. She liked it!\n\nAfter we downed our slices I told her how sitting here has brought me back to my high school years. The pizza still has that same texture, creamy cool cheese, warm crunchy crust, and wonderful smell. Beto's is still my choice for best pie in the Burgh
You have to be goofy to not like this pizza. Their sauce is tangy and delicious, probably the best I ever had, and The crust is perfectly crunchy not doughy and chewy which I cant stand. Truly unique and worth a try. I will be back.
So you walk in and proceed to the counter.  You order the pizza with whatever toppings you so desire.  You get handed your drink cups and a number to put on your table and try and find a seat.  Maybe a 15 to 20 minute wait for your pizza.  Your pizza comes out and...... \"what the hell is this?  Take this back!  My cheese ain't melted and the pepperoni ain't cooked!\"  Chill my man.....take a few deep breaths....it'll be ok.....just TASTE it......there ya go.....holy cheese right?!  What a blend....It's all over the place and people actually order extra!  That sauce, nice.....sweet and chunky....yummy.  And the crust....the crispy, chewy wonderful foundation that holds it all together.   It's a bit different.  But different in the best way.  There's some great pizza out there.  Different styles and different tastes.  Do yourself a favor.  If you're in the Banksville Rd./ Dormont area stop in this place....it's just delicious.
Thinking cold toppings is going to tast great sounds odd....... But, this is great pizza. \nWhen you commit to doing something as odd as cold toppings you are going to strike out or hit a homer. Betos hit a Grandslam. \nPlease stop in. It's a dive but it's outrageously good!!!
Okay this place is freaking wild. If your from my generation than you can remember Ellio's rectangular frozen pizza. This place brings me back. Any place that goes there, then you know they're doing something right. \n\nIf you go here you will be in cheese heaven. I agree with the other people's review that you will either love this place or absolutely hate it. I'd have to give it a thumbs up but instead of calling it pizza, call it beto's raw cheese baked bread haha. They cook the bread sauce/tomatoes and then throw a heaping cheese pile after your meal is cooked. Then they throw on any toppings. I call it raw cheese pizza. It is good. Crust is crispy and the sauce is delicious. \n\nEatability I'd give a 2/10. The whole point of pizza is that you can bend it in half and then stuff it in your face. Here it's more of a fork and knife operation. The cheese falls right off because it's not melted so you end up slurping it up like spaghetti. \n\nI dig it though. Good job beto's. Way to stand out from the mediocre pizza that plagues pittsburgh.
Nowhere else quite like betos. If you love cheese and like trying something different this place is awesome.  I grew up in Pittsburgh and get back rarely,  but when I do I go out of my way to grab a couple slices!
One of my favorite pizza spots in Pittsburgh.  Been coming here for years.  The only downside is if you go and they are just putting a pizza into the oven.  The wait to grab your cuts can be a long wait.  Well worth it because of how damn good it is.
My husband and I visited Lighting by Erik yesterday and were absolutely blown away with the amount of product in the store! This is the BEST place in Pittsburgh to find lighting. We were in the market for a nice crystal chandelier for our kitchen and had more than enough choices to pick from. We have had a hard time before yesterday finding a nice enough crystal chandelier in town (or getting good customer service from other stores). Also, had the problem of not being able to see merchandise at other places. NOT the case at Lighting by Erik! We worked with one of the owner's and she was a complete joy to work with, and full of passion for her job (a rare find these days)! She took her time, was thorough and made sure we loved what we were buying. Also, very impressed with their selection of fan options. They also have many catalogs with high quality and unique ceiling fans, which was a huge perk for us, wanting something more unique. I highly recommend this store to anyone who has great taste! They also have a fantastic selection of lamps, mirrors, tables and other home decor items. Will absolutely be purchasing from them again. Check it out, you will be impressed.
Metro came to my home as scheduled and restored my air conditioning. Rich was my Metro rep and explained everything so a layman could understand.\nI was completely satisfied. They do excellent work.\nI would use them again.
I wasn't expecting much but they surely over delivered.  I thought it was just another bar.  It had the bar vibe.  I didn't think the food would be this good.  I am impressed that most of the food is made in-house.  I actually don't remember what I got since it was several weeks ago that I went.  All I know was that the food was much better than any bar food I had.  I would come here again.
Good local bar with lots of TVs, good draft selection, and better than average bar food. Definitely a step up from the Saloon.
Great food and atmosphere. Sweet potato waffle fries are the best. Great for Pirate games.
Great place to watch a game. Friendly staff went out of their way to get my game on even though the Steelers were on at the same time.
The wings here are fantastic and the cheese sticks are absurd in a very good way. Will definitely be back.
I love this place. Normally, it would have been 4.5 stars, but since they moved to a smoke free environment, it gets a 5 star rating. The staff is quick, friendly and very \"with it.\" This is a true family business and the food is fantastic. I love the jumbot! It's amazing and hearty. The coffee isn't the best, but the food makes up for it. The french toast and pancakes are lovely too. This is not the place to go if you are dieting as they are GENEROUS with the butter. I like this place way better than Pamelas, which, apart from the strawberry crepes, doesn't really do it for me. It was recently on the Food Network too so I'm not the only one that feels that way!
Went this this morning and I am wondering why the hell it tool me so long to go here. Awesome food, fresh and the staff was even better. Won't eat anywhere else for breakfast in the burg! Gotta get here
My breakfast was absolutely phenomenal. I specifically ordered the ham and eggs because it included their famous potato pancakes. They did not disappoint I tried every trick in the book to get what they put in them but no luck. I even promised some things I should be ashamed of LOL I would definitely recommend that if you are anywhere within 50 miles you need to make a trip here!
I had no idea that this restaurant was \"legendary\" when I decided to eat there this morning with my family.  I was severely hungover and just needed some grease, and the concierge at my mother's hotel happened to recommend this place.\n\nThe restaurant is \"cozy\" (read: small) and situated in a really quaint neighborhood at the top of a massive (and somewhat scary) hill. The restaurant itself was buzzing and had a great neighborhood vibe. Despite it being *packed,* we were seated right away.\n\nThe menu wasn't too fussy but there were a lot of options. I ordered the dor-stop burger (burger with sauteed onions and green peppers, american cheese and two slices of texas toast) and fries. My husband got the mushroom swiss burger with onion rings and we split our meals. The food was simple enough but amazingly delicious. I think they battered the onion rings in crack. I also ordered an orange juice, which I could tell was fresh squeezed.\n\nThe portion sizes were reasonable too! Not gigantic, which I appreciate. I finished my meal feeling like a brand new woman. \n\nI think I'll look for reasons to come to Pittsburgh now that I know this restaurant exists. Yum.
Like many others before me I came to the Dor-Stop with high expectations and let me tell you, my expectations were exceeded.\n\nMy girlfriend and I have been looking for a new breakfast spot for a while and the Dor-Stop has always been high on my list to try.\n\nThe place is classic, still has a bar counter, kitschy items adorn the walls and the a feeling that you are dining in your grandmother's restaurant. The place is always packed but we were quickly seated and like many have stated before my coffee cup never fell below 3/4 full before it was refilled.\n\nNow lets get to the nitty gritty: the food.\n\nI got the pancake breakfast, usually a very simple and easy breakfast but when the breakfast came I was so impressed. The hotcakes are so different, some would even say magical. They are so fluffy and moist and complimented their super crispy bacon. I almost wanted to fold the entire breakfast up and eat a giant pancake eggarito. My mouth is watering thinking about it.\n\nMy girlfriend got the breakfast sandwich which was very well done. Their ham is so succulent and tender. They cut it off the bone at the Dor-Stop and is shows. The sandwich is a work of art and is the classiest breakfast sandwich I have ever seen. \n\nI recommend this place to anyone and will definitely come back to try some other types of pancakes. They are the best in the city.\n\nOh and try the potato pancakes, they will rock your world.
Yelpers, once again you all came through!  Being fairly new to the city, the only real breakfast place I have found is Pamela's.  After reading Yelp this morning my friend and I went to Dor-Stop.  You guys rocked!  We had to wait 20 minutes but walked around the neighborhood (really should do a huge workout before AND after eating here!) then it was time for us to be seated.  The waitress was excellent!  They were packed so it took about 30 minutes to get our food but she kept our glasses of iced tea filled the whole time (and brought out a new glass of ice for each of us to refill).  I ordered the pancakes while my friend ordered a vegetarian omelet.  We ordered one order of potato pancakes to share.  \n\nBoth us really enjoyed our meals a lot!  Thanks again Yelpers, now I have a new favorite breakfast place!
Don't go for healthy, go for tasty comfort food. Great pancakes. Expect a long wait on weekends!
Another 5-star find in the Pittsburgh area. I kid you not. Guy Fieri hyped the right place.  It is hands down the best diner in the universe.  Actually, I don't know that for sure, but I dare you to find a better diner anywhere in the United States.\n\nThe food here is made with love and that's what makes it stand out out. You can taste the love in every single bite.  The staff of this family-owned restaurant run like a well-oiled machine, used to the crazy crowds that come here every day to blow their diets and binge.  This was all a girl could ask for on a cheat day.\n\nI had Vicki's Italian Jumbot but with Guy Fieri's twist on it, making it a little more spicy. It was more than enough for Jim and I to share.  We also shared the fantastic pumpkin pancakes. They do not need syrup at all. So fluffy, so delicious and gut-busting.  Why do I have to live in D.C?  I would be here every weekend for brunch.  There is nothing like this place over here..wahhh!   This place is great for sharing so order different dishes and eat them family style. The portions are gigantic and unforgiving! \n\nAnyway, do not come to Dor-Stop thinking they have become over-commercialized because  of their appearance on the Food Network. They have not. They are the same family-owned established where you can get no nonsense  service and absolutely amazing food.  If you are in Pittsburgh, run don't walk to Dormont and grab a seat at Dor-Stop.  This is a glutton's dream come true.
My in-laws saw the Dor-Stop on DDD and wanted to try it out. When I found out they were famous for their pancakes, I hopped right on board. We went on a Sunday morning and was told the wait would be 20 minutes. After about 10, four seats opened up at the counter so we snagged them. We got to know the staff as we perused the menu. We were right next to the cash register and the (I'm assuming) owner was a gentle drill sergeant doling out orders. \n\nI had the banana chocolate chip pancakes with a side of sausage. The three generously-sized pancakes were sweet with a crispy edge and were loaded with fruit and chocolate. Ohmygod. Some of the best pancakes I've ever had. I stuffed myself silly knowing I wouldn't be able to come back next weekend and do it all again. The sausage patties were really tasty and not greasy at all. I had to fend off T who kept getting samples. :) I also tried T's apple cinnamon pancakes which had dollops of apple pie filling and just the right amount of cinnamon. My father-in-law had the strawberry-stuffed French toast and my mother-in-law had the walnut French toast. I didn't try either but they looked amazing. \n\nI would DEFINITELY come back here if I lived in the area. Pay no mind to the wait time. Bring a book, bring someone you love to chat with. It's worth it!
This place just plain had it all, simple as that.  I saw the joint on Triple D and knew I wanted to check it out when I was in Pittsburgh for work.  Especially since it is known for breakfast, which is my favorite meal!\n\nThe Dor Stop is especially known for its pancakes, and they have several to chose from.  After some contemplation I decided on the Pumpkin Pancakes.  And what a great decision it was!  They were amazing!  I put syrup on them, because I'm a sugar whore, but they honestly didn't need it!  They were big, moist, and perfectly sweetened all by themselves!  So tasty!  \n\nAnother nice thing about the place is that it's not in Pittsburgh but, rather in the Dormont area outside the 'Burg.  A rather quaint little area it was.  So get down there and check it out!  You won't be disappointed!
Excellent breakfast. Regular pancakes rocked. Staff was super and we were seated immediately on a Saturday. So lucky. My first 5 star rating on Yelp.
WOW!  Great staff and great food.  Got in quick and got out quick and cheap.  Did the regular breakfast with 2 pumpkin hot cakes on the side and they were out of this world.\n\nI'm glad they were on YELP or I never would have none of my new favorite breakfast place.\n\nTC
I've been going to Dor-Stop for years (well before the DDD crowd arrived).  While I'm thrilled to see Bob and Vicky's crew thriving, I do have to say that I miss being able to actually walk-in on a Saturday or Sunday without a line around the block.\n\nIrregardless, when you're looking for unique spins on traditional diner fare, this is your joint.\n\nThe pancakes are all fantastic.  I've had every combination on the menu and then plenty more (they'll usually grant a request if they have the ingredients and they usually run a weekend special).  I highly suggest the apple walnut, banana chocolate chip, the oatmeal raisin, and most importantly...  PUMPKIN (the best in town).\n\nLori's Raspberry French Toast is the obligatory first dine, just stay away from the other iterations that aren't first coated in corn flakes prior to landing on the griddle.\n\nThe jumbots, eggs benedict, and potato pancakes all also represent fantastic choices.  If you have a choice of meat, hands down get the \"ham off the bone\".\n\nOne other key note...  Bob, Vicky, and their daughter Lori go out of their way to make people happy.  They always bring samples out to those waiting for a seat and offer coffee to hold people over when it's cold out.\n\nIf you're running solo or with one in tow, I recommend you check to see if there are spots at the bar (first come first serve).
Tonya our waitress was perfect! Her recommendations we all excellent! From Chicago attending a funeral. Checked triple-D, and glad I did! Oatmeal Raisin pancakes were unbelievable! I don't where they get their eggs but they were huge and fresh over easy for me! Must stop if ever in Pittsburgh!
AMAZING!  I've been wanting to try this place for years and finally made it.  Ever since I saw it featured on the Food Network I've been wanting to go.\n\nWe went for breakfast and I ordered the stuffed raspberry french toast.  I ended up getting the cherry though...  I took a bite and while it was good I really wanted the raspberry.  I let them know and they quickly replaced my order with what I wanted and took it totally off the bill because they felt bad I had to wait longer for my food.  That was really unexpected and really nice!\n\nOnce I tried the raspberry stuffed french toast I loved it, really really good.  There are so many other things on the menu that I would love to try as well such as the banana chocolate chip pancakes, the breakfast burrito, ect.\n\nI would certainly go back to this place and hope that I do the next time I am in the Pittsburgh area.  So so good.
This place has NEVER disappointed when it comes to the food coming out of their kitchen. The lines occasionally go out the door but the wait is never very long. I have had many different items off the menu as it is a place my girlfriend and I frequent.\n\nIf you can ever get the Sausage Gravy and Biscuits, I would highly recommend, and this is coming from a very country boy who was raised on amazing pepper gravy and biscuits. I would be at Dor-Stop all the time if they had the sausage gravy on demand.\n\nNote: This is not the norm and the waitress seemed to be having a bad day. The only problem I have ever really had was when one of the waitresses didn't put forth much effort. She never stopped by to fill our drinks. Asked for our order and that was it. Even though we were friendly and polite, we never received the same in return. I understand that people have bad days. The waitresses here are very nice, but they are human and have their off days. Like I said, this was only one time, and on a subsequent visit, she was much more cheery and friendly. Everyone is human.\n\nI would recommend that anyone in the area give this place a try for breakfast and lunch.
I'm not ashamed to admit it - I was skeptical.  As a long-time lover of Pamela's, I just couldn't see this place making me happy when we discovered Pamela's in the Strip was closed on Memorial Day.  The wait was torturous at the Dor-Stop too...however, it was a holiday so I suppose i understand.  And when we did finally get seated, the AMAZING hot cakes, SUPERB hash browns, and perfectly cooked eggs really made my morning!\n\nI prefer my hot cakes to be thin and flat, and when I saw the ones here, I was unsure again.  But the taste will BLOW YOUR MIND.  I got the apple cinnamon ones - they are crispy yet fluffy with apples that taste very fresh and just the right amount of cinnamon.  I even enjoyed the butter as a sweet additive to a decadent treat!  The potatoes were also amazing - true lyonnaise style with crispy outsides, warm insides, and plenty of onions.  Eggs were standard fair, but overeasy is often executed poorly... so props for getting it exactly right.  Several of my friends also ordered different flavors of hot cakes and suggested the oatmeal ones are really not to be missed as well.\n\nDespite the long wait and weird waitress, we all LOVED our breakfast and I was full for hours after.  YUM!  Can't wait to go back!
BEST BREAKFAST I'VE EVER HAD!!! I had the Guy's Version of the Jumblot. My girlfriend had the chocolate chip banana pancakes. These were the best pancakes I've ever eaten. They have a texture and gooeyness that I've never had in a pancake. The Guy's Version was eggs, potatoes, jalape\u00f1os, tomato, cheddar, and hot sausage. The hot sausage had the most amazing flavor. \n\nEveryone should definitely make a trip here once! Pancakes are to die for!!
Food here is absolutely wonderful! Service is good and people are better. Take my family there and am extremely satisfied.
My sister and I both got the banana and chocolate chip hot cakes, and we loved them! Huge servings and you can also get the hot cakes with bacon, sausage, and ham for a slightly higher price. This was my second time going actually and if I could go every day I would! Highly recommend!
Best pancakes in Pittsburgh besides DeLucas. Always delicious and the service is nice.
I had the Italian jombot here it was so good, and the service was awesome!!! I will definitely be back.
I have been to The Dor-Stop numerous times and never been disappointed. They are known for their pancakes as featured on The Food Network's \"Diners, Drive-ins and Dives.\" \n\nI always get pancakes when I go and my favorites are banana walnut and pumpkin. These pancakes are thick and fluffy and so filling! I always end up taking at least one home. My husband has also tried their french toast which he highly recommends. \n\nThey get busy during the peak breakfast/brunch hours so a wait is sometimes necessary but they move fast with service without rushing you and you get out quick.  It has your basic diner feel. It is clean and service has always been warm and friendly. Prices are very reasonable in my opinion as my husband and I both eat for under $20. \n\nI love the Dor-stop and highly recommend it to others!
Ladies and Gentleman, welcome to pancake heaven. It was several years ago that I first came upon The Dor-Stop, and since then my breakfast lifestyle has been forever changed.\n\nI know this will sound like blasphemy coming from a Dor-Stop convert, but I hate pancakes. I just don't understand them, they are odd and moist, and nowhere near as delicious as waffles. I came into The Dor-Stop the first time with this mindset, and am now forever changed. \n\nThe Dor-Stop's hotcakes are delicious and almost cake-like. They aren't thin crepes, or undercooked globs of batter, but instead sweet, fluffy treats that come in a plethora of flavors. I personally endorse oatmeal walnut, but others love the banana or pumpkin (when in season). I recommend ordering the \"Egg Combo\": 2 hot cakes, eggs, and bacon/sausage. Go all out, you deserve it. \n\nOn a recent visit, I also discovered the french toast menu, which has caused me to forsake my hot cake habit. The french toast is almost deep fried and covered in this raspberry yogurt. It is a can't miss item on the menu, rivaling that of the hot cake. When pumpkin french toast is a special on the menu, I suggest you run to The Dor-Stop and taste a little of heaven. \n\nI've also sampled various items from the lunch menu with no complaints. The Rachel and Ruben are especially tasty if you feel like bypassing the breakfast menu. \n\nThis place is truly heaven in Dor-Stop. Make sure you arrive early on a weekend morning to avoid the crowd! Or wake up at dawn on a weekday and partake (as I have been known to do from time to time!)
I will never forget Campiti's. As a youngster growing up playing on Potomac Avenue and Dormont. My favorite pizza was and still is Campiti's. I have not found an equal in the 18 years I have been in CA. The hoagies were pretty damn good too.
My husband and I have been coming here for the past six years and cannot say enough about the salon.  Prior to finding Geno Como, I could never get the correct looking highlights/lowlights until I found Lisa here (I'm 44!).  My hair has never looked so beautiful and I am so glad that we found such a great place.  Everyone is so friendly and I love coming here as the salon has a light and airy look to it which is very relaxing, yet the prices are very reasonable.  I have recommended more people to this salon and they are also very happy.  You cannot go wrong with Geno Como!!!
I love this place. I live within walking distance and I find myself there a lot. Tons of beer choices (microbrews for you beer snobs) and great pizza & pub food.  It's a perfect pizza pub in every way. Try the hot lime flavored wings. They make your eyes well up when you put your face over them to smell the amazing wing aroma. Nice bartenders and wait staff as well.
What a cool place! I have NO green thumb WHATSOEVER, but had passed by for about a year now since I moved to Dormont and had always thought the shop looked cute. Now was my chance as I needed a last minute Christmas present for my grandma. \n\nThe place is larger than you think from the outside. They actually have a whole outdoor area that's covered for the winter with many different plants I couldn't identify. I thought the owner was super duper sweet and just really energetic. Her and another staff member helped me pick out a plant that was in a vase, not in a pot, and looked really cool and modern. I loved it and had a fleeting thought to pick one up myself... if I wouldn't kill it (which I probably would!). \n\nI had commented about a table full of vases filled with what looked like works of art. They turned out to be flower displays for hotels, but man where they cool. If I was doing an event or having a wedding, that's exactly what I would have wanted. They just looked really modern but creative. \n\nThey also have some winged friends you can say hi to, including one screaming one in the back that you can't see. Kinda creepy, but I guess that comes with a unique shop! I will absolutely be back to pick up items for people and consider them for any events I have coming up.
It would get 4 stars for the name alone.  The idea that they would just sell you hot dogs and six-packs is so just and pure it almost makes me want to weep.  \n\nI went here and had the bacon chili cheddar dog and one with relish, kraut, and brown mustard.  Both were excellent dogs, and their beer list is incredible.  \n\nAgain, how come we can't have this is Boston, where it comes off as real?  If they tried this in NYC or Boston, it would come off as a gimmick.  Whereas here, in Swissvale, it just seems like a neighborhood place with a twist.  A coronary twist.  So good.....
Made my first trip to D's today.  By far one of the best bars I have been to.  Great atmosphere, good food for a bar, and how can I not mention the BEER CAVE.  They have an impeccable selection of brew.  Great place to go for a night out or just to have a good time.  I would imagine a Stiller game would be pretty fun to watch.  The prices are just right including drinks, but if only we could do something about the county drink tax.  \n\nI will visit this place frequently.
Best beer selection and bar food I've ever had- anywhere. The Vienna Beef hot dogs are delicious and the Buffalo wings the best in the 'burgh. The kielbasa and fish sandwiches are solid, as is their pizza (I was skeptical- I thought, why not stick w/ just the hot dogs since they're perfect? but they're also very good.). Skip the chips- they taste burned. The fries are sooo good- get them with chili and cheese or pub style (cheese and bacon with homemade ranch to dip in)...  Yes if you eat this every day it will kill you, but if you're looking for the best bar food- this is it. If you're looking for the best beer selection- you can't find anything better. Good selection on tap and amazing variety in the beer cave (they say it's ~1000 different beers). Some say Sharp Edge has better on tap...but their food is terrible.
This is probably my favorite bar in Pittsburgh.  The pizza is solid, the hot dogs are great, and the beer cave...mmmm.  My only complaint is that they haven't opened another one on the other side of town!
Place was awesome.\n\nDelirium on tap.\n\nHot dogs with mac n cheese on them.
Rupe Rankings of note:\n- #1: crave factor\n- #1: signature sandwich (hotdog)\n- #1: beer selection\n- #2: pizza\n- #2: fries\n\nMenu recommendations:\n- chili cheese dog\n- scorpassi (kielbasa with jalapenos)\n- garden pizza\n- plain fries\n- any brew you haven' t had or from blue point, ommegang or bell's\n\nWhy you would go:\n- 1000+ bottled beers on hand for on-premise consumption or customized 6-pack creation\n- 30-40 brews on tap for pints or take-away growlers\n- awesome pub food\n- miller lite for cheap (in the new fully-stocked upstairs bar)\n- roll-up doors on the restaurant side for quasi-outdoor seating\n\nWhy you wouldn't go:\n- with a larger group (more than 4 people)\n- seeking a quiet evening spot for kids (afternoons are fine for kids)\n- unwilling to pay the premium for micro / craft / import brews\n- unable to parallel park\n\nOverall impression:\nTerriffic neighborhood place for a small group to grab some terribly unhealthy food and try some new beers.
This is our favorite neighborhood restaurant. They serve \"bar food\", but there's a nice variety of vegetarian and non-vegetarian food. My favorite items on the menu are the veggie dogs, pizza, and soft pretzels. \n\nYou can't beat their beer selection. Make sure to visit the beer cave while you are there and their section of take-out beer for an even larger selection.
Everybody told me about this place when I said I was moving to Pittsburgh and, sure enough, it is awesome.  All the Belgian beer a girl could want.  And the wings.  And oh, the Mason Dixon dog.
I go to D's almost every Wednesday night for a beer and a veggie dog after an hour of bouldering at the Wall.\n\nTheir beer selection changes often, and I've never been disappointed.  If I don't know what the beer is, they'll often bring over a sample to try to make sure I like it.\n\nThe veggie dogs are great, the cheese fries are great, and I've never had a problem with the service.   It can get crowded when a game is on, but just grab a beer and wait for a table.\n\nPros: Fun menu, great draft beer selection, beer cave!\nCons: Sometimes crowded and loud
Awesome. That is D's.\n\nBurgers, dogs, and fries are so done, right? Wrong. Excellent toppings, excellent food, excellent beer selection. The fries and vegetarian selections are well done, so no one feels left out.\n\nI didn't know about this place until I started getting into trying odd micro-brews and I was looking for some different beers I had while living abroad. The beer cave is an experience and you will not be letdown. I have yet to meet someone who feels that D's is anything less than stellar.\n\nSidenote: I highly recommend D's Sixpax for someone's 21st birthday to pick out a six-pack from their epic selection of brews. (Also, buy them a hot dog, cheapskate!)
Sometimes I get these intense cravings to stuff hot dogs and greasy french fries in my face. As someone who doesn't eat meat, the hot dog part of that is a rare occurrence. Thankful D's gives the option for veggie dogs. This makes me very happy. It also makes my hangovers happy too.\n\nNot to mention they have an absolutely spectacular selection of bottles and drafts. If I'm not here enjoying the little pleasures in life - such as fat, grease, and gluttony- I'm enjoying another sinful pleasure, booze. Every time I come here I'm overwhelmed with choices. \n\nThis place is magical.
Beer cave!!
D's looks unassuming, but it's really over the top. Sure, they have fries, but why not order fries with bacon and cheese on them, plus ranch dressing on the side (You should, by the way - those are the pub fries and they are delicious). You could order a plain hot dog, but why do that when you have a choice of five different kinds of frank, and toppings like the Chihuahua: avocado, salsa, cheese and jalapeno? Plus, your dog (even if it's a turkey dog like mine) might arrive at the table with a little char on it; that to me is the peak of hot dog flavor.\n\nI feel like a restaurant that serves cheese sauce like a food group should have a warning label on the door, but with their sense of humor, the label would say \"Warning: the food inside is damn delicious and best consumed with a great beer.\"
D's is just one of those places I love going to. I can't get enough of picking out my own 6 pack of wonderfulness. All amazing beer. The food has never let me down. The service has always been good. This place is just awesome.
I don't come here to eat much, I usually come for the beer cave. Best build-your-own six pack joint in the city!
Was in town for a recent sporting event and read good things about Ds. A bit off the beaten path, but an easy bus ride from my Oakland hotel (and bus originates from Downtown, so should be easy ride from there, too).\n\nDs did not disappoint: creative craft beer list of 25+ taps, plus hundreds of bottles in the Beer Cave that you can have onsite or take to-go, and some of the best dogs I've ever had. Was there on a Friday, so got the Scorpion (cheddar jalapeno kielbasi) & fries deal for $5.50--excellent. Also tried the very good Ds Brat (cheesy bratwurst) & fries (same price), and they do a terrific version of the Chicago Dog. There are also 20+ toppings options if you want to DIY. Nice, friendly service from the guys behind the bar/in the kitchen made this a fine time.\n\nNext time I'm in PGH, Ds will be at the top of my list to visit. Can't wait to try their other dogs and whatever they have on tap (or in the Cave).\n\nP.S. There is also sit-down service in a room between the bar and Cave that seemed more family-friendly. I noticed several tables had pizzas and burgers, so I assume those are decent, too.
Employees are awesome. Everyone is super friendly and they always have kick ass old school jams playing!
D'z is hands down my favorite go to spot for good eats. I love their wings and their hot dogs. \nEverytime I go there i am greeted with fun young employees ready to serve or offer suggestions about their latest brews. Their draft list changes constantly so there's no sense in trying to remember which beer you had there the week before. Plus their beer cave is great with hundreds of different bottles to choose from all listed by the region from which they came. They also have a small cooler with about 150 different varieties of beer that are already chilled for your liking. Even if you get a warm beer, they have this ice cold dunk tank to put your bottle in that gets it nice and chilly for you in just a few minutes. That by far is my favorite aspect of D'z. If you choose to take beer home with you they also have a discount of $1.00 per bottle of every beer you take with you(excluding the pre-made six packs). So sometimes we get a six pack of variety beers at a lower cost than paying for them individually. On to the food:\n\nI love their wings and hot dogs and my masterful veggie burger creation. We always order the BBQ sauce because it taste so gooooood and their wings are nice and crispy and hot and smothered in plenty of sauce that you will be licking your fingers. We've tried almost all their dogs expect 2 and my favorite is the mac and cheese dog(w/ ketchup) and the chihuahua dog which is avocado, shredded cheddar cheese and jalapenos, my fiance enjoys a classic Chicago dog. The have delicious sauerkraut that i enjoy as well so i usually get a side for only 99 cents. Can't beat that price. Now when it comes to the veggie burger i love the way it taste. I do it up real nice by getting that black n blue topping which is blue cheese and cajun seasoning. I add bacon, onion, mushrooms, avocado, tomato, lettuce and their spicy mayo/double dip sauce. It is hands down the best burger i've ordered in a loooong time. \n\nIf your looking for a fun hangout spot for you and your buddies or even a tasty treat for the kids then D'z is where it's at!!! It gives you the feeling of just a fun place to be on the weekend or even the weekdays. \n\nDue to an unfortunate circumstance of eating at a different hotdog shop during restaurant week, my fiance would have proposed to me at D'z. We truly regret not waiting to go here but time was of the essence. D'z you truly are my favorite spot to be any day at any time and you will always be the place i wish i would have been proposed to at!!!!!!!!!!
Went here after a run in nearby Frick Park, which I felt gave me license to have a (delicious) hot dog washed down with a few great beers. I can't wait to return!
Was at D's this afternoon! I was so excited to find real vienna Hot Dogs in Pittsburgh since I am a born and raised Chicago guy. They were good dogs, had mine Chicago Style of course! Not sure it was Pollmans Mustard. It the buns had poppy seeds! A great place with plenty of atmosphere!
D's is one of our favorite places in Pittsburgh. It's nice to have an easy, fun, casual place to get some good eats and a nice beer. As a vegetarian who still likes to pretend to eat meat, I so appreciate their multiple veggie options. Nearly any item on the menu can be made in a vegetarian version. Their special dogs (dog of the month) are usually a lot of fun. My favorite was the Thanksgiving dog back in November, with corn, mashed potatoes, cranberry, and stuffing. It was amazing! I came twice to have one in November. \n\nTheir beer list has to be the best I've seen in the city. Lots of great stuff on tap and a huge bottle room. \n\nSince we like to bring our toddler to dine with us, I'm always so happy that they are so friendly and accommodating with kids. He loves their mac and cheese and grilled cheese sandwiches, though I think he likes their crayons more.\n\nFor a fun family dinner, a good beer, watching a game, getting together with friends, or just experimenting with a new Belgian brew, I strongly recommend D's.
Mac n cheese dog is incredible.  This place is small and gets packed so be prepared for a long wait and no personal space.
I absolutely loved this place. First off, I love Regent Square. It's the cutest place, and this is the perfect place for a night out or even to get beer for a night in. My boyfriend is obsessed with the create your own six pack from the beer cave. We ate here on a friday and the place was packed but we got sat right away and our food came out fast. Amazing specialty hummus of the day ( i think it was chipotle ranch) and great sandwiches. The portions are huge and you won't leave hungry.
I love D's! My roommate and I are happy regulars at both the restaurant and the attached beer cave, and we like to drag our out-of-town friends here as well. This place is honestly one of the best things about living in Regent Square. The staff are friendly and efficient and the food is always hot and fresh. The beer is of course outstanding. What more could you want in a neighborhood bar?
I haven't actually been to the Regent Square location of Ambience, so this is more directed towards the Oakmont store.\n\nI love this place. I love it. It's gorgeous, high-quality [sometimes designer!] clothing that's so cheap it's ludicrous. And! All the profits go to a women's shelter! What more can you ask of a consignment shop?\n\nI daresay nothing. Go, shop, support.
I don't know why you would go anywhere else. The fellow who runs this shop is what I think of as a traditional businessman. He's got a trade, is well known in the neighborhood, and asks a fair price. He does darn good work, too!\n\nI've gotten various shoes repaired over the last decade or so here, from leather to suede with lots of random requests in between. I think he may have even done my tap shoes way back when. One pair in particular he re-soled them 3 times. Man, I loved those shoes ... Anywho, the last time I had him patch the toes of my UGG boots (Don't judge. They are so comfy.) he charged me so little that I left him a big 'ole tip. \n\nBottom line: nice guy, great service. Support local business!
I brought a shoe here that needed re-glued and it was done the next day and was so cheap.  The store owner was very friendly.  Would definitely do business here again.
Amazing...\n\nThe owner of this establishment is honest, fair and skilled.  I have a pair of leather boots that I had reconditioned at this establishment.  My boots went from bad to great.  Total cost, $7!  \n\n$7 \n\nInsane value.  Great place.  I am so pleased places like this exist.
THE best cheesesteaks, freshest buns, there is nothing bad here!!
Think fresh bread, fresh vegetables, daily sliced meats of the highest caliber served in white butcher paper by very slow service.  Ahhhh, the joys of ordering a torpedo (around six inches of bread) or a Battleship (fasten the hatches!) from the Triangle.  They make the best cold hoagies -- turkey, italian, and ham are among my favorites!  They also have a bar and TV's for that minimalist game viewing adventure with regulars from nearby homestead and braddock propping up the stools.  It's a great take out place -- call ahead though.  A Pittsburgh classic you must try once for a Steeler or Penguin game party.  Terrific!
Just go here, and order a battleship. If Kris makes it, its even better!
After 17 years of only being able to choose between three pizza chains, I really appreciate little places like this with good pizza.  The pepperoni pizzas are thin and greasy like they're supposed to be, the crust is home made, the sauce is good, and the amount of cheese perfect.\n\nIt's kind of sad that the other 'V' pizza place around the corner isn't any better than the three national chains.
Great pizza. Grandma's pie is an all time favorite!
Best Wendy's experience I've ever had! And I wouldn't normally take the time to review fast food. We went just after midnight following a long and tiring day of moving. The idea was to hit up the Eat'N'Park over by Giant Eagle, but alas, they were closed.\n\nWe pulled into the drive thru, and were immediately greeted. Needed a minute to figure out the order and they waited patiently. Also made sure we were okay with waiting 6 minutes for the 3 chicken sandwiches we ordered, which we were. We pulled up and there were 3 young men working the window. They were moving quickly, smiling, and paying attention to what they were doing. We got our drinks and paid, and then I asked if I should move up since we were waiting and there were other cars behind us.\n\nWe waited about 3 minutes when one of the guys comes out and literally FLOURISHES our 3 bags of food at us. I mean, presentation AND style? At a fast food drive-thru at midnight? So cool. He was funny, attentive, and totally made our night. I don't even LIKE Wendy's that much, but I will definitely be back, and soon.
I like this place it provides a great atmosphere and can handle big groups. They also send you a coupon for a free dinner on your birthday and can use it anytime during your birthday month.  I would recommend making a reservation as they are normally busy and it takes awhile to eat. But this is a great place to go for a special occasion.
The atmosphere was fun. Our chef was very nice and entertaining. The filet was excellent.  Their salad dressing is a little harsh for my taste.  Over all it was a great time. I will definitely go back.
Benihana is by far our favorite steak and seafood place in the area. The food is so fresh. The chefs are great. The wait staff is excellent.  If you're looking for shrimp flying and loud chefs singing obnoxious songs then this is not for you. If you want a friendly  atmosphere and delicious food then this is your place. \nThe sushi is fresh and tasty. The quality of food is obviously there.
Love their spicy black bean dip and their black bean and pineapple quesadilla... mmmm can't get enough of their black bean.
Always great service at the bar from Tanya and Nikki. Great food and wide selection of draft beers. One of my favorite spots.
This Starbucks is right down the street from my parents house. It's gotta be my favourite location in the Pittsburgh area. I read Joe D's review and laughed a bit. He's right...there are some guys who sit in there, but have you ever said hello? Have you ever asked them if you could sit down? They're totally nice guys! The baristas here are really efficient (most of the time) and super friendly. They're on top of their game and even remember regular's drink orders.
I've been coming here ever since I can remember. The Baristas seem genuinely interested in your well-being. They all have great personalities and are a joy to talk to when I come in. Dan, while appearing super intimidating (spiky black hair, wears leather jackets and stuff) is extremely nice. I went away for college and when I came back he asked me all about it. Becky always remembers my orders and Astrid makes my iced coffee just right. I could sit in there for hours and I often do.
I know a lot of people tend to either love or hate Panera; I happen to love it - the You-Pick-2 combo is one of my favorite lunch options. And as luck (good or bad depending on how my diet's going!) would have it, this location provides a daily opportunity to get one of those combos! This location is incredibly convenient for me - both for being relatively close to where I live and for being next to an old bookstore, clothes store, and a few other businesses - and has earned all 5 stars for being a bit better than the average Panera. \n\nOne, I've never walked in here and found a shortage in sweet treats, which is a common problem if I want an afternoon bagel in a lot of other Panera locations. Two, the sandwiches here just taste fresher than a lot of other places I've been to. Three, as others have mentioned, the staff are just nicer here - I have no idea why, but I'm not complaining! Bonus star for this Panera because it's actually made its entire interior comfortable and encourages people to relax and use its wi-fi, which is something I can't say a lot of other locations have nailed just yet.
Great old-school donut shop with delicious donuts.  The even still tie up the boxes.
HOLY MOTHER OF DONUTS! This place is amazing. My daughter and I stop every Friday morning, and honestly, it's the highlight of my whole week. Donut holes are to die for, but everything here is good. Like other reviewers said, get here early because they go fast!
The old fashioned sour cream... bavarian filled... glazed and cake... OMG so good. Seriously, all of them! This little shop is right in the middle of a neighborhood. I can only imagine the temptations of living so close to the intoxicating smells that waft out of there each morning. \n\nWe got there about 5 minutes before 7, thinking they would open at 7. There were already 3 people in line. The doors finally opened up about 10 minutes after 7, I guess you can't rush something so wonderful. A dozen tasty gems were carefully chosen... better give us a dozen doughnut holes too! Every last bite was terrific. \n\nPittsburg, I hope you realize how lucky you are!
The barista was super sweet. I told her I wanted something new and she was a fountain of information. She made a lot of great suggestions and I told her to wing it. She went with a Caramel Brulee with two pumps of White Mocha. She also gave me a discount, which was awesome.\n\nI used an AirCard on the netbook and sat in Starbucks from 11am-2:30pm. I had headphones on and just zoned out. I was comfortable and wasn't disrupted at all.\n\nIt seemed to get busy from 1pm-2pm so if you want to stop at this location, make sure to get there earlier so you can grab a seat.
This is the first place in Pittsburgh that has gotten my hair right. They were courteous, up front about their pricing structure, the location extremely convenient. The elevator up is a little sketchy, but the inside the salon is lovely. I am scheduling my second appointment right now!
Very, very pleased with the service I get at MCN. I've been a customer for several years. Sara K does my hair and she's so good. She puts up with my craziness (we did purple for awhile) but also is fine when I go back to just my brunette self. I love the stylists, they're very friendly, and I find the price to be comparable with other high-end salons. The atmosphere is trendy and hip and the salon is always clean. The owner is super-friendly and is usually working. \n\nHighly recommended!\n\nThank you!
1st time here. Got my hair did tonight! I'm an oxymoron I work in cosmetics, do professional makeup and skincare, have access to all the wonderful anti aging lasers, injectibles, botox, fat melting machines, but then I hate wearing makeup, getting procedures done, and let my hair grow out without a visit to the salon that is long overdo. I'm still that little tomboy climbing trees, I guess. Low maintenance by weekday, then I bust out the fabulous by night. \n\nThe point being that I had let my hair go for quite awhile and the groupon just came out yesterday after I had made my much needed appointment! Already scheduled, groupon the day before my appointment, and I got a great haircut! Triple score! Plus they have pets hanging out! Quadruple SCORE! Places where you can bring a pet to work are super cool, I like the laid back implication for the business. \n\nHeather was my stylist and we hit it off amazingly, I gave her advice about skin treatments that would be right for her and she explained what kind of cut would be best for me. I asked about extensions because I have been curious to try them but she said the clip on ones would be better for my hair type. I appreciate that she gave me the truth straight up. I don't want my hair getting damaged after the things I have done to it! She gave me a modern chick look that I love, I can have a soft wavy romantic look, or I can straighten it and pull out the chunkiness for an edgier look. Thanks Heather, it's so easy and manageable. Prices seem pretty standard for this type of place around $45-55 per haircut. Can't wait to see what we do next!
Being new to the city, I went into panic about finding a new hair stylist. SF and Boston have plenty of reviews to choose from but Pittsburgh didn't have many, let alone stellar reviews on salons. At the time I colored my hair so I didn't want to let just anyone put foils and scissors near my head. Finding a new hairstylist is like a game of russian roulette to me. I can either be safe or be really screwed for a few weeks.\n\nMCN was really the only salon ranked high in a search in my neighborhood so I gambled and scheduled an appointment with Sara. The salon is located near a Whole Foods, Starbucks, Walgreens and what use to be a Borders. It is clean, spacious and open with nice views overlooking the city.\n\nSara did a great job and continues to do so (I'm loyal like that). She consults me first and doesn't deviate from what we agree upon. Her demeanor is professional and friendly. While I was waiting for my color to process, MCN has some outlets for you to plug in your computer to pass the time.\n\nReasonably priced and another nice thing is that MCN occasionally will give free goodies as a thank you or for the holidays. While certainly the do is most important, the little things count as well. I will say though that they do seem a little pushy with product and the product may not even be the best one for your hair. I know salons can make a great profit off of product from the show Tabitha's Salon but this can ruin your experience at MCN after an awesome haircut/color treatment.
First haircut in pittsburgh, and absolutely one of my favorite cut!  I had heather, one of the senior stylist, and completely adored her. She was very personable and had constructive advice on my hairstyle.  She definitely was able to come up with the perfect style to frame my face just by listening to what I wanted.  A picture wasn't even necessary. Definitely would recommend her.  Also the salon is beautiful with a gorgeous view.  Staff was super friendly.
so i went here to be a hair model for a coloring class and was so impressed! my stylist, margeaux, was friendly, knowledgable, and talented. once i was seated in the chair, she offered me water and as i was getting my hair colored, another stylist offered me a brownie (who can turn that down?!). we talked about what color i wanted to go and the process began. margeaux was quick and efficient and the hair washing (always my favorite part) felt amazing! she blow dried my hair and i finally got to see the finished product which i was very happy with.\ni'll definately be back, and requesting margeaux, although i got to see the other models' finished hair as well, and i'm pretty sure every stylist there was super talented.
I have been going to MCN salon for over 3 years now.  Since moving to the east end in 2008, I went to many salons and barbers trying to find a stylist that listened and responded with great technique.  Kara Hudson is that person.  She has been at MCN for quite some time.  Not only is she friendly, but she stays on task and always listens to new styles that I want to try.  I consider our monthly (or 6 week) visits a highlight.  Recently, as I am involved with philanthropic efforts in Pittsburgh, Kara donated services and product for an event I was promoting.  Now someone (a winner from the event I hosted) has the opportunity to experience Kara.  Win/Win all around.  Thanks Kara and the staff (front end, shampoo gals, owners) for always making me feel like family each time I come.  I will actually be there tonight!  #countingDOWN
I've been going to MCN salon for a few years now, and I have to say that it is truly the most fabulous salon in Pittsburgh!  The decor is gorgeous and gives off a spa like tranquility with a hip vibe.  The level of service is high from beginning to end.  My stylist is Margeaux, and if you're looking for gorgeous hair - go to her!!! She really takes her time to listen to what you're asking for and makes sure that your hair is styled to perfection before you leave.  I recently decided to cut off my long hair to donate to Locks of Love.  While I'm used to having long hair, she gave me a really cute cut and showed me how to style it at home (though I'm nowhere near as good at doing it as she is).  If you're looking for a great salon experience and amazing hair, go see Margeaux at MCN Salon.
Ok so after coming here since March I finally feel ready to review. \n\nI started coming to MCN after I had my hair colored and cut by someone who absolutely destroyed my hair. I had asked for an ombr\u00e9 and ended up with a poop brown and bleach blonde wreck. The next morning I called MCN praying they could fit me on for a corrective color. They got me in with Leslee that afternoon.  \n\nI have linked some pictures but I don't know if they do her work justice. I went from having patches of bleached hair to the long ombr\u00e9 that I'd hoped for. Leslee spent hours on my hair color. It involved dying the roots the correct color, bleaching my end pieces blonde, and then toning the blonde from crazy yellow bleached to golden. \n\nShe took my hacked long layers and blended them while leaving as much length as possible. I was already overwhelmed with the change in color I was so glad she was able to salvage my length. \n\nI left that day with the hair cut and color I wanted in the first place and I was so so grateful! I've been going to Leslee since and I think she does an amazing job. Last time I saw her I ended up ditching the ombr\u00e9 and going to a \"fall\" color. I wanted deeper brown with red. It's literally exactly what I asked for. \n\nI've also gotten an up-do for an event. I've never gotten so many compliments. And my long, heavy, thick hair stayed up all night. I've never had an up-do last as well. \n\nThe salon is beautiful. The staff is helpful. And Leslee is the best! I highly  recommend MCN and Leslee. 2 co-workers of mine now go to her and they are both very happy as well!
I really like SoHo.  First off, it's located on the north shore and close to everything.  Nice bar, friendly staff, sleek and modern.  Great place to watch a game, LCD screens everywhere.  Skip the other appetizers and start with the angry shrimp.  They do a really good job with a filet mignon.  The salmon picata looked yummy, but since it wasn't mine, I didn't get to taste it.  If you don't want a big meal, they have all the usual sandwiches and burgers.  For dessert, have the banana bread pudding or some yummy chocolate fudge cake!  Or, if you're not feeling fancy, just throw back a few beers and bacon cheddar burger.  It's that kind of place, too.
LUNCH:  This was one of my favorite lunch spots when I lived and worked in Pittsburgh. I was a creature of habit though - - for lunch I very seldom strayed from their wonderful lobster bisque and a nice mixed green salad. It was the perfect lunch. Served quickly, which gave me plenty of time for the nice walk to and from work.\n\nDINNER: For dinner, when I had more time, it was always nice to venture into one of their other great seafood offerings. They have a couple of great salmon dishes that I really like and a striped bass. All seafood is fresh and prepared with care. Chicken and steak, but I never tried them - -  too many good seafood choices. Very nice presentations.\n\nSUSHI: They have an extensive sushi menu - for those of you who are big sushi fans. Me?  Not so. But I have friends who are and they rave about the sushi here. \n\nOne of the things I like best about this place is that the menu includes info on where your dinner was born, raised and caught.\n\nSUSTAINABLE FISHES\nThey exclusively serve Lummi Island Salmon\nhttp://www.lummiislandwild.com \n\nTilapia, NC\nLouisiana Catfish, LA\nAtlantic Salmon\nRainbow Trout, ID \n \nWILD LINE CAUGHT FISH\nDayboat Fluke, NJ\nLummi Island Salmon, BC \nTombo, HI\nWaluu, HI\nShutome Swordfish, HI\nStriped Bass, NJ\nPintado, Brasil \nChilean Sea bass\n#1 Ahi Tuna, HI\nMahi Mahi, C.R.\nWild Sea Scallops, MA\nDiver Scallops, Baja \n7 oz. Lobster Tail, SA\n \nFor an inland seafood restaurant this one rivals many costal ones I've eaten at. Definitely an upscale, pleasant place to eat lunch or dinner. Great service, quiet relaxed atmosphere. \n\nYes, it is a little pricey. If you want cheap fried seafood, head on over to Long John Silvers or Captain D's. But I bet you can't get them to tell you where their seafood came from . . . even if they know!  And, even if they do, you probably don't want to know!\n\nYou get what you pay for - in both food & service.
Was a little hesitant to eat here because of the average to below average reviews. But it was in our hotel and we were famished.\n\nBut we were pleasantly surprised by our meals that were extremely delicious. I got the Waluu/Butterfish (highly recommend this, although it was a special) and the wife got the corn-meal crusted wall-eye (the bacon whipped mash potatoes were awesome). The service was prompt and on point. For dessert, the creme brulee and cheesecake (with fruit compote) was fantastic as well. The sushi appetizer I got was good (as good as sushi can be) and the Blue Crab soup/bisque got rave reviews from my wife.\n\nTo boot, since we were going to go see a show at the Benedum, we got 15% off by showing our tickets! \n\nIf I had to nitpick a con about our experience was that the wine we got (Raimat Chard and some california Riesling) was underwhelming. \n\nWe look forward to coming back again.
High end seafood attached to a high end hotel. I liked the large bar area where I had lunch. Tried the fish (Cod) sandwich that was fresh and high quality. Great service too. I would return again when in town for any reason.
We had our reception at The Pennsylvanian in Pittsburgh. Opening Night Caterers was our first choice and we were not disappointed!! From the first meeting, to the wonderful tasting, to the preparation and set up, to the big day, we could not have been more pleased with the service or the food. Everyone raved about it being the best wedding food ever! And the cake!! Delicious and beautiful. I would highly recommend to anyone!
I was driving on a road trip from Ohio to Virginia and my parking brake light turned on while I was on the highway, so I figured it would be safest to pull of the road and have it checked out before I kept driving; this one happened to be the first one off the exit. Lu was quite the character: friendly and knowledgeable and Mike and the other guys were very friendly as well.  Lu got us in and out. He saw that the brake fluid was low and added some fluid for free and then put my car up on the lift and inspected the brakes just to make sure.  I was back on the road in no time and I'm so grateful for their friendly and fast service.  Seriously, these guys were great. Lu also took the time to describe and show me exactly what was going on with my car and so I felt safe hitting the road.  The problem was fixed and I appreciated their help so much, I got to my destination and created a Yelp account just so I could let everyone know what a great group of guys work there.  Thanks!
A beautiful little bar with an exciting \"martini\" list - do step outside your comfort zone and try one of the crafted drinks.
My family and I went to Olive or Twist before a Pirate Game. The food was delicious! I had the crab cake sandwich. The happy hour specials were also a plus. I had a cake batter martini which was tasty! The location is also convenient for anyone going to a game. We walked over Roberto Clemente bridge and were right there. We will definitely be going back! Great work Olive or Twist!
Always a good spot if you are craving a martini. As per the waitress recommendation, I ordered a pear martini and my husband had a Moscow mule. Both were delicious without being sweet. \n\nSome might find the dinner selection limited but I think it allows for the restaurant to highlight some great dishes. My husband had the Tuscan steak sandwich and he could not stop raving about it. He loved the pretzel roll that it was served on. I went a little more traditional and ordered a burger but it was a perfectly cooked burger. \n\nThis is not our first time stopping at Olive or twist and it will not be our last!
$3.00 fresh baked Italian loaf, need I say more.  The Italian bread is so yummy and makes great bruschetta.  They bake their bread fresh daily and do not include any preservative so eat it quick!
My heart is still trying to get back into regular running mode.. The portions from this place are insane.  Food is delicious, decor looks like a dirty truck stop.  \n\nThe omelets are INSANE, bigger than my head.. speaking of things bigger than my head.. the Sausage patties are in fact that large.  \n\nService is what you'd expect, pretty good for an overworked crew.
This review is for both the particular location that I used back on September 23rd, 2012 and for Avis' customer service on their 800 number just now.\n\nI had arrived to Pittsburgh at 6am via bus from NYC and had several options for renting a car (see photo). Avis turned out to be the best deal on top of being located in an easy-to-find location (in addition to being easy to return the car).\n\nI was aware of a 29-minute grace period before being charged another day (or hour). The clock/timer on the parking garage entrance was 6 minutes fast, and me being me, this mattered. It said I returned at 8:47 even though my cell phone showed 8:41am. I immediately took a photo, intending to use this in case I were to be overcharged, even though the location doesn't open for business until 9am and wouldn't be able to rent the car out to anyone for another ~20 minutes anyway.\n\nI was back in Pittsburgh on October 9th and made it a special point to get back to the place so I could resolve the situation in person. It turned out that it's hard for the particular store location to make adjustments if it's been more than a few days. The guy there, Francis, said it's not a huge deal to make the adjustment but that it's out of his control and that if I call the 800 number, it should be fine.\n\nPause for ~6 months.\n\nSo yeah, today I finally made time to pick up the papers and phone and make a call. They first said I returned the car late and then after I explained the situation and offered to send the photo I took that demonstrates the clock discrepancy, they gave me a 'one-time courtesy' and I'm now ~75 dollars richer. Or less poor. Your call.
You know how you say, \"I want a big change!\" but then you get in the stylist's chair and you're like, \"I'm looking for a change, but only take about an inch off,\" and then you still want to cry when you leave the salon bc you're hair is too short?\n\nI lost 4 inches of hair and got bangs and I only wanted to cry a little bit, when she made the first snip!  I freaking loved my hair.  LOVED.MY.HAIR.  Bangs! \n\nBangs!  And not the kind that you thought would make you look like Zooey Deschanel but instead you look like you are 10 and your mom got your hair cut at Fantastic Sams and never, ever, ever lay right!\n\nBangs!  Like long, sweeping bangs that fell right and made all my friends say, \"I wish I could pull of bangs!\"\n\nI LOVE THIS PLACE.  They moved to Lawrenceville a few years ago, and I havent been to the new salon yet bc its been that long since I've had my haircut which is so sad.  It's like witch craft, what they do with hair, and I need some magic.\n\nI highly recommend this salon.
God I miss this place. Best sandwiches in the Burgh. If you are down near the Strip, you have got to swing by here. Get the pastrami or roast beef and do not ask for the slaw or fries on the side. It's all on there for a purpose and it is a gloriously messy sandwich.
Whenever I happen to be in Pittsburgh, I would come by to this great place for lunch.\n\nThe sandwiches are HOT! Whether it is steak & cheese, or fish & cheese, or even hot sausages and cheese, man, it is ALL good. With literally a pile of tasty french fries and sauerkraut like cold slaw in the middle, the sandwich is huge, all for under $6. Add a local Yuengling beer (America's oldest and best brewery) if you like.\n\nIf the sandwich is too much for you to handle, take a stroll at the tri-state park.\n\nThe place is usually very busy at lunch time, with waitresses hustling around, wearing store T-shirt knotted around the waist, dashing in and out (since they do have outdoor tables). On the back of their T's, there is a vivid picture of the gigantic sandwich. When they turn around, you just cannot help notice their boobs too. I guess the sandwiches are as attractive as nice boobs :-)\n\nA drooling place. Period.
If ewe don like Primanti's, yer a jag-off.\n\nAs much a Pittsburgh institution as the Stillers, Irn City, and Sophie Masloff.  Much like referring to Kleenex, to native yinzers, you just go and get a Primanti's.  No need for any further descriptives.  \n\nThe secret to the sandwich is the bread: thickly sliced Mancini's bread.  Rumor has it that Primanti's opened a location in Florida.  It didn't do very well because they weren't able to get the Mancini's.  There you go.  My favorite version of the Primanti's is the steak and cheese.  It's a beef patty and cheese (not sliced beef as in a cheese steak).  This is the only thing I will eat tabasco on.  Fresh, thick cut fries and mild vinegar based cole slaw.  Piled up perfection.\n\nOnly visit the Strip District location for the full effect.  The other locations pale in comparison.
I am still trying to figure out how to transport a few sandwiches back on the plane.....There is just something about Pittsburgh and their traditional comfort food!  I have addicted my husband.
So had a short stop at pittsburgh before heading out to the airport and decided to go on a food adventure...  After getting lost and going to the closed location, I finally found this one at market square.  I paid for parking and boy was it worth it!\n\nThe classic pastrami is too good! Crisped edges and stacked with vinegary slaw and crisp homey fries!  Lived up to the hype! Trip was worth it.
When there's this much hype about a place, it's hard to live up to, but they did a pretty damn good job. Maybe not the best sandwich I've ever had in my life, but if it was any random sandwich shop I'd happened to stumble into, it would definitely be five stars without a second thought.\n\nThe chili cheese fries were among the best I've ever had. I don't know what they do to them - it's not the chili that's particularly great, it's not the cheese that's particularly great, and it's not the fries that are particularly great. But somehow, putting them all together just turns it into unbeatable awesome.\n\nThe sandwich itself (I got the corned beef) was very good despite the fact that I hate coleslaw. But they don't mean the typical mayo-and-carrot-and-purple-onion coleslaw; they make it with vinegar and oil, so it's basically just like seasoned lettuce. They put a bit much of it on, which overwhelmed the rest of the ingredients at first, but just pull about half of the slaw off and you have a kick-ass sandwich. The hot sauce goes really well on it too. And for a pretty reasonable price, I might add. Normally, I'd expect it to be about twice as much with that kind of reputation and downtown location.
Ok, ok, ok, y'all need to calm down.  Quit with the 'it's too small,' 'it's a Pittsburgh thing,' and 'it's so greasy' statements.  That's what Primanti's IS.  It's a compact, greasy Pittsburgh right.  \n\nYes, the place is small, it is in Market Square, and will remain there, wouldn't you be disappointed if one day you wanted Primanti's and no more Market Square location?  I know I would.  If I were in the downtown region and had that craving I wouldn't want to have to work my way up to the Strip just for a bite of that Pittsburgh goodness.  \n\nThe 'it's a Pittsburgh' thing comments baffle me.  If you have food shows featuring the sandwich, magazines writing about it, and it's considered the 'Manliest Restaurant in America,'  I think that means it's more than just a Pittsburgh thing.  Why else would Primanti's be featured on such media?  Why else would these people centered around shows and magazines venture to a Primanti's?  I mean that has to show you it's more than just a Pittsburgh thing.\n\nAnd 'it's so greasy?'  Did you not watch them makes your sandwich, which you picked from their extensive menu, on the griddle in front of you?  Expect it to be greasy, they are frying it for you and melting that cheese on it.  Maybe don't even pay attention to the greasy factor, especially with that crunchy coleslaw and heap of fries placed between those two thick slices of Italian bread.  \n\nBetter yet, move out of my way, I'm about to chow down on that Pittsburgh grease fest awaiting my attention.
it's been close to 5 years since i've had primanti's, but after being disgusted by a knock off in chicago (i'm talking about you Lucky's).. i had to come back to give props to primanti's.\n\ni don't remember what i ordered, but do remember ordering two sandwiches only to come back 4 hours later to order another.  i do remember the monstrosity of the sandwich w/o skimping out on the meats and w/ a good ratio of meats, fries, and slaw.
Just writing a review makes my mouth water. I've only been once but I got one of the well-known pastrami sandwiches loaded with fries and cole slaw. It's huge, and if you're a snobby chick that refuses to eat like a man then don't even bother visiting. This place is seriously cool and it's featured on the Food Network, which is a big deal to a food dork like me.
Primanti bros has the best corned beef sandwich in the east, and the coleslaw, fries and tomato right on the sandwich made it totally unique. Oh and they also have a great craft beer selection.
First time going...and I LOVED IT! Great service, tasty food, and a \"hometown\" ambiance. I'm not from Pittsburgh, but this place definitely made me feel at home. The portions are huge! My only regret is that I didn't try to split a meal w/ my girlfriend.
I ate a taco here in the snow. IN THE SNOW! I've eaten a taco here sweating my bum off. I\"ve eaten a taco standing up because there's no tables. This taco stand is so amazing that I'll pretty much eat a taco here during a hurricane....if those happened in western PA! \n\nDoes this not show my true devotion to these tasty little taco's! Ok, I lied. I like them so much I just do it up big and get a burrito. It's just a magic mixture of rice, cheese, salsa and lots and lots of lime. I'm into the shrimp burrito because i love me some shrimp. But really, any type of meat or a veggie choice is going to be awesome. Plus they are cheap cheap cheap! \n\nDo me a favor and stop by this stand while you're out shopping in the strip, you will not regret it. Rain, snow or sunshine!
Just moved out to Pittsburgh from San Diego and I was so shocked to find they serve Carne Asada here. This shop is a life saver when I want to have some authentic mexican food.
Where to begin, where to begin...\n\nMore often than not, I find myself staring at my computer screen thinking about how I am going to blast an esablishment. I don't rave about \"good\" food. I rave about amazing food. The type of food that I have dreams about. The type of food that makes me want to bring about a thousand dollars cash and gorge myself untill I need an ambulance.\n\nThe taco stand outside of Reyna Foods makes just that kind of food. Too often when we think of Mexican food, we think of a variety samey tasting, samey textured mixtures of ground beef, yellow cheese, beans, and tomatoes stuffed into a processed flour tortilla covered with a plastic sauce (I'm looking at you Emiliano's). Reyna's doesn't just break the mold, they hurl it at the wall, smash the pieces with a bat and then scatter the dust in a blast furnace. The tacos here are aboslutely amazing. Fresh ingredients cooked right there on an old plancha-style grill that has absorbed the flavors of countless meals and stuffed into fresh corn tortillas are a truly enlightening experience. I mean it. \n\nThe first time I went here was to just grab a quick snack while walking around in the Strip district. I saw they offered tongue as a protein choice and thought to myself \"What the hell, in for a dime in for a dollar right?\" Best. Choice. Ever. The first bite was like reaching the Seventh Level of Enlightenment. The Buddha said I could ask one question. After careful consideration I asked, \"Can I have another taco?\" After that I made a vow that I would forever be a loyal raving fan.\n\nThe tacos are assembled to your liking. I like mine with the works: the perfectly cooked meat on the warm tortilla then covered with queso fresco, tomatoes, lettuce, onion, cilantro, fresh lime juice, and sour cream. The flavors all play well together to strike a classical tune of a Mexican bolero on the pallate. As previously mentioned, I like the tongue. It has a wonderful richness and gameyness to it that I have come to love. My far less adventurous girlfriend stays with the chicken. They have other choices ranging from pork, to steak, to shrimp, to the ever popular ground beef (gotta please everyone I guess).\n\nAfter you order your tacos, try one of the fresh made flavored waters there. The fresh lime water is always my favorite, and is there every day, but they also have hibiscus, watermelon and other flavor selections. My girlfriend got the horchata, a milk based concoction with cinnamon, nutmeg and sugar. Or you could pop inside the Mexican grocery for a Coke hecho en Mexico. My favorite Coke because they use cane sugar, not HFCS.\n\nThe only downside is that they close right around 3:00 PM.\n\nCome to Reyna's. The tacos are amazing. Do I really need to say any more?
The stand outside (edgars), chicken taco with everything on it, best ever.
This is a top-notch mexican grocery, albeit a small one. They sell corn and flour tortillas made on location that will change your life. They also make a variety of fresh salsas and dips. It also has a good selection of hot sauces and pre-packaged salsas. There is a small selection of produce to and other groceries you need but might not find at regular grocery stores. Overall a must-visit if you're making some Mexican.
Decided to try it for dinner as we were walking around the strip.  Good selection of beers too.\n\nStarted with mussels and they were very good.  Sherry butter sauce w lots of garlic.\n\nWe each had the seafood stew for dinner...tried to get beyond the lobster roll which is their signature dish\n\nStew was full of seafood.  Lobster,  clams, mussels, scallops, shrimp.  Good size portion at reasonable price.\n\nSauce was excellent and had just enough of a spice to have a nice tasting after bite but did not drown out the cream, old bay and sherry.\n\nWe will definitely be back.
With the return of nice weather to the'Burgh, I've been able to get out on lunch and do some shopping.  I took a stroll down here 'cos it felt good to get out of the office and besides, I'm getting a little tired of the coffee from Giant Eagle.  Maxwell House and Folger's are okay, but soemtimes we need a little variety.\n\nSo I picked up some Olde Vienna which is a little darker than most American roasts, but not as dark as French Roast.  I also picked up a nice Kenya AA blend.  But I'm also become a tea lover and I picked up some Stash Decaffeinated Earl Grey--makes a great ice tea!  Great coffee and service here.  It's been a few years since I was here last and I'm gonna have to stop by more often.
The first part in realizing that you have a problem is to admit it, well I have a coffee addiction. This place makes it very easy to feed my cravings by having a huge selection of regular and decaf coffees. I also think that the prices are reasonable and the staff is a lot of fun. I thank them for searching high and low when I request some coffees that may not be their biggest seller but I want to try. Stop in coffee lovers you will not be disappointed.
I can't believe this place got a bad rating!!! Sure, it's not a 5-star restaurant, but you can't beat the price or the food!!!\nWhy would you order french fries at a Greek restaurant? I want everyone to disregard the previous bad rating about this place. \nI live about a block away from Salonika's, and I absolutely love it. The first time I went in, I noticed that it was rockin while every restaurant nearby was empty. Very good sign, trust me!!\nSure, there are no waiters. You order at the front counter and linger around until your food is ready, but I've never had to wait more than a few minutes. \nThe food is absolutely amazing!!! And cheap!!! My boyfriend loves the chicken with pasta, which is exactly what it says it is: pasta with chunks of chicken. It is lightly seasoned, but no heavy sauces. And it's amazingly filling. \nI always get the Greek salad or the pastitsio. The greek salad comes loaded with onions, feta, olives, and jalapeno peppers that are marinated in some kind of garlic marinade. And there is always enough dressing!!! Homemade dressing at that. \nThe pastitsio is definitely an acquired taste. It's like a greek lasagne, but without cheese. It consists of a large layer of very spiced beef, then layers of noodles and a cream sauce. \nI bring a lot of friends to Salonika's when they trek downtown to hang-out with me, and EVERY SINGLE PERSON I have introduced to this place absolutely LOVES IT!!! I usually make them get a gyro, and I can't tell you how many of my friends will go back up for another one because they are so good. The gyro meat is fresh, in fact they carve it right there. \nThere is also a bar in the back of the restaurant. I kind of wish it wasn't there because it attracts some \"unsavories\" and takes away from the atmosphere in the restaurant. But you can't win them all.\nKeep in mind that this is a cash-only establishment, so hit the ATM on the way. \nYou will not be disappointed with this place. This place is really a gem!!!
This place has one of the best Gyro's around..... They are cheap and Delicious......  The only thing I wish was that they took credit/debit cards.  If you want something that is fast and well worth the money I would recommend this place..... I have come downtown just to eat here. LOVE LOVE LOVE the GYROS!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
I love this place. Gyros, spinach pie, fries and hummus. Way better than any other gyro place in Pittsburgh.
One of my absolute favorite places to eat in Pittsburgh.  The meals are a little bit more expensive than you normally want to eat as a student (I probably spend $20-25 with appetizer and dessert), but the food makes this hole-in-the-wall truly worth a trip.\n\nChristo is the owner of the restaurant and was at one time employed upon the Onassis yacht.  Years ago when I first came to his restaurant, he was the head waiter on a staff of one.  More recently when I have gone, there have been other hired waiters.  The service isn't great, but it's not terrible either.\n\nThe food offerings include standard middle eastern fare: hummus, baba ghanouj, phyllo-dough wrapped pockets, and kabobs.  The desserts also include standard middle eastern desserts like baklava and strong coffees, but the signature dessert is the Onassis dessert, a syrup-soaked cake topped with custard and whipped cream, dusted with cinnamon.  The last time I was there, he had added a chocolate Onassis dessert, which was also excellent.\n\nMy normal meal there consists of baba ghanouj (which is about the best I've ever had....it's a real hit-or-miss dish, and Christo's knocks it out of the park), a combination (lamb & chicken) kabob, and the Onassis dessert.\n\nIt's out of the way, but well worth a trip!
We were downtown looking for some place to eat before the show when I man standing outside showed us a menu. Boy, we were not the least disappointed. After hummus and pita chips, we all started off with an excellent very tasty fresh salad. The leg of lamb of excellent as was the sides of grilled vegetable and rice. I don't usually like hummus but it was tasty and excellent. The Jackie O cake is to die for.  We agree that the waiter were sort of odd, but in a very good way. Excellent prices. Homemade wine was also excellent.
Spag Warehouse is the best value for money in the tri-state area.... damn good food!!
The rates here are perfectly reasonable. I have no idea if it costs women more, but it costs me less than $20 for my haircut. I do see an equal number of males and females in this place. Katie, specifically, is fantastic. She is very smooth and efficient, but double checks to make sure everything is right before sending me on my way. Couldn't recommend this place more.
Really marvelous art presented in a beautiful setting.  The gift shop is one of the best in the city.  They feature crafts from artists around the world and local.  Shows are well lit and well presented.  Downstairs are studios where they teach classes on metals, wood, fiber, mixed media and book/paper arts (beginning to advanced). They do a great job of hosting outside events and fundraisers.
The last time I ate at a Morton's was in Houston, TX, so I was very excited when BJ suggested that we dine here Saturday night. Had a 7:30 pm reservation, was greeted promptly and led to a comfy corner booth. The restaurant was very busy. Our server Georgeann was very friendly and hit it off right away with BJ. The two of them kept me entertained all night long! I don't know which one was the funniest. Well, BJ wins hands down. \n\nWe pondered the wine bible for a bit, but BJ is a beer dude (they have a somewhat limited selection) and I am more of a cocktail girl. Loved the cosmopolitans there. Very delicious. \n\nWe bypassed the appetizers, we both got Morton's salads, which were huge. I had a single cut filet and a crab cake, BJ also got a filet and bacon wrapped scallops. Both our steaks were very flavorful and cooked to perfection. For our sides, we shared asparagus and a loaded baked potato. \n\nWe could not pass on dessert. I had to have Morton's Legendary Hot Chocolate Cake and BJ had the Key Lime Pie. The chocolate cake was amazing, I love it. So did BJ.  He ate it instead of his pie.  We got the pie to go and it was also very, very good. \n\nGreat place for a special occasion. We had a wonderful evening.
Great place  . My favorite steak reaturant in Pittsburgh . The bar area could be bigger . The valet's were professional and quick .
I ordered the center-cut ribeye for entree. It was delicious. \nThe environment is nice and servers are polite. Recommended.
I love this Morton's. .the staff is great and the food is amazing..the ribeye was great and scallops wrapped bacon amazing
Refined, classic style steak restaurant, Mortons will not disappoint those who are looking for a traditional upper end place. \n\nYards of linen, tons of silverware, and hordes of waiters make this place a must go in Pittsburgh.\n\nOur table of six enjoyed perfectly done steaks and fillets, beautiful accompaniments of vegetables and potatoes, great salads,  excellent desserts, along with an impressive wine offering.  \n\nExpect to pay heavily for this experience, it is well worth it.
Came here with my family for my fathers birthday. This place had it right from the start. Amazing menu. I had a porterhouse with lobster tail (same thing my father got) and we were both pleased! The staff was very very good and helpful. Everything we got to eat that night was 5 stars and exceeded all expectations. Cannot wait to go back!
$3 chicken on a stick. The best value I know of in Pittsburgh and one of the tastiest things I can think of eating. Love that stuff and get it every time I'm in Pitt early enough to make it to the Strip District. They have a little table outside you can sit and eat at as well. The grocery store is alright, but I have no clue what most the stuff in there is, I always just go for the chicken.
Charming store with high quality items.  I've purchased business cards and placesetting cards. The staff was very attentive and detail oriented. Great customer service.
These sandwiches are amazing. They fill you up, they're delicious, and it's chill place to go and eat. A must try.
A staple of downtown work lunch. Excellent cheesesteaks, fresh fries, and a great crew of workers.\n\nA Pittsburgh classic in it's own, Peppi's is a must-eat cheesesteak destination in the downtown area.  I've been to Peppi's in the Strip and the North Shore and unfortunately they don't quite stack up (still good though).
The best place for coffee!!! I love everything about this place.. The atmosphere, the neighborhood feel, the baristas, and the patrons (especially the little Italian men sitting outside playing cards drink espressos). A huge favorite place in my book!!!
As close as you will get to an authentic Italian cafe in Pittsburgh (or most anywhere in the U.S.).  This is one of my favorite spots in the city.  The coffee is superb, the baristas are friendly and skilled.  Sam, the owner, is almost always around to greet regulars and newcomers alike.  A dopio (double) cappuccino with a slice of pizza from Colangelo's next door is a perfect way to spend a Saturday morning.  What completes this place is the atmosphere.  On any given Saturday morning the space is packed, spilling over to the outdoor seating.  On a shelf above the coffee machines in the upper left corner has a television permanently tuned to REI, the Italian television station.  There's usually a futbol game or some Italian news broadcast playing.  Without fail there will be these elderly Italian gentlemen playing a traditional card game in the corner.  For a great cup of coffee made however you like and the atmosphere of an authentic Italian cafe, go to La Prima Espresso.
Easily the best espresso I have had in town. \n\nPrevious reviewers are correct - if you are used to the idea of a coffee shop that the local and national chains have given us, there really isn't room for that there. However, the coffee is second to none and for those of you that like to make your coffee at home, they do sell a wide selection of their beans at a reasonable price compared to other coffee shops.
Pastries and coffee you can't go wrong. You'll need to get here early if craving an almond croissant.. they tend to sell out by noon. Their other pastries are delicious as well. Try the mele as well. You can wash it all down with an expresso or what I like is an expresso macchiato!
I have fond memories of this place.  I was truly introduced to Italian Expresso and dry Italian snack pastries etc. Coming from small town Ohio and moved to the big city of Pittsburgh in the mid 90's I did not understand but got to know their product line.  My best friend at the time worked for LPE for about 7-8 years and traveled around to all of their Pittsburgh branches.  I have been to them all.  Hard working family owned  I have a fondness in my heart for this coffee.  Ground right when you order. I remember the friends and the family sitting out front until close on a Saturday afternoon parlare italiano in front of the store.  K sitting out front with her table of illustrated greeting cards. It was always packed on Saturday. I will probably add an addendum as I remember more.
I am so absolutely disappointed that Pegasus closed! The name has been around for so long and many people know of it, even if they've never stepped foot in it. Pegasus was an amazing bar/club to go to to dance, socialize and roam their 3-4 floors. The dance floor was spacious and there were so many places to go if you grew tired of dancing! I never had one bad night at Pegasus! Every night there was an amazing adventure! The staff was great and the people there were so much fun! I met some great people there and the crowd was almost always friendly and fun. I really hope that Pegasus comes back because Pittsburgh needs it!
I have had several negative experiences trying to find a good salon in the last year. Today I finally found a wonderful salon with an excellent stylist. Emily was very professional and friendly while highlighting and coloring my hair. She listened to exactly what I wanted and really did a fantastic job. I am very appreciative to her hard work and would definitely recommend this salon to everyone!
We came here to see the play \"You say Tomato I Say Shut Up!\" and what fun we had! The stage is visible from any seat, the waitress was never too far and the food was satisfying. We really had a great time and enjoyed watching a play while eating and drinking. Great time and we can't wait to come back for another show.
Best Asian grocery in Pittsburgh. Went shopping for ingredients for a Korean dish I was making and they had everything. Food is fresh also!
This is hands-down the best Asian grocery I have visited in Pittsburgh. It is a huge store and is really well-organized so you can find what you are looking for pretty quickly. The absolute best thing about this place is the fresh tofu. Besides tasting better than the stuff from the regular store, it is outrageously cheap--$1 for 3 pieces (3 pieces = about 1 & 1/2 blocks of packaged tofu) They have a great section of Asian-style noodles, snacks, and sauces, with the brand variety you will never get at a typical grocery store. They also have a really good selection of fresh produce that is hard to find in other stores.\n\nBe warned, the products do not always have English translations. This doesn't mean newbies aren't welcome, it just means you might make a few mistakes on the way. The store clerks are usually not very helpful because 1) this place runs on a very small staff and everyone is always busy, and 2) many of the employees don't speak English very well. The small staff is part of the reason this place is so cheap, so cut them a break. As for the language barrier--it's a traditional Asian grocery store, so yes, English is not their first language; don't be surprised. I don't consider these detriments because this store perfectly suits my needs. It is definitely not an introductory course in Asian cuisine, so don't expect anyone to hold your hand. But if you know what you are looking for, or if you are just feeling adventurous and willing to make a few mistakes, this place is worth a look.
I realized today that everyone should have a good tailor!  That realization came about from a trip to the lovely LuLu....\n\nI had an adorable vintage dress I had bought in Chicago last summer that was too large in all the wrong places and I kept putting off getting fixed.  I had a seamstress friend look at it and she was even stumped by the darts on the chest and how to exactly go about fixing it.  \n\nLuLu had be try the dress on and did a few simple markings and I was on my way.  She even encouraged me to make it a bit shorter, which I was on the fence about, but ultimately decided to do once she pinned it up.  I think a day or two later (after she had told me a week) she called to tell me it was done.  \n\nLet me tell you, the woman knows her way around a seam!  She worked her magic on that dress so that if fit be like a glove... it as beautiful!  I looked closer and could tell that she completely took apart the bodice to remake it so it fit me in the chest.  But she still kept the look of the dress so that the change was slight and still fit the style.  \n\nNow I'm mentally going through my closet thinking of all the things I'm excited to have her custom fit for me!  And of course, visit LuLu again, because she's so so sweet!\n\nNOTE: CASH ONLY!
Honestly, Lulu is amazing.  I'm never taking anything anywhere else to get altered!\n\nI have to admit I was a tad nervous when I put my bridesmaid dress on and she just pinched the bust, waist and hips and took measurements sans ruler and said, \"okay I'll text you when it's ready.\"  One, how can someone measure with their index finger and thumb and two, did she say text?  Did she mean email?!\n\nThe dress was completed in 3 business days, although I'm sure she works on Sunday (because she did text me to tell me so) and it fits like a glove!  It was cheap too!  Only $35 to take the bust, waist and hips in a few inches each.  She said \"don't worry about trying it on here.  I think it will be perfect.\"  Gotta love someone that takes that much pride in their work!
I needed a sweater rewoven and Lulu did an awesome job.  She was apologetic about being backed up wtih work, but I wasn't in a hurry. Pricing is very reasonable and she is very competent with her work.  I would highly recommend this business.
we were here last Nov.2011 for my bestfriend's wedding in Omni Hotel. we needed some alteration for one of the bridemaid's gown and Ms. Lou was so accommodating to our needs. it was a rush request/work and she did a great job!! thank you so much!!
The ladies here are very sweet and talented. We had 2 bridal gowns that needed a bustle and minor alterations. The prices are very reasonable, the dresses came back perfect,  and the length in time getting them back was very fast. Is recommend this shop for any and all alterations.
I can't say enough good things about Jim Ludwig's Blumengarten.  We hired them to do the flowers for our wedding in April, 2012 and the flowers were gorgeous!  My bridal bouquet was so beautiful and fragrant that it made me cry!  What I especially loved was that Jim and Linda Ludwig personally delivered the flowers to the venue.  Jim pinned the boutonniere on my husband and personally handed me my bouquet.  Such excellent customer service is rare these days and I highly recommend this business.
I'm a foreigner and wanted to send flowers to my girlfriend living in a suburb of Pittsburgh. I contacted Jim Ludwig's Blumengartens florist after finding them here. Unfortunately they didn't deliver to the city I wanted my flowers to be sent to, but the Ludwigs have been very helpful and transferred my order to another florist that covered that area. \nThe contact has been fast and very friendly. I'll recommend and would consider them again.
What a great store! Dean the owner/manager was extremely knowledgeable and helpful about which backpack was best for me.  Very generous 30-day return policy and a wide selection of travel accessories as well as luggage. A must visit if you need luggage and want to support local businesses, especially the few who are left Downtown.
My wife and I have been shopping at Specialty Luggage downtown for years.  The staff there, particularly Matthew, are always willing to take the time to try and find the best product to fit your need.  If they don't have what you need, they say so, and will try to get it for you, although more often than not, if they don't have it, it doesn't exist.  We've purchased several pieces of luggage there and many accessories and everything has always been high quality.  They've also helped us get repairs for luggage efficiently and cheerfully and if there was any ambiguity about whether something was covered by a warranty, they gave us the benefit of the doubt.  The prices are reasonable and you get a lot better service than you can get from any online retailer.  It's worth it just to visit because you'll learn a lot about what's available; we've bought things there we didn't know existed and have been delighted with the result.  It's also been a great place for gifts during the holidays because of the diversity of products they offer.
My favorite mexican restaurant. The ingredients are so fresh everything is made to order, their home made salsa is the best.  Can't go wrong with anything on the menu. Foods not grease like you get at a lot of Mexican places\n\nPortions are very generous, you will not leave hungry. Only open for lunch and only takes cash. And it can get busy for lunch but where downtown doesn't.\n\nAll in all great food, excellent staff and a great Price. My go to Mexican pick
This has to be the best diner setting Downtown, a complete archetypal flashback of the greasy spoon meal alternative.  I'm pretty much a regular (2x a week) now so I wanted to update my review to point out that they've made a couple changes (maybe a different food purveyor) and the food is even better now.  The bread is fresher than ever, the turkey is nice and tender, and the bacon is scrumptious.  Service is still that  \"make yourself at home\" but \"don't take yourself too seriously\" that I truly enjoy.
Walk through the door and immediately the sweet, spicy scents of flowers and greens envelops your senses. Fresh green earthy ferns, spiky AND soft cacti, terrariums filled with tiny worlds you'd love to explore in Tiny Alice form all crowd antique tables, shelves and hutches - a bounty of natural wonders there for sweet discovery. \n\nThe walls teem with both strikingly colorful and softly demure wreaths and wall accents. One glass topped and fronted case has huge jars of the most wonderful potpourri that you can scoop to your heart's content....just imagining your bedroom, living room, your entire home smelling like a little piece of heaven. \n\nThen, just as you pass that glass case an open door and a secret garden beckons with wonders of green outside. Melodious chimes, gurgling water, wondrous plants that you are certain deserve special places under no less than the glass roofs of Phipps Conservatory. \n\nWhat a wonderful respite from the rush and noise of the Strip....a quiet oasis. Thanks, Roxanne. Well done.
I adore Roxanne's! There are so many beautiful arrangements and terrariums, and a great variety of live plants inside and out. You can also find lovely home decor in the form of side tables and such. On that note, I have even purchased an ethically made dress here! The employees are always a pleasure to chat with, and prices are reasonable for the quality you get. Even if you're not in the market for any of the aforementioned, stop in here and fulfill your senses.
J'adore this store!!!  So beautiful and filled with many inspiration pieces. Very much on the pricey side, but a check online shows me that their stock is not too overpriced. This is def a room in heaven. :)
Oh Andy, how I miss your little swagger and sass! I know this is a difficult one to rate, since he runs a stand within another establishment (Wholeys) but I am giving 5 glowing stars nontheless for the amazing sushi he makes (right in front of you) and his stellar personality. I have never met a person with blood flowing in their veins that didn't get a total kick out of Andy.\n\nWhen I worked in the Strip, I ate here almost daily. After only two visits, he remembered exactly what I ordered and would start making it as soon as he saw me: spicy yellowtail with avocado. Or just yellowtail with avocado. Maybe some cucumber. Have I mentioned that I am obsessed with yellowtail? Ahhhh, the buttery-ness, the texture, the slight taste of the sea....oh wait, this isn't a review on a singular fish, i got a little carried away (even though Andy serves up some damn fine YT)! \n\nSometimes he gets creative and mashes different flavor concepts together for you to sample as you wait. He once came up with a maki roll made of salmon, basil, cucumber and mango....brilliant!!\n\nWholeys is such a fantastic people watching spot anyway and it's always amusing to see random people of all ages/genders/sizes walk in and yell \"ANDY\"!
Andy has the best Sushi. His special sauce is what makes his sushi the best.
Seriously,best sushi in Pittsburgh. Freshest ingredients, huge portions and very reasonable pricing. And yeah, Andy gives free samples if you smile at him!
Ate here last night and it was absolutely the best meal I have had at Sushi Kim. Wife got the usual pork bulgogi and I got standar dol sut bi-bim-bap. \n\nIt was unbelievably good. It wasn't because I was really hungry. It was perfect. Every single bit of both meals was perfectly proportioned and seasoned. And the side dishes were GREAT except I really missed not having sweet potato and little omelet ban chan. I will cut out Dosani and Korean Kitchen as long as Sushi Kim keeps this up!
We are so lucky to have such an amazing theater community in Pittsburgh.  This unique theater adds so much to the mix!  It's a fantastic theater because they focus on plays, usually with one musical in the mix. There's new works here, like the original show The Chief, about what else, but Pittsburgh Steelers founding owner Art Rooney.  They bring in the classics like A Midsummer Night's Dream and The Important of Being Earnest.  They also have newer works right off Broadway, like The Rabbit Hole and Superior Donuts.  Plus, they bring in Second City every year, which is big in my book because they've spawned a couple SNL cast members!! \n\nI absolutely LOVE the theater!  I'm a big fan of a theater in the round.  That means there's seating on 3 sides of the stage.  They've also been able to do some really cool things with the stage/set, like making an actual pool for the show Metamorphoses.  My favorite all time show was The Secret Letters of Jackie and Marilyn, which was a world premiere.  The show was about a made up relationship between the two women where they wrote letters to each other.  It was a VERY cool concept! \n\nThey also do a lot of great events like the Mix at 6 for young professionals before a show.  Plus, they understand that most of us under 26 (and of course sometimes above) are broke ho's, they offer $15 tickets!  The great thing is, there's really not a bad seat in the house! \n\nAgain, we have a fantastic theater district, so TAKE ADVANTAGE and go here!  Don't make me tell you twice!!
Totally underrated by the Yelpers!\n\nI freakin' LOVE Redfin Blues.  I'm kind of glad it had a low rating previously to keep y'all away while I was living in Pittsburgh!  The only reason I'm even reviewing it now is because I have moved away and I'm not at risk for losing my table to a Yelp reader.  Also, I feel guilty at not letting people in on this gem.\n\nTo be clear, I LOVE Redfin Blues for a very SPECIFIC purpose: sitting outside on the patio by the water on a Saturday or Sunday afternoon drinking the bar out of Red Stripe and white wine and eating peel and eat shrimp by the 2 pound bowl with B, Ems, Boyfriend, and whoever else is so lucky.  It is a hidden gorgeous Pittsburgh oasis under the 31st bridge near Washington's Landing (note: the Yelp map is wrong) where you don't feel at all like you're in Pittsburgh, but instead on vacation.\n\nDisclaimer: I have heard that at night it is full of strange frat boys (from no actual fraternity), Cougars, tramps, creatures of the night  -- or undesirables.  I don't go at night so my credibility wanes here a little.\n\nI basically only ever eat the peel and eat shrimp.  It's just cooked shrimp - sometimes it's big, sometimes it's little.  But it's $17 for TWO pounds which isn't too overpriced especially since it can feed a tableful of friends.  Ask for extra old bay if you like it spicy and salty - yum! I've also had the fried cod sandwich - the fish is crisp and flaky and darn good!  I always take it off the bread to keep it as crispy as possible but those who know me know I have an obsession with fried crispy-ness.  The breading isn't too too heavy so that is a plus too.  I've also had the crab cakes which are meh  but fine for Pittsburgh standards and I would definitely steer clear of the crab legs.  \n\nOk, so really you should go to this place - if you like peel and eat shrimp, cold drinks by the river, and occasionally a keyboardist who plays and sings in the background pretty quietly.  Some of my favorite Pittsburgh moments happened here and that's saying a LOT.  Redfin Blues makes me miss you Pittsburgh!
This is SUCH a gorgeous boutique -- shabby chic furnishings galore! If you're in the market for truly unique, special furniture and live anywhere near Pittsburgh, Hot Haute Hot is the place you're looking for. \n\nI came here with my friend who had long been on a quest to find a new dining room table. The options here were so gorgeous I was immediately struck with envy. There are curio cabinets, amazing reclaimed ceiling tile mirrors, plush chairs, fantastic lamps and a bevy of side tables, wall hangings and of course, dining room tables. \n\nThe service is impeccable -- sweet, helpful women who know every item in their shop and are just as excited to help you shop as you are to find perfect item. The taste level in this store is impressive, as well. \n\nAs a bonus, they have a few displays of fun, affordable jewelry ranging from delicate to super funky. Take your time to pick through this shop and enjoy yourself while doing it -- I certainly did!
Just as I was about to give up on finding a downtown hair salon, I found Denham & Company and Dan!  Quite a nice cut and those yummy Aveda products, to boot.  \n\nComfortably eclectic is how I'd describe the shop in Market Square just to the right of NOLA and up a steep flight of stairs.  Antiques on beautiful hardwood floors interspersed with contemporary salon chairs make for warm and friendly surroundings, which is just exactly what I found in the staff, too...warm and friendly AND skilled.\n\nThanks Dan AND Denham & Company!  You've restored my faith in downtown hair salons!
Sheer ecstatic bliss is what this place should be called! wonderful talented friendly hairdressers!  My friend and I went there for the first time today, let them cut our follicle fillers as they saw fit, and have never been more satisfied in our short little lives.\n\nIf you want bumpin' style and sexy looks, HIT IT UP!!!!
I've tried many different salons throughout the city since moving here 6 years ago, and once I found Tim at Denham & Co, I haven't gone anywhere else! My hair is crazy thick and I always have troubles coloring it but Tim always gets the perfect shade and cuts it in the best way. I get so many compliments on the color anywhere I go. The price is definitely worth it, plus you'll have a great time while you're there - staff is super friendly and talkative. If you're looking for stylish look, need help with color, suggestions for a overall new look - go here! 2 of my best friends already have gone here after I did.
Dan is awesome!
Julie does a fantastic job. Been going to her for years. The attention to detail is tremendous and I come away with a haircut I can have confidence in.
I'm not sure why this place isn't getting better reviews! I've been here twice over the last couple months (including yesterday)  and have been very happy each time I've gone.\n\nCaffe Amante is located on the second floor (food court) level of Fifth Avenue Place, the home of HighMark Blue Cross Blue Shield.\n\nAmongst most of the mediocre chain food that's served on the same floor, it stands out as basically the only(or one of a few) sit down places available.  \n\nBoth times the service was right on point.  Quick, efficient, despite being busy, friendly, wait-until-I-finish-my-sentence-sensitive, good recommendations on food.  Corrected themselves when they were wrong in what they told me previously and so on.\n\nThe two dishes I've had are:\n\nSpecial Salmon and jumbo lump crab meat.  It was expertly cooked, great flavors, good portion size, and overall just a winning dish.\n\nDi Mare Amante which is a dish with shrimp, scallops, in a white clam sauce with capellini noodles.  Their menu spells it with two p's: cappellini.\n\nBoth were great and I'd have them again.\n\nYou know, part of my review and rating is based on exactly what this place is: a more upscale place for the mostly business clientele bringing their customers out for a conveniently located lunch. In a restaurant that is more or less in a food court. Being surrounded chinese joints, mexican burrito places, and the philly cheese steak place.\n\nWhile I think it would be a solid bet for dinner as well --- that's not how I see this place positioned. I wouldn't take a date here Friday or Saturday night. There are more exciting places offering more adventures fare.\n\nThis is not your $8 lunch.... most things are priced $12-$16 which includes bread. Their prices well justified by the quality of the food.\n\nFor lunch, I'd go back to this place in a heartbeat.
Located downtown, call Dr. Greg and he can get you in that day, sometimes within the hour.  He's a cool guy, very friendly, and not a new-age, hippy, sales-y doctor like some of the other chiropractors that I've been to.  Accepts insurance & FSA...if you work downtown, I recommend him.
Everyone at Salon Nuvo is a professional.  Everyone is friendly and it's a really great salon.  Chrissy has done my hair for almost 15 years (she moved to Salon Nuvo about 2 years ago) and I trust no one else to perm or color my hair.  Chrissy understands chemicals and how to maintain healthy hair.  She's a dedicated professional and has always been flexible - she let's me come in late to accommodate my work/school schedule.  And everyone I've ever referred to her has been a happy customer :-)  I'm pretty brutal on my hair (lots of heat and don't deep condition as often as I should, in addition to a fair amount of every day stresses)....If Chrissy didn't maintain and take care of my hair, I'd probably be bald by now!  She keeps it trimmed, healthy, and growing!!!  And she's super sweet....it's a delight to sit in her chair :-)
I have been going to Salon Nuvo for about two years now. Autumn does my hair and she is amazing. I have very fine, thinning hair and the cut is always flattering. And Autumn seems quite supportive of my desire to not color my very grey hair, which is something I have not had in other salons ... there has always been a push to do some sort of coloring treatment.
I came here for lunch recently and all was excellent. I come here about 4 times a year. When I do go I prepare myself by not eating red meat several days prior to going. On the day of I make sure to eat a normal but smaller breakfast. No bagels as they occupy too much space. I arrive a bit later, I am a bit hungrier and the staff that remains are long time regulars who know me but are also there to earn a living and make my visit worthwhile. I always order a filet, medium with mushrooms. I don't drink when go, the beef is too good to have my senses misdirected. The plate and filet arrive in minutes, the plate is sizzling at 500 degrees, if by chance there is too much red in the meat I cut a piece and sizzle it right there on the plate. I recently tried the salmon on a recommendation from the owner and was wowed how good it was. Panko crumbs and lemon, great stuff. \nI always feel they go the extra mile for me but the food and service are always top notch i can assume this is the standard.
Always amazing! My Husband and I frequent Ruth's Chris for almost every special-occasion: birthdays, anniversaries, when we need a great meal; and without fail we leave euphoric. \n\nAfter almost each bite, we close our eyes to shut-out the sense of sight to focus on the taste and aroma of the garlicky, creaminess of the Remoulade on our salads; the richness of the Pesto on our Sea Scallops; the buttery-goodness of our dry-aged steak; and the salty crunch of our French Fries, which Kathy suggested we dip into Honey-mustard for a fantastic salty-sweet combination.\n\nFriday is a good reason to go... Reservations are calling!
I loved my everything about my experience at Ruth Chris.  It was a bit expensive, but the service was outstanding and the food was delicious.  \nI would definitely go again.
No matter which location I go to, I am never disappointed with Ruth's Chris.  I would live here if I could...  Feeling hungry?  Try the Porterhouse...AWESOME!
Best Steaks in Pittsburgh!!! I come here a lot for special occasions.  It is a pricy place but it is worth every penny. I had a New York Strip and it was really tender and juicy.  Definitely one of my favorite restaurants.  The service is excellent also.
Always top notch service and food at Ruth's Chris Pittsburgh. They have some summery specials during these cold winter months to bring you out of the post-holiday funk, which is very refreshing to see. Stop in for lunch for great deals on amazing food. Their lunch cuts of beef, chicken and fish include 2 sides and a salad for an extremely reasonable price. I got the lunch petite filet, veggies, mashed potatoes and appetizer salad for 28 bucks! Not bad for a steakhouse. Our server was incredible, as usual, and was extremely attentive of my gluten-free needs. The servers are extremely knowledgeable of the menu and will accommodate you no matter what. The decor is a bit dated and is due for a remodeling, but perhaps that will be on the list of things to do for the chain since they are celebrating their 25th anniversary this year!
I read an article recently in the Post-Gazette that says to wring the most wear out of what they own, people are visiting auto mechanics, cobblers, tailors and computer repair experts as they haven't in years.  I believe it.  Business at Ullrich's has been good recently, especially since they moved into their present location.  Ullrich's has been around in one form or another for over 80 years and a couple of years ago they moved to their present location.\n\nUllrich's offers a full line of services including shoe and purse repair, desalt and waterproofing, and jacket and zipper repair.  Can't make it into their store?  You can even send your shoes to be repaired via mail!  No, really!  Check it out!    http://www.ullrichshoerepair.com/mailorder.htm\n\nAnyway, my husband Rick asked me to drop off his shoes to get them resoled here.  I just picked them up on lunch a few minutes ago and they look practically new.  He had me drop off his leather jacket to have a tear repaired last year and they did a fantastic job.  I've had one of my purses repaired here too.  We've always been satisfied with their work.  \n\nIt's so good to see people renovate and repair rather than throw out.  Rick and I have been doing that for years.
Hey, they linked to my review on their website!   Just click on News & Links and then on Customer Review http://www.ullrichshoerepair.com/newslinks.htm  Like Steve Martin in \"The Jerk\" when he finds his name in the phone book, I guess I'm somebody now!  \n\nAll kidding aside, Ullrich's came in handy last week.  I broke a heel and they did a great job repairing it.  They've resoled Rick's shoes, repaired a tear in his leather jacket, and repaired one of my purses.  We've always been happy with their work.
Miracle worker. Genius.  The guy here is amazing. This may be the best place on earth. I only recently discovered the fabulousness of having your shoes repaired instead of throwing them out. I walked in there with heels on that were so beat I was walking on metal rods (don't judge). He fixed them in about 10 minutes and they looked brand new.  \n\nYesterday I took my most favorite pair of boots, a unique pair of Steve Madden cognac leathers with rawhide ties up the backs, in with the hopes they could be salvaged.  The boot heals were slowly breaking down. Not only did he completely replace the heels to look like the day I bought them, but he shined them all up all pretty and suggested a cream to put on them to make them last forever.  He said they'd last 40 years. I said 'you, me and these boots are gonna be lifelong friends'. \n\nBest cobbler ever!!!
So I don't ever go Downtown because well Downtown is kind of icky. Eh, whatever I guess that's really besides the point. Anywho, After getting my eyebrows done at Princess Nails from Michelle (EYEBROW FAIRY!) I needed to cut a new set of keys because apparently holding onto keys is lost on me. I doubt my landlord wants to be woken up at 2:00am to let me in again either. After calling 7349651474 locksmiths that wouldn't duplicate keys because they're stooopid someone from the Office Depot sent me to Ulrichs Shoe Repair. Yes, Shoe Repair. Fix your shoe, make a key. Upon entering Ulrichs (I think it was the owner) was super friendly and I'll give him credit for being somewhat funny. Gave him my keys and in literally 30 seconds flat both keys were made AND they both worked. Usually going to somewhere like Home Depot you have to go back like 3 times for the key to work properly. Not in this case. Overall customer service amazing. Quality of service amazing. Plus super cheap too! $2 bucks a key. Um that's a deal if I ever saw one.
I've been to Ullrich's twice and both times received excellent service.\n\n My first time at Ullrich's was to have the end caps of my heels replaced (for a second time). Initially I went to another repair store in Sq Hill and had them replaced -- but the replacement heels were totally wore out again within a couple months.  Went to Ullrich's to have them redone and after 6 months of hard walking, the heels are still wearing great.  \n\nI won't go any where else.
I am really careful with how my shoes are handled. Every time I buy a new pair of shoes, I immediately have sole protection covered. This was actually my first time doing anything like this in the states, and I really wanted to go to a place that does a perfect job. \n\nAt the shop I met Rex, whom he was very kind and friendly. Still, I was still skeptical about this shop so before I departed after giving my new pair of shoes I asked a one last final request to be EXTRA careful with my shoes. And guess what? He did an amazing job and I am really happy how he got it to be perfectly thin as I wanted.
I can't find a complaint about this place.  Drinks are reasonable.  Only ever seems to be a $1 cover.  Couches for lounging.  Pool table.  Room for dancing if you want to (no one hardly seems to).\n\nStaff is super friendly.  During Pride it is a place you can stop into to get a drink cheaper than the beer tents outside.
The owner and her parents are delightful, helpful and kind. I often stop in here for a little treat or blast from the past. I grew up in England and love that I can buy chocolates that I loved as a child. If you need a recommendation or a gift, they are always willing to help you choose something or put together a little gift basket within your price range.
I don't think I've ever seen this great a variety of chocolate assembled in one place in my life! I think Augustus Gloop might have a heart attack and die in here, clutching a chocolate bar in his hand. \n\nThey have chocolate from all over the world in weird and exotic flavors to normal ones too. My two nephews were allowed to pick anything they wanted, and so were my husband and I. We didn't buy much, but what we did buy, between us all, cost my sister about $100! On chocolate!!\n\nI think it's a great place to stop in if you have a choco hankering, or are in the market to try something new.
Soft, made to order bagels. Great low-fat smoothies. Staff is always nice and patient with my gazillion order changes. There's so many great choices! They also have texting sign-ups and I get free coffee and bagels with my orders all the time.
We just happened to wander in after an afternoon of exploring Pittsburgh.  What a gem!  What a lucky place to stumble in!\n\nKlavon's was a drugstore/soda fountain in the early 1900s.  All the original counters, glass cases filled with old bottles, stools, and mixers are still there.  We had the turtle sundae with amaretto whipped cream, which was amazing.  I can't wait to come back and try their phosphates and egg creams!  It was like stepping into a time machine. You can tell this place is beloved by locals; several elderly couples, families with children, and single people with dogs on leash came by for cones, sundaes, and floats on the beautiful sunny day.  The grandson of the original owners was chatting with customers, and the place had a really special vibe.\n\nYou almost never see places like this anymore - if you're in Pittsburgh, don't miss it!
When I die I hope I come back as an ice cream bowl at Klavon's so I can forever spend my days covered in mint chocolate chip and watching people smile. I don't know...maybe not, but I do love mint chocolate chip and old skool ice cream parlors and Klavon's does both really well. \n\nThis is a list of things at Klavon's that make me feel like vintage stuff isn't only for grandparents and ice cream isn't just for kids: Amaretto flavored whipped cream, swivel stools with red tops, high backed wooden booths, a man behind the counter with a pure white handlebar mustache, a hammered tin ceiling, and large pecan balls.\n\nYou can go with chocolate or vanilla, but when I get the chance to have a pecan ball, I'm no idiot, I take it. A pecan ball, my friend, is ice cream rolled in pecans, covered in hot fudge or caramel and then topped with whipped cream. That's all tasty, nutty, fudgy goodness, but if you wake up feeling like painting the town gold and you want something that tastes like it was made for Cleopatra by Mark Antony's own hands, get a scoop of coffee, a scoop of pecan and top it with Amaretto whipped cream: I'm hoping to get this added to the menu under the name \"Magic Magic Explosion.\" \n\nThey have a picture of Joe Biden posing with the owners; it's taped to the mirror behind the bar and quite adorable. \"He was very nice and left $20 for the next little girl in line to buy her ice cream with,\" the owner told me.  Also, $20 worth of ice cream?! Two scoops only runs five bucks. Joe Biden--excuse me, Mr. Biden--you are a true American hero and I, for one, am happy someone finally realized the importance of children having tons and tons and tons of ice cream. \n\nGood show, sir, good show.
Worth a visit from across the country. Klavon's recalls about 100 years ago with its true ice cream soda fountain days. It's been in the same family since around the strike of 1900 when it was a drug store and turned into this sometime in the last century. The styling seems to be a better and more true throwback than even Pittsburgh itself. Who would not like this has no soul.\n\nI only sampled the hot chocolate and two types of whipped cream, but I give it 5-stars anyways. I feel like this is an intelligent guess. The whipped cream was my favorite of all time, the amaretto whip didn't even strike me as amaretto, it swooned me lightly.
There are five reasons why you might want to go to Klavon's.\n1. You're in the Strip District anyway.\n2. You're interested in Pittsburgh history.\n3. You've never experienced an old-time soda fountain before.\n4. You're looking for some hard-to-find penny candy.\n5. You want some damn good ice cream.\n\nI went for all five reasons, and I wasn't disappointed. Wait. That doesn't express the depths of my enthusiasm for Klavon's. KLAVON'S RULES!!!!!!!!! There, that's better.\n\nLet's take it in order. You have lots of dining options in the Strip. Now, Klavon's is a few blocks away from most of the popular places (we were at Salem's, which is also great, but that's another review), but it's easy to walk to and easy to find with all the neon signs.\n\nWhen you walk in to Klavon's, you're taken back in time. Choose a little booth or table, and gaze at the decor. Maybe you'll see an old liniment bottle from back when Klavon's was a drugstore. Maybe you'll notice the high-water mark from the 1936 flood (close to the ceiling!). Maybe you'll see the old penny scale or the phone booths. This is a place where history is celebrated.\n\nThe menu isn't extensive, but you still have lots of choices. Why not try an old-time phosphate, malted, or egg cream? It was good enough for your great-grandpa; it's good enough for you. I treated myself to a root beer float. It was the best I ever had. The reason? Both the root beer and the ice cream were made locally. On the way out, why not browse the penny candy racks? For a quarter, you can try a bunch of hard-to-find treats.\n\nI'd be remiss if I didn't mention that Mr. Klavon, the grandson (I think) of the original owner, still runs the place. A glipse of his epic mustache alone is worth the visit, but he's always willing to give you a tour. Friendly people in friendly Pittsburgh. I can't wait to go back!
Easy 5. Authentic old school ice cream parlor with PSU ice cream ( peachy paterno etc). The ice cream soda was an outstanding ride in the wayback machine.
Just found this gem.  This is a great place for every ice cream lover.  Great place to hang out with friends or to go on a date.\n\nI recommend the sundaes at this place.  This is pure 50's and 60's style that isn't forced.  Staff are very friendly and patient.
Retta is knowledgeable, intuitive and strong.  She gives a great massage.
I used to go to Sammys all the time for a corned beef sandwich whenever i came in town....until my mom took me to Smallman Street Deli! Best corned beef on rye...be sure to get it grilled!!! My sandwich...lean corned beef on marble rye, swiss cheese, grilled with lettuce, tomato, onion and spicy brown mustard!! Love this place!
Great theater !!! Absolutely beautiful .. Live the seating ... Seen Book of Mormon here !!! Loved it
I like coming here. Saw the Lion King. Bathrooms get crowded so you better hurry.  I'll be back.
Giving my local businesses some loving. I frequent here & will never gives money elsewhere. There is a touch less car wash right down the street for the same prices who cleans half what this place does. I personally prefer an actual hand wash anyday. If you do come here, those these guys a buck or 2 in the tip. I've never had a guy here that didn't make sure every little mark or wet spot was off the car before I drove off the lot.
